 



Fitch Affirms KKR at 'A' and KKR Financial Holdings at 'A-'; Outlooks Stable | Business Wire


























































      Fitch Affirms KKR at 'A' and KKR Financial Holdings at 'A-'; Outlooks 
      Stable
    





November 02, 2016 04:27 PM Eastern Daylight Time



NEW YORK--(BUSINESS WIRE)--Fitch Ratings has affirmed the Long-Term Issuer Default Ratings (IDRs) 
      of KKR & Co. L.P. and its related entities (collectively KKR) at 'A'. 
      The Rating Outlook is Stable. Concurrently, Fitch has affirmed the 
      Long-Term IDR of KKR Financial Holdings LLC (KFN) at 'A-'. The Rating 
      Outlook is Stable. A complete list of ratings is detailed at the end of 
      this release.
    

      Today's rating actions have been taken as part of a periodic peer review 
      of the Alternative Investment Manager (IM) industry, which comprises 
      seven publicly rated global firms. Fitch's outlook for the sector is 
      stable; reflecting the relative stability of core operating 
      fundamentals, given the locked-in nature of a large portion of fee 
      revenue, modest but increased leverage levels, manageable near term 
      obligations relative to available liquidity resources, increasing asset 
      under management (AUM) diversity and investors' increasing allocation to 
      alternative investments, particularly those managed by alternative IMs 
      with strong franchises such as those included in Fitch's peer review.
    

      Fee-earning AUM (FAUM) growth has slowed considerably for the rated peer 
      group, as numerous strategies have record levels of uncalled capital to 
      invest. Fundraising is expected to moderate to some extent, as a result, 
      but management fees are expected to retain their resiliency as capital 
      not-yet-earning management fees (shadow AUM) remains elevated and 
      realizations of legacy investments have declined. While an increase in 
      market dislocations would impact the valuations and realization of 
      existing investments, it could also result in stronger management fee 
      growth, as uncalled capital would be invested at a faster pace. Fitch 
      does not expect a widespread distress cycle to emerge over the near term.
    

      The variable cost structure of the alternative IMs has contributed to 
      relatively steady cash flows through cycles. Fee-related earnings before 
      interest, taxes, depreciation, and amortization (FEBITDA) margins 
      rebounded modestly in 2015 and 2016 as many alternative IMs have begun 
      to realize the scale benefits of follow-on funds and adjacent 
      strategies. The FEBITDA margin for 'A' category alternative IMs averaged 
      41.6% for the trailing 12 months (TTM) ended Sept. 30, 2016, which 
      compared to a 35.6% average for 2015 and Fitch's quantitative benchmark 
      range of 30%-50% for 'A' category alternative IMs. Still, dispersion in 
      the group is significant, with a more than 25 percentage point 
      differential between the highest and lowest performer, driven by 
      differences in strategy and product mix. Fitch believes higher margins 
      provide enhanced operating flexibility through cycles.
    

      Gross realized incentive income has steadily declined, since peaking in 
      2014, driven by the length of time valuations have been at elevated 
      levels, a less supportive IPO environment, and a reduction in the 
      average age of fund investments. Exit activity has declined in 2016 and 
      is likely to moderate further, which points to likely reductions in 
      distributable earnings. Incentive income accruals remain strong and 
      Fitch believes realized incentive income may be less volatile than 
      pre-crisis experience given the increased diversity of product platforms.
    

      Leverage levels have increased across the industry, as issuers have 
      taken advantage of the low interest rate environment to issue long 
      duration funding for the purpose of funding balance sheet 
      co-investments, acquisitions, and, in some instances, to pre-fund 
      maturities. Average leverage, defined as debt divided by FEBITDA, was 
      3.16 times (x) for 'A' category firms for the TTM ending Sept. 30, 2016, 
      which compares to Fitch's quantitative benchmark range of 0.5x-2.5x for 
      'A' category alternative IMs. Fitch believes the issuances have been 
      largely opportunistic and views the reduction in refinancing risk 
      favorably. Over time, Fitch expects leverage levels to generally decline 
      to the benchmark range, as FEBITDA growth is driven by cost controls, 
      increased scale, continued fundraising, and the gradual deployment of 
      FAUM that earns fees on invested capital.
    

      Counterbalancing the up-tick in leverage is the maintenance of strong 
      liquidity profiles. Several firms remain in a negative net debt position 
      and 2016 saw the introduction of perpetual preferred issuances by two 
      issuers in the sector, with proceeds, to date, used to improve operating 
      flexibility and liquidity. Debt maturities are negligible for the sector 
      in 2016-2018. Payout ratios remain relatively high, but Fitch believes 
      alternative IMs retain the ability to reduce shareholder distributions, 
      as necessary, to meet obligations. While several share repurchase 
      programs were announced over the last 12 months, execution of the 
      programs is expected to remain opportunistic and is not expected to 
      impair the sector's overall liquidity.
    

      KEY RATING DRIVERS
    

      IDRs AND SENIOR DEBT
    

      The rating affirmations for KKR reflect its strong competitive position 
      as a global alternative IM, experienced management team, solid 
      investment track record, relatively predictable fee-earnings stream, 
      given sizeable FAUM, incentive income-generating capability, strong 
      asset coverage of debt, ample liquidity, relatively low balance sheet 
      leverage, and subordination of general partner interests to outstanding 
      indebtedness.
    

      Rating constraints for the alternative IM space include 'key man' risk, 
      which is institutionalized throughout many limited partnership 
      agreements, reputational risk, which can impact the company's ability to 
      raise future funds, and legal and regulatory risk, which could alter the 
      alternative asset space. Rating constraints more specific to KKR include 
      lower relative AUM diversity, higher cash flow leverage, and some 
      sizeable investment concentrations on the balance sheet, the performance 
      of which are highly correlated to KKR's investment management 
      performance.
    

      The affirmation of KFN's ratings reflects Fitch's view that the entity 
      is strategically important to KKR, as outlined in Fitch's 'Global 
      Non-Bank Financial Institutions Rating Criteria'. In accordance with the 
      criteria, a subsidiary considered to be of strategic importance is rated 
      one notch below its parent.
    

      Supporting the view of KFN's strategic importance to KKR is the sharing 
      of the brand, the high level of management integration, the expansion of 
      KKR's credit business, and the fact that during the recent financial 
      crisis KKR provided explicit financial support to KFN by waiving 
      management fees, backstopping an equity raise, and providing the firm 
      with a $100 million liquidity facility.
    

      Fitch believes that KFN's small size and more limited investment focus 
      prevent the firm from being considered a core subsidiary at present 
      which would result in equalization of the ratings. Depending on KFN's 
      size, strategy, and relative earnings contribution to KKR, Fitch's 
      assessment of KFN's strategic importance could evolve over time.
    

      KKR's business model continues to be differentiated compared with other 
      Fitch-rated alternative IMs, as the firm increasingly uses its balance 
      sheet to make investments and generate cash yield. At Sept. 30, 2016, 
      the investment portfolio was about $7.5 billion at fair value, as the 
      balance sheet is used to seed new investment strategies, make strategic 
      investments, and finance co-investment commitments to the funds. As a 
      result of this strategy, Fitch assesses the firm's leverage profile on 
      both a cash flow and balance sheet basis.
    

      At Sept. 30, 2016, KKR's cash flow leverage (debt/FEBITDA) was 4.33x, on 
      a TTM basis, adjusting for cash fees received for the management of KFN, 
      but eliminated in consolidation. KKR's leverage was above the 'A' 
      category peer average of 3.6x at the third quarter of 2016 (3Q16); 
      however, Fitch's calculation does not give credit for the interest 
      income the firm has been able to generate from its balance sheet 
      investments, which is expected to be a somewhat stable, recurring, 
      source of cash income.
    

      On a balance sheet leverage basis, KKR's debt to tangible equity was 
      0.21x at June 30, 2016, which is low on an absolute basis and at the 
      low-end of the peer group.
    

      Following KKR's acquisition of KFN, on April 30, 2014, Fitch began 
      evaluating consolidated leverage metrics as part of its assessment of 
      KKR's credit profile. At June 30, 2016, KFN had approximately $844.2 
      million of debt, providing 50% equity credit for KFN's perpetual 
      preferred securities. If KFN's debt is added to KKR's debt and KFN's 
      recurring EBITDA is added to KKR's FEBITDA, consolidated cash flow 
      leverage was about 5.26x and consolidated balance leverage was 0.30x at 
      2Q16. While Fitch expects KFN will continue to service its own debt, and 
      recognizes that the debt is nonrecourse to KKR, the agency also believes 
      that there is the possibility that the parent would provide support to 
      its subsidiary, should KFN have trouble meeting its debt payments. The 
      potential is reflected in Fitch's designation of KFN as a strategically 
      important subsidiary of KKR and the resultant one notch differential 
      between KKR's ratings and KFN's ratings.
    

      On Oct. 25, 2016, KFN announced its intention to redeem, in full, its 
      8.375% senior notes, due 2041, with a principal amount of $258.8 
      million, in November 2016. Fitch views the redemption favorably, as it 
      will reduce KKR's consolidated leverage.
    

      While KKR's stand-alone and consolidated cash flow leverage ratios are 
      higher than Fitch's quantitative benchmark of 0.5x-2.5x for alternative 
      IMs in the 'A' rating category, this is mitigated by the very low 
      balance sheet leverage which results in substantial asset coverage for 
      outstanding debt in addition to contractual management fee streams. The 
      expectation of increased FEBITDA and interest income generation over 
      time and KKR's superior liquidity position are additional mitigants.
    

      KKR's FAUM amounted to $93.2 billion at Sept. 30, 2016, up 8.5% 
      year-over-year, driven by the acquisition of a strategic interest in 
      Marshall Wace LLP, and strong fundraising in the public markets segment. 
      The increase in FAUM is noteworthy given the offsetting impact of the 
      continuation of a strong exit environment. KKR's total FAUM 
      distributions to the limited partners of its funds amounted to $9 
      billion in 2015 and $9 billion over the TTM ending Sept. 30, 2016, net 
      of redemptions, as the firm took advantage of a competitive credit 
      environment and strong equity market valuations to exit legacy 
      positions. Fundraising is expected to remain solid, given the increasing 
      diversity of KKR's product offering and the fact that the next 
      generation Americas private equity fund is currently raising capital, 
      with a third-party capital target of $12 billion.
    

      KKR's core operating performance was up modestly in the first nine 
      months of 2016, as an increase in management and transaction fees 
      surpassed declines in monitoring fees. While transaction and monitoring 
      fees will remain lumpy, Fitch believes management fees are positioned to 
      grow as KKR had approximately $21 billion of uncalled capital at Sept. 
      30, 2016 that was not yet earning fees. If that capital was invested 
      today at KKR's blended fee rate of 1.2%, it would translate into about 
      $250 million in net incremental management fees per year, according to 
      management estimates.
    

      Despite some variability in the revenue components, operating margins 
      are expected to remain relatively consistent, given KKR's variable-cost 
      structure and the expectation that follow-on funds will provide higher 
      margins, given the absence of more meaningful start-up costs. KKR's 
      FEBITDA margin was 40% for the TTM ended Sept. 30, 2016, which compares 
      favorably to the peer group and is in line with Fitch's quantitative 
      benchmark for alternative IMs in the 'A' rating category of 30%-50%.
    

      Carried interest income, year-to-date in 2016, was down 28.9% versus 
      2015 levels, given the impact of market volatility at the start of the 
      year. However, realized carried interest income was down a more modest 
      8.2%, as strong exit activity continued, particularly in the third 
      quarter. Investment income experienced a $576 million negative swing in 
      the nine months of the year, due largely to a nearly 18% decline in the 
      share price of First Data Corporation, which remains KKR's largest 
      balance sheet investment. These revenue categories will be lumpy over 
      time due to deal activity and market volatility.
    

      Accrued carried interest was $1.3 billion at Sept. 30, 2016, net of 
      associated compensation expense. Fitch does not view the accrual as a 
      liquid asset, but it does point to potential future income generation 
      and cash flow.
    

      Fitch believes KKR has a solid liquidity profile. At Sept. 30, 2016, KKR 
      had nearly $2.8 billion of cash and liquid short-term investments and 
      approximately $1 billion of available revolving capacity, excluding 
      outstanding letters of credit. Given the cash earnings generation 
      capacity of the firm, the lower payout ratio and the limited remaining 
      authorization on the share repurchase program, Fitch expects the firm to 
      remain in a negative net debt position, which Fitch views favorably.
    

      KKR also has a significant amount of investments on its balance sheet; 
      about $7.5 billion at Sept. 30, 2016, including KFN; a meaningful 
      portion of which is liquid and an increasing portion of which is 
      generating a contractual cash yield for the firm.
    

      Unfunded commitments to funds amounted to approximately $2.5 billion at 
      Sept. 30, 2016, which includes a $1 billion commitment to Americas Fund 
      XII, which has yet to begin its investment period. Fitch believes the 
      firm has some discretion over the timing of these fund commitments, but 
      expects them to be funded over time with balance sheet liquidity, 
      retained cash earnings, and a return of investment capital on legacy 
      co-investments.
    

      In 4Q15, KKR altered its distribution policy to a flat $0.16 per share 
      per quarter, which approximates quarterly fee and yield earnings. As a 
      result, the firm retains all net realized carry earnings and realized 
      investment income in order to support continued growth in the business, 
      including the seeding of new strategies, co-investment commitments, and 
      other strategic opportunities. Fitch views the lower payout favorably as 
      it further strengthens the firm's liquidity profile, although it does 
      signal a likely meaningful expansion of KKR's already sizeable balance 
      sheet, which would further differentiate its business model from peers.
    

      In concert with the change in the distribution policy, KKR also 
      established a $500 million share repurchase program. At Sept. 30, 2016, 
      remaining authority on the plan amounted to $43 million. Execution of 
      the program did reduce balance sheet cash temporarily, but cash coffers 
      have since been replenished with the retention of a bigger proportion of 
      cash earnings and the issuance of $500 million of perpetual preferred 
      securities.
    

      The Stable Outlook for KKR reflects Fitch's expectation that KKR will 
      continue to generate consistent management fees, interest income, and 
      fee-related earnings, grow FAUM through follow-on funds and expansion 
      into new private equity and fixed income products, manage cash flow 
      leverage down over time with the generation of incremental fees and cash 
      yields, and maintain solid balance sheet leverage and liquidity 
      profiles. The Stable Outlook incorporates an expectation that leverage 
      may remain above the peer average and Fitch's general tolerance level of 
      0.5x-2.5x, for 'A' category rated alternative IMs, offset by the 
      company's very low balance sheet leverage, consistent with Fitch hybrid 
      approach to the assessment of the company's credit risk profile. The 
      Stable Outlook for KFN is equalized with KKR's Outlook and reflects 
      Fitch's expectation of continued strategic importance to KKR.
    

      SUBORDINATED DEBT AND OTHER HYBRID SECURITIES
    

      The affirmation of KKR's preferred stock rating at 'BBB+' maintains the 
      two notch differential with KKR's Long-Term IDR in accordance with 
      Fitch's 'Treatment and Notching of Hybrids in Non-Financial Corporate 
      and REIT Credit Analysis' dated February 2016. The preferred stock 
      rating includes two notches for loss severity, reflecting its 
      subordination and heightened risk of non-performance relative to other 
      obligations, namely existing unsecured debt.
    

      Fitch affords the preferred stock issuances 100% equity credit given the 
      non-cumulative nature of the dividends, the fact that the preferred 
      securities are perpetual, and the existence of a coupon step-up of up to 
      500 basis points in the event of a change of control.
    

      The preferred instruments do not benefit from joint and several 
      guarantees from the KKR Group Partnerships, given the registration 
      requirements. However, KKR contributed proceeds from the issuances to 
      the KKR Group Partnerships, which each issued to KKR a new series of 
      preferred units with economic terms designed to mirror those of the 
      preferred issuance. This included an inability to declare distributions 
      on common units unless distributions have been declared and paid on the 
      preferred units. These terms help to provide a credit benefit to offset 
      the lack of a guarantee by structurally prioritizing the preferred units 
      above all common units.
    

      The affirmation of KFN's preferred stock rating at 'BBB' maintains the 
      two-notch differential between the Long-Term IDR and preferred stock 
      rating, and reflects the instrument's non-performance risk and loss 
      severity.
    

      RATING SENSITIVITIES
    

      IDRs AND SENIOR DEBT
    

      Positive rating momentum for KKR could be driven by an increase in fund 
      and fee diversity, growth in permanent capital under management, which 
      would enhance the predictability of management fees, a decline in the 
      proportionate contribution of transaction and monitoring fees to total 
      fees, as they tend to be more volatile/cyclical, increased stability in 
      balance sheet earnings, a decline in key man risk, and a sustained 
      reduction in cash flow leverage.
    

      Negative rating action for KKR could be driven by declines in investment 
      performance which negatively impact the company's ability to raise FAUM 
      and generate fees, sustained meaningful increases in cash flow or 
      balance sheet leverage as a result of increased debt issuance, a failure 
      to generate additional FEBITDA and interest income, or balance sheet 
      asset impairment and/or material reduction of the firm's liquidity 
      profile. Additionally, a material increase in leverage and/or 
      significant deterioration in the operating performance of KFN could 
      become a constraining factor for the ratings of KKR.
    

      SUBSIDIARY AND AFFILIATED COMPANIES
    

      The ratings of KFN are directly linked to KKR, as Fitch considers KFN to 
      be a strategically important subsidiary. Any change in Fitch's view on 
      the relationship between KFN and its parent could alter the rating 
      linkage. Absent a change in the perceived relationship between KKR and 
      KFN, Fitch would expect KFNs ratings to move in step with any changes to 
      KKR's ratings.
    

      Founded in 1976, KKR is one of the largest alternative asset managers in 
      the world with $93.2 billion of FAUM at Sept. 30, 2016. The company's 
      common units are listed on the NYSE under the ticker 'KKR'.
    

      Fitch has affirmed the following ratings:
    

      KKR & Co. L.P.
    

      --Long-Term IDR at 'A';
    

      --Preferred Units at 'BBB+'.
    

      KKR Management Holdings L.P.
    

      --Long-Term IDR at 'A'.
    

      KKR Fund Holdings L.P.
    

      --Long-Term IDR at 'A'.
    

      KKR International Holdings L.P.
    

      --Long-Term IDR at 'A'.
    

      KKR Group Finance Co. LLC
    

      KKR Group Finance Co. II LLC
    

      KKR Group Finance Co. III LLC
    

      --Long-Term IDR at 'A';
    

      --Unsecured debt at 'A'.
    

      KKR Financial Holdings LLC
    

      --Long-Term IDR at 'A-';
    

      --Unsecured debt at 'A-';
    

      --Preferred stock at 'BBB'.
    

      The Rating Outlooks are Stable.
    

      Additional information is available on www.fitchratings.com


      Applicable Criteria
    

      Global Non-Bank Financial Institutions Rating Criteria (pub. 15 Jul 2016)
    

https://www.fitchratings.com/site/re/884128


      Additional Disclosures
    

      Dodd-Frank Rating Information Disclosure Form
    

https://www.fitchratings.com/creditdesk/press_releases/content/ridf_frame.cfm?pr_id=1014222


      Solicitation Status
    

https://www.fitchratings.com/gws/en/disclosure/solicitation?pr_id=1014222


      Endorsement Policy
    

https://www.fitchratings.com/regulatory


      ALL FITCH CREDIT RATINGS ARE SUBJECT TO CERTAIN LIMITATIONS AND 
      DISCLAIMERS. PLEASE READ THESE LIMITATIONS AND DISCLAIMERS BY FOLLOWING 
      THIS LINK: HTTPS://WWW.FITCHRATINGS.COM/UNDERSTANDINGCREDITRATINGS. 
      IN ADDITION, RATING DEFINITIONS AND THE TERMS OF USE OF SUCH RATINGS ARE 
      AVAILABLE ON THE AGENCY'S PUBLIC WEB SITE AT WWW.FITCHRATINGS.COM. 
      PUBLISHED RATINGS, CRITERIA, AND METHODOLOGIES ARE AVAILABLE FROM THIS 
      SITE AT ALL TIMES. FITCH'S CODE OF CONDUCT, CONFIDENTIALITY, CONFLICTS 
      OF INTEREST, AFFILIATE FIREWALL, COMPLIANCE, AND OTHER RELEVANT POLICIES 
      AND PROCEDURES ARE ALSO AVAILABLE FROM THE CODE OF CONDUCT SECTION OF 
      THIS SITE. FITCH MAY HAVE PROVIDED ANOTHER PERMISSIBLE SERVICE TO THE 
      RATED ENTITY OR ITS RELATED THIRD PARTIES. DETAILS OF THIS SERVICE FOR 
      RATINGS FOR WHICH THE LEAD ANALYST IS BASED IN AN EU-REGISTERED ENTITY 
      CAN BE FOUND ON THE ENTITY SUMMARY PAGE FOR THIS ISSUER ON THE FITCH 
      WEBSITE.
    

      Copyright © 2016 by Fitch Ratings, Inc., Fitch Ratings Ltd. and its 
      subsidiaries. 33 Whitehall Street, NY, NY 10004. Telephone: 
      1-800-753-4824, (212) 908-0500. Fax: (212) 480-4435. Reproduction or 
      retransmission in whole or in part is prohibited except by permission. 
      All rights reserved. In issuing and maintaining its ratings and in 
      making other reports (including forecast information), Fitch relies on 
      factual information it receives from issuers and underwriters and from 
      other sources Fitch believes to be credible. Fitch conducts a reasonable 
      investigation of the factual information relied upon by it in accordance 
      with its ratings methodology, and obtains reasonable verification of 
      that information from independent sources, to the extent such sources 
      are available for a given security or in a given jurisdiction. The 
      manner of Fitch's factual investigation and the scope of the third-party 
      verification it obtains will vary depending on the nature of the rated 
      security and its issuer, the requirements and practices in the 
      jurisdiction in which the rated security is offered and sold and/or the 
      issuer is located, the availability and nature of relevant public 
      information, access to the management of the issuer and its advisers, 
      the availability of pre-existing third-party verifications such as audit 
      reports, agreed-upon procedures letters, appraisals, actuarial reports, 
      engineering reports, legal opinions and other reports provided by third 
      parties, the availability of independent and competent third- party 
      verification sources with respect to the particular security or in the 
      particular jurisdiction of the issuer, and a variety of other factors. 
      Users of Fitch's ratings and reports should understand that neither an 
      enhanced factual investigation nor any third-party verification can 
      ensure that all of the information Fitch relies on in connection with a 
      rating or a report will be accurate and complete. Ultimately, the issuer 
      and its advisers are responsible for the accuracy of the information 
      they provide to Fitch and to the market in offering documents and other 
      reports. In issuing its ratings and its reports, Fitch must rely on the 
      work of experts, including independent auditors with respect to 
      financial statements and attorneys with respect to legal and tax 
      matters. Further, ratings and forecasts of financial and other 
      information are inherently forward-looking and embody assumptions and 
      predictions about future events that by their nature cannot be verified 
      as facts. As a result, despite any verification of current facts, 
      ratings and forecasts can be affected by future events or conditions 
      that were not anticipated at the time a rating or forecast was issued or 
      affirmed.
    

      The information in this report is provided "as is" without any 
      representation or warranty of any kind, and Fitch does not represent or 
      warrant that the report or any of its contents will meet any of the 
      requirements of a recipient of the report. A Fitch rating is an opinion 
      as to the creditworthiness of a security. This opinion and reports made 
      by Fitch are based on established criteria and methodologies that Fitch 
      is continuously evaluating and updating. Therefore, ratings and reports 
      are the collective work product of Fitch and no individual, or group of 
      individuals, is solely responsible for a rating or a report. The rating 
      does not address the risk of loss due to risks other than credit risk, 
      unless such risk is specifically mentioned. Fitch is not engaged in the 
      offer or sale of any security. All Fitch reports have shared authorship. 
      Individuals identified in a Fitch report were involved in, but are not 
      solely responsible for, the opinions stated therein. The individuals are 
      named for contact purposes only. A report providing a Fitch rating is 
      neither a prospectus nor a substitute for the information assembled, 
      verified and presented to investors by the issuer and its agents in 
      connection with the sale of the securities. Ratings may be changed or 
      withdrawn at any time for any reason in the sole discretion of Fitch. 
      Fitch does not provide investment advice of any sort. Ratings are not a 
      recommendation to buy, sell, or hold any security. Ratings do not 
      comment on the adequacy of market price, the suitability of any security 
      for a particular investor, or the tax-exempt nature or taxability of 
      payments made in respect to any security. Fitch receives fees from 
      issuers, insurers, guarantors, other obligors, and underwriters for 
      rating securities. Such fees generally vary from US$1,000 to US$750,000 
      (or the applicable currency equivalent) per issue. In certain cases, 
      Fitch will rate all or a number of issues issued by a particular issuer, 
      or insured or guaranteed by a particular insurer or guarantor, for a 
      single annual fee. Such fees are expected to vary from US$10,000 to 
      US$1,500,000 (or the applicable currency equivalent). The assignment, 
      publication, or dissemination of a rating by Fitch shall not constitute 
      a consent by Fitch to use its name as an expert in connection with any 
      registration statement filed under the United States securities laws, 
      the Financial Services and Markets Act of 2000 of the United Kingdom, or 
      the securities laws of any particular jurisdiction. Due to the relative 
      efficiency of electronic publishing and distribution, Fitch research may 
      be available to electronic subscribers up to three days earlier than to 
      print subscribers.
    

      For Australia, New Zealand, Taiwan and South Korea only: Fitch Australia 
      Pty Ltd holds an Australian financial services license (AFS license no. 
      337123) which authorizes it to provide credit ratings to wholesale 
      clients only. Credit ratings information published by Fitch is not 
      intended to be used by persons who are retail clients within the meaning 
      of the Corporations Act 2001
    


Contacts

      Fitch RatingsPrimary AnalystMeghan Neenan, CFASenior 
      Director+1-212-908-9121Fitch Ratings, Inc.33 Whitehall 
      StreetNew York, NY 10004orSecondary AnalystMichael 
      DodgeAssociate Director+1-212-908-0379orCommittee 
      ChairpersonSean PattapSenior Director+1-212-908-0642orMedia 
      Relations:Hannah James, New York, +1 646-582-4947hannah.james@fitchratings.com













Contacts

      Fitch RatingsPrimary AnalystMeghan Neenan, CFASenior 
      Director+1-212-908-9121Fitch Ratings, Inc.33 Whitehall 
      StreetNew York, NY 10004orSecondary AnalystMichael 
      DodgeAssociate Director+1-212-908-0379orCommittee 
      ChairpersonSean PattapSenior Director+1-212-908-0642orMedia 
      Relations:Hannah James, New York, +1 646-582-4947hannah.james@fitchratings.com







 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up





















Firm History | KKR





































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 
















Toggle navigation





MENU












































×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






Firm History






Firm History


Toggle navigation





MORE

Firm History














1976
KKR founded
Henry Kravis and George Roberts make this decision over dinner at Joe and Rose Restaurant












1982
The first state public pension funds invest in KKR’s private equity funds
The states involved in this maiden allocation are Oregon, Washington State, and Michigan










1984
KKR raises its first $1.0 billion institutional fund

















  











Kohlberg Kravis Roberts - Wikipedia





















 







Kohlberg Kravis Roberts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from KKR)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"KKR" redirects here. For other uses, see KKR (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Too much unnecessary detail and puffery Please help improve this article if you can. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may have too many section headers dividing up its content. Please help improve the article by merging similar sections and removing unneeded subheaders. (June 2017)







This article may contain an excessive amount of intricate detail that may only interest a specific audience. Please help by spinning off or relocating any relevant information, and removing excessive detail that may be against Wikipedia's inclusion policy. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may be too long to read and navigate comfortably. Please consider splitting content into sub-articles, condensing it, or adding or removing subheadings. (June 2017)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



KKR & Co. L.P.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: KKR


Industry
Financial services:
private equity
(1976–present)
investment banking
(2004–present)


Founded
1976; 41 years ago (1976)


Founder
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts
Jerome Kohlberg, Jr.


Headquarters
9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York City, New York 10019
United States



Number of locations

13 offices in 9 countries[1]



Key people

Henry R. Kravis
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)
George R. Roberts
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)


Products
Management buyouts
Leveraged finance
Venture capital
Growth capital


Revenue
US$ 8.896 billion (2013)



Net income

US$ 691.2 million (2013)


AUM
US$ 98.0 billion (2012)


Total assets
US$ 39 billion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

1700 (2017)


Website
www.kkr.com


KKR & Co. L.P. (formerly known as Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.) is an American multinational private equity firm, specializing in leveraged buyouts, headquartered in New York City. The firm sponsors and manages private equity investment funds. The firm has completed over $400 billion of private equity transactions since its inception.[3][4]
The firm was founded in 1976 by Jerome Kohlberg, Jr., and cousins Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts, all of whom had previously worked together at Bear Stearns, where they completed some of the earliest leveraged buyout transactions. Since its founding, KKR has completed a number of transactions including the 1989 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco, which was the largest buyout in history to that point, as well as the 2007 buyout of TXU, which is currently the largest buyout completed to date.[5][6] KKR has completed investments in over 160 companies since 1977, completing at least one investment in every year except in 1982 and in 1990.[7]
KKR has 13 additional offices in the United States, Europe and Asia.[1] The firm is currently located in the Solow Building (9 W. 57th Street), but recently announced its intentions to occupy a newly constructed 30 Hudson Yards.[8]
In October 2009, KKR listed shares in the company through KKR & Co., an affiliate that holds 30% of the firm's ownership equity, with the remainder held by the firm's partners. In March 2010, KKR filed to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE),[9] with trading commencing four months later, on July 15, 2010.



Contents


1 The Firm KKR
2 Investment funds and other affiliates

2.1 Private equity funds
2.2 KKR Financial
2.3 KKR Private Equity Investors


3 History

3.1 Founding and early history
3.2 Buyout of RJR Nabisco
3.3 Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco
3.4 Early 1990s: Investments
3.5 1996–1999
3.6 2000–2005
3.7 Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom
3.8 Initial public offering
3.9 2010 to present day


4 Notable current and former employees
5 Works about KKR
6 See also
7 Notes
8 References
9 External links



The Firm KKR[edit]
KKR is operated by its managing partners Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts and a team of approximately 140 investment professionals and 400 total employees, organized into industry-focused groups.[3] KKR is headquartered in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street, Manhattan, New York, with U.S. offices in Menlo Park, San Francisco, Houston, and Washington, D.C., and offices in London, Paris, Hong Kong, Tokyo, Beijing, Mumbai, Dubai, Seoul, São Paulo and Sydney.[1]
KKR invests primarily through leveraged buyouts as well as growth capital investments (including "PIPE" investments in public companies). It has traditionally specialized in private equity investments, focusing on specific industry sectors where the firm has created nine dedicated investment groups. The industries in which KKR has developed a specialization include:[10]

Chemicals
Consumer products
Energy & natural resources
Financial services
Health care
Industrial
Media and communications
Retail
Technology

The professionals in each of KKR's industry-focused groups are expected to have developed a proficiency in their respective industries.[10] The firm has traditionally had strong ties with its investors.[11]
Investment funds and other affiliates[edit]
Private equity funds[edit]
KKR has historically relied primarily on private equity funds, pools of committed capital that are raised from a broad array of institutional investors (e.g., pension funds, insurance companies, investment banks, commercial banks, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds).[3][12] As of March 31, 2014, KKR had completed fund-raising for approximately 23 traditional investment funds in the US, Europe and Asia with total committed capital of approximately US$80 billion:


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($m)


KKR Fund 1976
1977
$31


KKR Fund 1980
1980
$357


KKR Fund 1982
1982
$328


KKR Fund 1984
1984
$1,000


KKR Fund 1986
1986
$672


KKR Fund 1987
1987
$6,130


KKR Fund 1993
1993
$1,946


KKR Fund 1996
1996
$6,012


KKR European Fund
1999
$3,085


KKR Millennium Fund
2002
$6,000


KKR European Fund II
2005
$5,751


KKR Fund 2006
2006
$17,642


KKR Asian Fund
2007
$4,000


KKR European Fund III
2008
$6,238


KKR E2 Investors (Annex Fund)
2009
$209


KKR China Growth Fund
2010
$1,010


KKR Natural Resources Fund
2010
$876


KKR Infrastructure Fund
2011
$1,043


KKR North America Fund XI
2012
$8,718


KKR Asian Fund II
2013
$5,825


KKR Real Estate Partners Americas
2013
$1,226


KKR Energy Income and Growth Fund
2013
$1,974


Source: SEC Filings[13]
KKR Financial[edit]






Type

Public company (NYSE: KFN)


Founded
2004


Website
www.kkrfinancial.com


KKR Financial (NYSE: KFN) is a real estate investment trust (REIT) and specialty finance company that invests in residential and commercial mortgage loans and mortgage-backed securities as well as corporate loans and debt securities, asset-backed securities and equity securities. KFN was founded in 2004 raising $795 million in a private placement and raised $849 million in a June 2005 initial public offering, increasing the size of the offering from an original $600 million target.[14] KKR had initially considered structuring KFN as a business development company like Apollo Management's Apollo Investment Corporation but chose to pursue the REIT structure to capitalize on the strength in REIT valuations at the time.[14]
KFN was an early casualty of the subprime mortgage crisis and in September 2007, Henry Kravis and George Roberts injected $270 million into the company. On February 20, 2008, KFN was once again forced to delay the repayment of billions of dollars of commercial paper, and began a new round of talks with creditors.[15] In April, KFN sold a controlling interest in a real estate subsidiary to an investment firm to raise cash and entered an agreement with the noteholders of certain secured commercial paper issued by two asset-backed entities. Following the transaction, KFN converted from a REIT to a LLC.[16]
KKR Private Equity Investors[edit]






Type

Public company (Euronext: KPE)


Founded
2006


Website
www.kkrpei.com


KKR Private Equity Investors (Euronext: KPE) is a publicly traded private equity fund that invests as a fund of funds in KKR private equity funds. KPE also co-invests in transactions alongside KKR's private equity funds. KPE was founded in 2006. In May 2006, KKR raised $5 billion in an initial public offering for a KPE to serve as a new permanent investment vehicle listing it on the Euronext exchange in Amsterdam. KKR raised three times more than it expected, as many of the investors in KPE were hedge funds seeking exposure to private equity but could not make long term commitments to private equity funds. As private equity had been booming in preceding years, investing in a KKR fund was attractive to investors.[17]
However, KPE's first-day performance was lackluster, trading down 1.7% and trading volume was limited.[18] Initially, a handful of other private equity firms and hedge funds had planned to follow KKR's lead but shelved those plans when KPE's performance continued to falter after its IPO. KPE's stock declined from an IPO price of €25 per share to €18.16 (a 27% decline) at the end of 2007 and a low of €11.45 (a 54.2% decline) per share in Q1 2008.[19]
KPE disclosed in May 2008 that it had completed approximately $300 million of secondary sales of selected limited partnership interests in, and undrawn commitments to, certain KKR-managed funds in order to generate liquidity and repay borrowings.[20]
In October 2009 KPE changed its name to KKR & Co. (Guernsey) L.P.,[21] which was delisted from Euronext Amsterdam in July 2010 while common units of KKR & Co. L.P. began trading on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “KKR”.[22]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
Running the corporate finance department for Bear Stearns in the 1960s and 1970s, Jerome Kohlberg and later with protégés Henry Kravis and George Roberts completed a series of what they described as "bootstrap" investments beginning in 1964–65. They targeted family-owned businesses, many of which had been founded in the years following World War II which by the 1960s and 1970s were facing succession issues. Many of these companies lacked a viable or attractive exit for their founders as they were too small to be taken public and the founders were reluctant to sell out to competitors and so a sale to a financial buyer could prove attractive.[4]




Henry Kravis speaking at the World Economic Forum in 2009


Their acquisition of Orkin Exterminating Company in 1964 is among the first significant leveraged buyout transactions. In the following years the three Bear Stearns bankers would complete a series of buyouts including Stern Metals (1965), Incom (a division of Rockwood International, 1971), Cobblers Industries (1971), and Boren Clay (1973), as well as Thompson Wire, Eagle Motors and Barrows through their investment in Stern Metals. Despite a number of highly successful investments, the $27 million investment in Cobblers ended in bankruptcy.[23]
By 1976, tensions [clarification needed] had built up between Bear Stearns and Kohlberg, Kravis and Roberts, which led to the formation of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in that year. Most notably, Bear Stearns executive Cy Lewis had rejected repeated proposals to form a dedicated investment fund within Bear Stearns and Lewis took exception to the amount of time spent on outside activities. In 1976, Kravis had been required to serve as interim CEO of a failing direct mail company named Advo.[citation needed]
The new KKR completed its first buyout, that of manufacturer A.J. Industries, in 1977. KKR raised capital from a small group of investors including the Hillman Company and First Chicago Bank. By 1978, with the revision of the ERISA regulations, the nascent KKR was successful in raising its first institutional fund with over $30 million of investor commitments.[24] In 1981, KKR expanded its investor base significantly when the Oregon State Treasury's public pension fund invested in KKR's acquisition of retailer Fred Meyer, Inc. Oregon State remains an active investor in KKR funds.[4]
KKR closed out the 1970s completing the public-to-private buyout of Houdaille Industries in 1979,[25] probably the largest take-private of a public company to that point. As the 1980s began, KKR was among the most prominent practitioner of leveraged buyouts and would prove the most prolific of the private equity investors in the 1980s.[4] Among the firm's most notable acquisitions during the 1980s buyout boom were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


Malone & Hyde
1984
KKR completed the first buyout of a public company by tender offer, by acquiring the food distributor and supermarket operator together with the company's chairman Joseph R. Hyde III.
[26]


Wometco Enterprises
1984
KKR completed the first billion-dollar buyout transaction to acquire the leisure-time company with interests in television, movie theaters and tourist attractions. The buyout comprised the acquisition of 100% of the outstanding shares for $842 million and the assumption of $170 million of the company's outstanding debt.
[27]


Beatrice Companies
1985
KKR sponsored the $6.1 billion management buyout of Beatrice, which owned Samsonite and Tropicana among other consumer brands. At the time of its closing in 1985, Beatrice was the largest buyout completed.
[28][29]


Safeway
1986
KKR completed a friendly $5.5 billion buyout of Safeway to help management avoid hostile overtures from Herbert and Robert Haft of Dart Drug. Safeway was taken public again in 1990.
[30]


Jim Walter Corp.
(later Walter Industries)
1987
KKR acquired the company for $3.3 billion in early 1988 but faced issues with the buyout almost immediately. Most notably, a subsidiary of Jim Walter Corp (Celotex) faced a large asbestos lawsuit and incurred liabilities that the courts ruled would need to be satisfied by the parent company. In 1989, the holding company which KKR used for the Jim Walter buyout filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
[31][32]


Buyout of RJR Nabisco[edit]
Main article: RJR Nabisco
After the 1987 resignation of Jerome Kohlberg at age 61 (he later founded his own private equity firm, Kohlberg & Co.), Henry Kravis succeeded him as senior partner. Under Kravis and Roberts, the firm was responsible for the 1988 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco. RJR Nabisco proved to be not only the largest buyout in history to that time, at $25 billion ($31.1 billion, including assumed debt) as well as a high-water mark and sign of the end of the 1980s buyout boom. RJR—Nabisco, which would remain the largest buyout for the next 17 years, was chronicled in Barbarians at the Gate: The Fall of RJR Nabisco, and later made into a television movie starring James Garner.[33]
In 1988, F. Ross Johnson was the President and CEO of RJR Nabisco, formed in 1985 by the merger of Nabisco Brands and R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company, a leading producer of food products (Shredded Wheat, Oreo cookies, Ritz crackers, Planters peanuts, Life Savers, Del Monte Fruit and Vegetables, and Snickers Chocolate) as well as Winston, Camel and Salem cigarettes. In October 1988, Johnson proposed a $17 billion ($75 per share) management buyout of the company with the financial backing of investment bank Shearson Lehman Hutton and its parent company, American Express.[34][35]
Several days later, Kravis, who had originally suggested the idea of the buyout to Johnson, presented a new bid for $20.3 billion ($90 per share) financed with an aggressive debt package.[36][37][38] KKR had the support of significant equity co-investments from leading pension funds and other institutional investors. Investors included Coca-Cola, Georgia-Pacific and United Technologies corporate pension funds, as well as endowments from MIT, Harvard and the New York State Common Retirement Fund[12] However, KKR faced criticism from existing investors over the firm's use of hostile tactics in the buyout of RJR.[39]
KKR proposed to provide a joint offer with Johnson and Shearson Lehman but was rebuffed and Johnson attempted to stonewall KKR's access to financial information from RJR.[40][41][42][43] Rival private equity firm, Forstmann Little & Co. was invited into the process by Shearson Lehman but attempted to provide a bid for RJR with a consortium of Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Procter & Gamble, Ralston Purina and Castle & Cooke.[44]
Ultimately the Forstmann consortium came apart and did not provide a final bid for RJR.[45] Many of the major banking players of the day, including Shearson Lehman Hutton, Drexel Burnham Lambert, Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Salomon Brothers and Merrill Lynch were actively involved in advising and financing the parties.




Oreo cookies, one of RJR Nabisco's products


In November 1988, RJR set guidelines for a final bid submission at the end of the month.[46] The management and Shearson group submitted a final bid of $112, a figure they felt certain would enable them to outflank any response by Kravis and KKR. KKR's final bid of $109, while a lower dollar figure, was ultimately accepted by the board of directors of RJR Nabisco.[47] KKR's offer was guaranteed, whereas the management offer lacked a "reset", meaning that the final share price might have been lower than their stated $112 per share.[48]
Additionally, many in RJR's board of directors had grown concerned at recent disclosures of Ross Johnson' unprecedented golden parachute deal.[49][50] Time Magazine featured Ross Johnson on the cover of their December 1988 issue along with the headline, "A Game of Greed: This man could pocket $100 million from the largest corporate takeover in history. Has the buyout craze gone too far?".[51] KKR's offer was welcomed by the board, and, to some observers, it appeared that their elevation of the reset issue as a deal-breaker in KKR's favor was little more than an excuse to reject Ross Johnson's higher payout of $112 per share. Johnson received $53 million from the buyout.[52] KKR collected a $75 million fee in the RJR takeover.[53] At $31.1 billion of transaction value (including assumed debt), RJR Nabisco was by far the largest leveraged buyout in history.[54]
In 2006 and 2007, a number of leveraged buyout transactions were completed which, for the first time, surpassed the RJR Nabisco leveraged buyout in terms of nominal purchase price. The deal was first surpassed in July 2006 by the $33 billion buyout of U.S. hospital operator Hospital Corporation of America, in which KKR participated, though the RJR deal was larger, adjusted for inflation. However, adjusted for inflation, none of the leveraged buyouts of the 2006–07 period would surpass RJR Nabisco. The RJR transaction benefited many of the parties involved. Investment bankers and lawyers who advised KKR walked away with over $1 billion in fees. Kravis and Roberts attracted an unprecedented amount of publicity that turned the cousins into instant celebrities. Size did not, however, guarantee success as the high purchase price and debt load would burden the performance of the investment, which KKR overcame, raising a new investment fund and continuing to invest throughout the 1990s.[55]
Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco[edit]




KKR's headquarters in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street in New York City


The buyout of RJR Nabisco was completed in April 1989 and KKR would spend the early 1990s repaying the RJR's enormous debt load through a series of asset sales and restructuring transactions.[56][57][58] After the RJR Nabisco deal, KKR did not complete a single investment in 1990, the first such year since 1982. They would not complete another major leveraged buyout transaction for more than three years, largely because of the shutdown of the high yield bond market and the collapse of Drexel Burnham Lambert which filed for bankruptcy in February 1990. KKR began to focus primarily on its existing portfolio companies acquired during the buyout boom of the late 1980s. Six of KKR's portfolio companies completed IPOs in 1991, including RJR Nabisco and Duracell.[4]
As the new decade began, KKR began restructuring RJR. In January 1990, it completed the sale of RJR's Del Monte Foods to a group led by Merrill Lynch. KKR had originally identified a group of divisions that it could sell to reduce debt.[59] Over the coming years, RJR would pursue a number of additional restructurings, equity injections and public offerings of stock to provide the company with added financial flexibility. KKR contributed $1.7 billion of new equity into RJR in July 1990 to complete a restructuring of the company's balance sheet that appeased unhappy bondholders. KKR's equity contribution as part of the original leveraged buyout of RJR had been only $1.5 billion.[60][61] In mid-December 1990, RJR announced an exchange offer that would swap debt in RJR for a new public stock in the company, effectively an unusual means of taking RJR public again and simultaneously reducing debt on the company.[62]
RJR issued additional stock to the public in March 1991 to further reduce debt, resulting in an upgrade of the credit rating of RJR's debt from junk to investment grade. KKR began to reduce its ownership in RJR in 1994, when its stock in RJR was used as part of the consideration for its leveraged buyout of Borden, Inc., a producer of food and beverage products, consumer products, and industrial products, in an unprecedented and complex transaction.[63][64] [65][66] The following year, in 1995, KKR would divest itself of its final stake in RJR Nabisco when Borden sold a $638 million block of stock.[67]
While KKR no longer had any ownership of RJR Nabisco by 1995, its original investment would not be fully realized until KKR exited its last investment in 2004. After sixteen years of efforts, including contributing new equity, taking RJR public, asset sales and exchanging shares of RJR for the ownership of Borden, Inc., KKR finally sold the last remnants of its 1989 investment. In July 2004, KKR agreed to sell its stock in Borden Chemical to Apollo Management for $1.2 billion.[68]
Early 1990s: Investments[edit]
In the early 1990s, the absence of an active high yield market prompted KKR to change its tactics, avoiding large leveraged buyouts in favor of industry consolidations through what were described as leveraged buildups or rollups. One of KKR's largest investments in the 1990s was the leveraged buildup of Primedia in partnership with former executives of Macmillan Publishing, which KKR had failed to acquire in 1988.[69] KKR created Primedia's predecessor, K-III Communications,[70] a platform to buy media properties, initially completing the $310 million divisional buyout of the book club division of Macmillan along with the assets of Intertec Publishing Corporation in May 1989.[71][72]
During the early 1990s, K-III continued acquiring publishing assets, including a $650 million acquisition from News Corporation in 1991.[73] K-III went public, however instead of cashing out, KKR continued to make new investments in the company in 1998, 2000 and 2001 to support acquisition activity.[74] In 2005, Primedia redeemed KKR's preferred stock in the company but KKR was estimated to have lost hundreds of millions of dollars on its common stock holdings as the price of the company's stock collapsed.[72]
In 1991, KKR partnered with Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in the 1991 acquisition of the Bank of New England, from the US Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.[75] In January 1996, KKR would exchange its investment for a 7.5% interest in Fleet Bank.[76] KKR completed the 1992 buyout of American Re Corporation from Aetna[77] as well as a 47% interest in TW Corporation, later known as The Flagstar Companies and owner of Denny's in 1992.[78] Among the other notable investments KKR completed in the early 1990s included World Color Press (1993–95),[79] RELTEC Corporation (1995) and Bruno's (1995).[80]
1996–1999[edit]
By the mid-1990s, the debt markets were improving and KKR had moved on from the RJR Nabisco buyout. In 1996, KKR was able to complete the bulk of fundraising for what was then a record $6 billion private equity fund, the KKR 1996 Fund.[81] However, KKR was still burdened by the performance of the RJR investment and repeated obituaries in the media.[82] KKR was required by its investors to reduce the fees it charged and to calculate its carried interest based on the total profit of the fund (i.e., offsetting losses from failed deals against the profits from successful deals).[4]




KKR acquired Regal Cinemas in 1998, only to see the company in bankruptcy by 2000


KKR's activity level would accelerate over the second half of the 1990s making a series of notable investments including Spalding Holdings Corporation and Evenflo (1996),[83] Newsquest (1996),[84] KinderCare Learning Centers (1997),[85] Amphenol Corporation (1997),[86] Randalls Food Markets (1997),[87][88] The Boyds Collection (1998),[89] MedCath Corporation (1998),[90] Willis Group Holdings (1998),[91] Smiths Group (1999), and Wincor Nixdorf (1999).[92]
KKR's largest investment of the 1990s would be one of its least successful. In January 1998, KKR and Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst agreed to the $1.5 billion buyout of Regal Entertainment Group.[93] KKR and Hicks Muse had initially intended to combine Regal with Act III Cinemas, which KKR had acquired in 1997 for $706 million[94] and United Artists Theaters, which Hicks Muse had agreed to acquire for $840 million in November 1997. Shortly after agreeing to the Regal takeover, the deal with United Artists fell apart, destroying the strategy to eliminate costs by building a larger combined company.[95] Two years later, in 2000, Regal encountered significant financial issues and was forced to file for bankruptcy protection; the company passed to billionaire investor Philip Anschutz.[96]
2000–2005[edit]




Shoppers Drug Mart, the Canadian pharmacy was one of several successful buyouts in the early 2000s[97]


At the start of the 21st century, the landscape of large leveraged buyout firms was changing. Several large and storied firms, including Hicks Muse Tate & Furst and Forstmann Little & Company were dragged down by heavy losses in the bursting of the telecom bubble. Although, KKR's track record since RJR Nabisco was mixed, losses on such investments as Regal Entertainment Group, Spalding, Flagstar and Primedia (previously K-III Communications) were offset by successes in Willis Group, Wise Foods, Inc., Wincor Nixdorf and MTU Aero Engines, among others.[4]
Additionally, KKR was one of the few firms that was able to complete large leveraged buyout transactions in the years immediately following the collapse of the Internet bubble, including Shoppers Drug Mart and Bell Canada Yellow Pages.[4][98] KKR was able to realize its investment in Shoppers Drug Mart through a 2002 IPO and subsequent public stock offerings.[97] The directories business would be taken public in 2004 as Yellow Pages Income Fund, a Canadian income trust.[99]




KKR led a consortium in the buyout of Toys "R" Us in 2004


In 2004 a consortium comprising KKR, Bain Capital and real estate development company Vornado Realty Trust announced the $6.6 billion acquisition of Toys "R" Us, the toy retailer. A month earlier, Cerberus Capital Management, made a $5.5 billion offer for both the toy and baby supplies businesses.[100] The Toys 'R' Us buyout was one of the largest in several years.[101] Following this transaction, by the end of 2004 and in 2005, major buyouts were once again becoming common and market observers were stunned by the leverage levels and financing terms obtained by financial sponsors in their buyouts.[102]
In 2005, KKR was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. KKR's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Blackstone Group, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1988. SunGard was the largest buyout of a technology company until the Blackstone-led buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction was notable given the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point. The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[103][104]
Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom[edit]
In 2006, KKR raised a new $17.6 billion fund the KKR 2006 Fund, with which the firm began executing a series of some of the largest buyouts in history. KKR's $44 billion takeover of Texas-based power utility, TXU, in 2007, proved to be the largest leveraged buyout of the mid-2000s buyout boom and the largest buyout completed to date.[105] Among the most notable companies acquired by KKR in 2006 and 2007 were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


HCA
2006
KKR and Bain Capital, together with Merrill Lynch and the Frist family (which had founded the company) completed a $31.6 billion acquisition of the hospital company, 17 years after it was taken private for the first time in a management buyout. At the time of its announcement, the HCA buyout would be the first of several to set new records for the largest buyout, eclipsing the 1989 buyout of RJR Nabisco. It would later be surpassed by the buyouts of Equity Office Properties, and TXU.
[106]


NXP Semiconductors
2006
In August 2006, a consortium of KKR, Silver Lake Partners and AlpInvest Partners acquired a controlling 80.1% share of semiconductors unit of Philips for €6.4 billion. The new company, based in the Netherlands, was renamed NXP Semiconductors.
[107]


TDC A/S
2006
The Danish phone company was acquired by KKR, Apax Partners, Providence Equity Partners and Permira for €12.2 billion ($15.3 billion), which at the time made it the second largest European buyout in history.
[108][109]


Dollar General
2007
KKR completed a buyout of the chain of discount stores operating in the U.S.
[110]


Alliance Boots
2007
KKR and Stefano Pessina, the company’s deputy chairman and largest shareholder, acquired the UK drug store retailer for £12.4 billion ($24.8 billion) including assumed debt, after increasing their bid more than 40% amidst intense competition from Terra Firma Capital Partners and Wellcome Trust. The buyout came only a year after the merger of Boots Group plc (Boots the Chemist), and Alliance UniChem plc.
[111][112]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone Group, KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[113]


First Data
2007
KKR and TPG Capital completed the $29 billion buyout of the credit and debit card payment processor and former parent of Western Union. Michael Capellas, previously the CEO of MCI Communications and Compaq was named CEO of the privately held company.
[114][115]


TXU (Energy Future Holdings)
2007
An investor group led by KKR and TPG Capital and together with Goldman Sachs completed the $44.37 billion[116] buyout of the regulated utility and power producer. The investor group had to work closely with ERCOT regulators to gain approval of the transaction but had significant experience with the regulators from their earlier buyout of Texas Genco. TXU is the largest buyout in history, and retained this distinction when the announced buyout of BCE failed to close in December 2008. The deal was notable for a drastic change in environmental policy for the energy giant, in terms of its carbon emissions from coal power plants and funding alternative energy.
[117][118]


Other non-buyout investments completed by KKR during this period included Legg Mason, Sun Microsystems, Tarkett, Longview Power Plant and Seven Network. In October 2006, KKR acquired a 50% stake in Tarkett, a France-based distributor of flooring products, in a deal valued at about €1.4 billion ($1.8 billion). On November 20, 2006, KKR announced it would form a A$4 billion partnership with the Seven Network of Australia.[119] On January 23, 2007, KKR announced it would invest $700 million through a PIPE investment in Sun Microsystems.[120] In January 2008, KKR announced it had made a $1.25 billion PIPE investment in Legg Mason through a convertible preferred stock offering.[121]
In addition to its successful buyout transactions, KKR was involved in the failed buyout of Harman International Industries (NYSE: HAR), an upscale audio equipment maker. On April 26, 2007, Harman announced it had entered an agreement to be acquired by KKR and Goldman Sachs.[122] As the financing markets became more adverse [clarification needed] in the summer of 2007, the buyout was on tenuous ground. In September 2007, KKR and Goldman backed out of the $8 billion buyout of Harman. By the end of the day, Harman's shares had plummeted by more than 24% upon the news.[123]


Selected Kohlberg Kravis Roberts 2006–2008 Investments













Hospital Corporation of America 













NXP Semiconductors 













Dollar General 













Alliance Boots 













TXU 













Sun Microsystems 













Legg Mason 






Initial public offering[edit]
In 2007, KKR filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission[3] to raise $1.25 billion by selling an ownership interest in its management company.[124] The filing came less than two weeks after the initial public offering of rival private equity firm Blackstone Group. KKR had previously listed its KPE vehicle in 2006, but for the first time, KKR would offer investors an ownership interest in the management company itself. The onset of the credit crunch and the shutdown of the IPO market dampened the prospects of obtaining a valuation attractive to KKR. The flotation was repeatedly postponed, and called off by the end of August.[125]
The following year, in July 2008, KKR announced a new plan to list its shares. The plan called for KKR to complete a reverse takeover of its listed affiliate KKR Private Equity Investors in exchange for a 21% interest in the firm.[126] In November 2008, KKR announced a delay of this transaction until 2009. Shares of KPE had declined significantly in the second half of 2008 with the onset of the credit crunch. KKR has announced that it expects to close the transaction in 2009.[127] In October 2009, KKR listed shares in KKR & Co. on the Euronext exchange, replacing KPE and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange in 2010. The public entity represents a 30% interest in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts. In October 2010, KKR acquired about nine members of Goldman Sachs Group proprietary trading team after entertaining offers from investment firms such as Perella Weinberg and Blackrock. With Goldman shutting down its proprietary trading operations, its executives, led by Bob Howard, will help KKR expand beyond leveraged buyouts into areas such as hedge funds.
2010 to present day[edit]
In January 2014, KKR acquired Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc for $2.4 billion from two private equity companies - Stone Point, and Hellman & Friedman.[128]
In June 2014, KKR announced it was taking a one-third stake in a Spanish energy business of Acciona Energy, at a cost of €417 million ($567 million). The international renewable energy generation business operates renewable assets, largely wind farms, across 14 countries including the United States, Italy and South Africa.[129]
In August 2014, KKR announced it was investing $400 million to acquire Fujian Sunner Development, China's largest chicken farmer, which breeds, processes and supplies frozen and fresh chickens to consumers and corporate clients, such as KFC and McDonald's, across China.[130]
In September 2014, the firm invested $90 million in a lighting and electrics firm Savant Systems.[131]
In January 2015, KKR confirmed its purchase of British rail ticket website thetrainline.com, previously owned by Exponent. The purchase sum is unknown.[132]
On October 12, 2015, KKR announced that it has entered into definitive agreement with Allianz Capital Partners to acquire their majority stake in Selecta Group, a European vending services operator.[133]
On September 1, 2016, KKR announced that it had acquired Epicor Software Corporation, an American software company.[134]
In October 2016, it was reported that KKR invested $250 million in OVH to be used for further international expansion.[135] This funding round valued OVH at over $1 billion, making it a unicorn.
In December 2016, the Lonza Group announced it would acquire Capsugel for $5.5 billion from Kohlberg Kravis Roberts.[136]
In February 2017 KKR were reported to be trying to take over the international market research company ARI GfK SE.[137] In July of the same year KKR acquired WebMD Health Corp for $2.8 billion.[138]
Notable current and former employees[edit]
Over the years, KKR has seen the departure of many of its original partners, the most notable being original co-founder Jerome Kohlberg. After a leave of absence due to an illness in 1985, Kohlberg returned to find increasing differences in strategy with his partners Kravis and Roberts.[139] In 1987, Kohlberg left KKR to found a new private equity firm Kohlberg & Company. Kohlberg & Company returned to the investment style that Kohlberg had originally practiced at Bear Stearns and in KKR's earlier years, acquiring smaller, middle-market companies.[4][140][141]
Since 1996, general partners of KKR have included Henry Kravis, George R. Roberts, Paul Raether, Robert MacDonnell, Jose Gandarillas, Michael Michelson, Saul Fox, James Greene, Michael Tokarz, Clifton Robbins, Scott Stuart, Perry Golkin and Edward Gilhuly.[142] Among those who left were Saul Fox, Ted Ammon, Ned Gilhuly, Mike Tokarz and Scott Stuart who had been instrumental in establishing KKR's reputation and track record in the 1980s.[143] KKR remains tightly controlled by Kravis and Roberts. The issue of succession has remained an important consideration for KKR's future as an ongoing institutionalized firm.

Scott C. Nuttall (born 1972), heads KKR's fastest-growing department, the Global Capital and Asset Management Group, which includes Asset Management, Capital Markets and Client and Partner Group. He joined KKR in November 1996 after leaving the Blackstone Group. His group, the firm's fastest-growing division, has $25 billion under management. With the support of co-founder George Roberts, Nuttall has largely spearheaded the campaign to expand KKR beyond its institutional investors (legacy and otherwise) into credit investment, and alternative investments, pointing out that there are billions "in revenues up for grabs".[144][145][146] He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Joseph Bae on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. He will concentrate on KKR's corporate and real estate credit, capital markets, hedge fund and capital raising businesses together with the firm's corporate development, balance sheet and strategic growth initiatives.[147] New York Times called him and Joseph Bae as potential successors.[148] He graduated from University of Pennsylvania with a Bachelor of Science degree.
Joseph Bae (born circa 1972) joined KKR from Goldman Sachs in 1996. Most recently, he was the Managing Partner of KKR Asia and the Global Head of KKR's Infrastructure and Energy Real Asset businesses. Mr. Bae has been the architect of KKR's Asian expansion since 2005. He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Scott Nuttall on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. Mr. Bae will focus on KKR's global private equity businesses as well as the Firm's real asset platforms across energy, infrastructure and real estate private equity.[147] He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree from Harvard College.
Saul A. Fox left KKR in 1997 to found Fox Paine & Company, a middle market private equity firm with over $1.5 billion of capital under management[149][150]
Clifton S. Robbins left KKR to join competitor General Atlantic Partners in 2000 and later founded Blue Harbour Group,[151] a private investment firm based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[152]
Edward A. Gilhuly and Scott Stuart left KKR in 2004 to launch Sageview Capital. Prior to this, Gilhuly was the managing partner of KKR's European operations, based in London; Stuart managed KKR's energy and consumer products industry groups.[152]
Ted Ammon, started several new ventures including Big Flower Press, which printed newspaper circulars, and Chancery Lane Capital, a boutique private equity firm, before being murdered in his Long Island home October 2001. The lover of his estranged, now deceased wife, Generosa, was later convicted.[152][153][154][155]
Paul Hazen, served as chairman and CEO of Wells Fargo (1995–2001).[156] Hazen later returned to KKR to serve as chairman of Accel-KKR, a joint venture with Accel Partners and later as chairman of KKR's publicly listed affiliate, KFN.
Clive Hollick, Baron Hollick, CEO of United News and Media (1996–2005)
Ken Mehlman joined KKR in 2008 as Global Head of Public Affairs.[157]
David Petraeus, selected to serve as chairman of the newly formed KKR Global Institute (2013—present)[158]
Joseph Grundfest, Professor at Stanford Law School and youngest SEC Commissioner

Works about KKR[edit]


Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
Anders, George (1992). Merchants of Debt: KKR and the Mortgaging of American Business. New York: BasicBooks. ISBN 978-0-465-04522-8. 
Bartlett, Sarah (1991). The Money Machine: How KKR Manufactured Power & Profits. New York: Warner Books. ISBN 978-0-446-51608-2. 
Burrough, Bryan (1990). Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-016172-8. 


See also[edit]

Jerome Kohlberg
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts

Notes[edit]


^ a b c KKR locations (company Web site); retrieved March 8, 2010. Archived January 18, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ http://ir.kkr.com/common/download/download.cfm?companyid=KKR&fileid=930140&filekey=C070EEBD-B0D9-49A9-8346-B3E15E803AA6&filename=SEC-KKR-1404912-17-5.pdf
^ a b c d KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ a b c d e f g h i Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Company History. Funding Universe; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "What's An Aging 'Barbarian' To Do?" The New York Times, August 26, 2001.
^ What Does Henry Kravis Want?. The New York Times, September 6, 2008
^ KKR Investment History (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR to Relocate Corporate Headquarters to Manhattan’s Transformative New Neighborhood on the West Side | Business Wire". www.businesswire.com. Retrieved 2015-12-31. 
^ "KKR Files for NYSE Listing", March 17, 2010.
^ a b 2007 KKR Annual Review[dead link]; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Canada Pension Plan Unit to Join K.K.R. Merchant Banking Venture", New York Times (Dealbook Section), January 17, 2013.
^ a b "Several Giant Pension Funds Investing in Offer for Nabisco". The New York Times, October 31, 1988.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form 10-Q, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 31, 2014
^ a b "KKR Financial REIT IPO debuts: Kohlberg Kravis Roberts manages trust", Marketwatch.com, June 24, 2005.
^ KKR arm in talks after fresh repayment delays. Reuters, February 20, 2008.
^ "Kohlberg Affiliate Sells Stake in Unit", Reuters, April 1, 2008.
^ "Opening Private Equity's Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors". The New York Times, May 4, 2006.
^ Timmons, Heather. "Private Equity Goes Public for $5 Billion. Its Investors Ask, ‘What's Next?’". The New York Times, November 10, 2006
^ Anderson, Jenny. "Where Private Equity Goes, Hedge Funds May Follow", New York Times, June 23, 2006.
^ KKR Private Equity Investors Reports Results for Quarter Ended March 31, 2008 Archived March 20, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.. KKR Private Equity Investors Press Release, May 7, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ see pdf-document, retrieved in January 2015
^ statement on KKR-leaflet, retrieved in January 2015
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row, 1990; pp. 133-136.
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate (New York: Harper & Row, 1990), pp. 136-140.
^ Holland, Max (1989), When the Machine Stopped: A Cautionary Tale from Industrial America, Boston: Harvard Business School Press, ISBN 978-0-87584-208-0, OCLC 246343673. , pp. 149–169.
^ Malone & Hyde Accepts Bid The New York Times, June 12, 1984.
^ Wayne, Leslie. "Wometco Agrees To Buyout", The New York Times. September 22, 1983.
^ Dodson, Steve. "Beatrice Deal Is Biggest Buyout Yet". The New York Times, November 17, 1985.
^ Sterngold, James. "Drexel's Role in Beatrice Deal Examined". The New York Times, April 28, 1988.
^ Fisher, Lawrence M. Safeway Buyout: A Success Story. The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ Feder, Barnaby. "Asbestos: The Saga Drags On". The New York Times, April 2, 1989.
^ "Chapter 11 For Kohlberg, Kravis Unit". The New York Times, December 28, 1989.
^ "The Granddaddy Of All Takeovers", The New York Times Book Review, January 21, 1990.
^ "Nabisco Executives Offer $17 Billion for Company". The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ "Shearson Risks, Rewards on RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 22, 1988.
^ "Nabisco Bid Seen by Kohlberg". The New York Times, October 24, 1988.
^ "Buyout Specialist Bids $20.3 Billion For RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 25, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bid Gives New Respectability To Giant Deals Financed With Huge Debt". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "Concern Over Kohlberg, Kravis Strategy". The New York Times, November 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bidders Said to Talk". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "The Nabisco Battle's Key Moment". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ Joint Deal For Nabisco Is Rejected. The New York Times, October 27, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Will Give Kohlberg, Kravis Data. The New York Times, October 27, 1988
^ Forstmann Declines to Bid on RJR Nabisco. The New York Times, November 17, 1988.
^ "Suitors Quarrel Over RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, November 8, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Discloses Guidelines for Its Buyout. The New York Times, November 9, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Suitor Claims $24.88 Billion Victory". The New York Times, December 1, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Explains Its Choice". The New York Times, December 8, 1988
^ "Nabisco Executives to Take Huge Gains in Their Buyout". The New York Times, November 5, 1988.
^ "A Growing Backlash Against Greed". The New York Times, November 13, 1988
^ "Game of Greed", Time Magazine (1988)
^ "Losers Get Some Spoils In Fight for RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, December 2, 1988
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Collect $75 Million RJR Nabisco Fee". The New York Times, February 1, 1989.
^ "RJR Nabisco, An Epilogue". The New York Times, March 12, 1999.
^ "2 Buyout Firms Build New Funds". The New York Times, November 23, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Now RJR's Owner". Associated Press, April 29, 1989.
^ "History Of The RJR Nabisco Takeover". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "Is RJR Worth $25 Billion?" The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Completes Sale of Del Monte". The New York Times, January 11, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts Loan to RJR Renegotiated". The New York Times, June 27, 1990.
^ "RJR Move Helps Lift 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, July 17, 1990.
^ "RJR Offers Cash and Stock for 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, December 18, 1990.
^ Agrees to a Takeover. The New York Times, September 13, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg's Impetus in Borden Deal". The New York Times, September 14, 1994.
^ "Borden Signs Agreement for Sale to Kohlberg". The New York Times, September 24, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Says It Has Control of Borden". The New York Times, December 22, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans to Divest Remaining Stake in RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, March 16, 1995.
^ "Apollo Buys Borden Chemical for $649 million". The New York Times, July 7, 2004.
^ "Kohlberg Ends Bid for Macmillan". The New York Times, November 4, 1988.
^ K-III's New Name To Be 'Primedia'. The New York Times, November 1, 1997.
^ "Macmillan Book Club Unit And a Publisher Being Sold". The New York Times, May 23, 1989.
^ a b "As Primedia Falls, Preferred Stock Lives Up to Its Name". The New York Times, October 26, 2005.
^ Kravis Rouses Itself, The New York Times, April 29, 1991
^ "K-III Communications Files Plan For an Initial Offering of Stock". The New York Times, September 6, 1995.
^ Regulators Pick Buyer To Operate New England Bank. The New York Times, April 23, 1991.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis in Swap for 7.5% of Fleet". The New York Times, January 3, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis in Aetna Reinsurance Deal". The New York Times, June 9, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans Stake in TW". The New York Times, June 26, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg Unit to Buy Alden Press". The New York Times, January 19, 1993.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Acquire Bruno's Supermarket Chain". The New York Times, April 21, 1995.
^ "$5 Billion Fund By Kohlberg Seen". The New York Times, September 13, 1996.
^ "At K.K.R., the Glory Days Are Past". The New York Times, August 10, 1995.
^ "Kohlberg Plans Stake In Spalding And Evenflo". The New York Times, August 16, 1996.
^ "Newsquest Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Will Buy Kindercare for $467 Million". The New York Times, October 4, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Set to Offer $1.2 Billion for Cable Maker". The New York Times, January 24, 1997.
^ Roundup, An Interactive Edition News (1997-06-28). "KKR Completes Purchase Of Randalls for $225 Million". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2016-12-19. 
^ "Supermarkets Get a Brand New Bag". The New York Times, August 31, 1997.
^ "The Boyds Collection, Ltd. Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis And Welsh Carson Acquiring Medcath". The New York Times, March 14, 1998.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis-Led Group To Buy Big Insurance Broker". The New York Times, July 23, 1998.
^ "Wincor Nixdorf Holding Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ 2 Buyout Firms Make Deal To Acquire Regal Cinemas. The New York Times, January 21, 1998
^ Kohlberg Kravis In $660 Million Deal For Act III Cinemas. The New York Times, October 21, 1997.
^ "Amid Blame, United Artists Sale Collapses". The New York Times, February 23, 1998.
^ "Regal Cinemas Considers Filing For Bankruptcy". The New York Times, November 16, 2000.
^ a b Shoppers Drug Mart Sells Shares. Retail Merchandiser, March 17, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "BCE Sells Directory Unit". The New York Times, November 30, 2002.
^ "Yellow Pages Income Fund Announces, 43 Million Offering"[permanent dead link]. Yellow Pages Group press release, May 26, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Rozhon, Tracie. "Three Firms Are Said to Buy Toys 'R' Us for $6 Billion". New York Times, March 17, 2005.
^ What's Next for Toys 'R' Us?. The Wall Street Journal, March 18, 2005.
^ "Deal Mania: Shades of the '80s: The leveraged buyout is back in vogue" Archived 2008-11-01 at the Wayback Machine.. US News & World Report, April 10, 2005.
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal". The New York Times, March 29, 2005.
^ "Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?" The New York Times, April 3, 2005.
^ K.K.R., Texas Pacific Plan Record Buyout of TXU. The New York Times, February 23, 2007.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross. "HCA Buyout Highlights Era of Going Private". The New York Times, July 25, 2006.
^ Bloomberg News (August 4, 2006). "Technology; Royal Philips Sells Unit for $4.4 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ "Takeover firms will pay $15.3b to buy Danish phone giant TDC." Bloomberg, December 1, 2005
^ "TDC-One year on." Dow Jones Private Equity News, January 22, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Peters, Jeremy W. (March 13, 2007). "Buyout Firm Is Acquiring Dollar General Retail Chain". The New York Times. Retrieved January 4, 2009. 
^ Werdigier, Julia. "Equity Firm Wins Bidding for a Retailer, Alliance Boots". The New York Times, April 25, 2007.
^ "Terra Firma drops Boots bid plan". BBC. April 24, 2007. 
^ De la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer". New York Times, June 8, 2007
^ "KKR Offer of $26 Billion Is Accepted by First Data". Reuters, April 3, 2007
^ "Kohlberg Kravis to Buy First Data for $29 Billion". The New York Times, April 3, 2007.
^ Source: Thomson Financial
^ Lonkevich, Dan and Klump, Edward. KKR, Texas Pacific Will Acquire TXU for $45 Billion Bloomberg.com, February 26, 2007.
^ Skariachan, Dhanya (February 26, 2007). "KKR, Texas Pacific-led group to buy TXU Corp". Reuters. 
^ "Seven in $4bn asset sell-off" Archived 2007-11-14 at the Wayback Machine.. News.com.au, November 20, 2006
^ "Sun Microsystems Welcomes Endorsement and Investment From KKR". Sun Microsystems Press Release, January 23, 2007 Archived September 29, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Legg Mason Makes Deal With Equity Firm". Reuters, January 15, 2008
^ Harman International Industries to be Acquired by KKR and GS Capital Partners. Harman International press release, April 26, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived July 4, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Wary Buyers May Scuttle Two Deals". The New York Times, September 22, 2007.
^ Jenny Anderson and Michael J. de la Merced. "Kohlberg Kravis Plans to Go Public", The New York Times, July 4, 2007.
^ "KKR postpones $1.25 bn float as credit chaos deters buyers". The Times (UK), August 23, 2007.
^ After Delay, KKR Finds a Way to Go Public. The New York Times, July 28, 2008.
^ K.K.R. Calls Listing Delay ‘Process Related’. The New York Times, November 3, 2008.
^ Neha Dimri; Aman Shah (28 January 2014). "KKR to take control of Sedgwick Claims Management in $2.4 billion deal". Reuters. 
^ "Equity investor KKR picks stakes in Acciona Energia unit for 417mn euros". Spain News.Net. Retrieved 24 June 2014. 
^ "KKR to acquire China chicken developer for $400 mn". Business Sun. 26 August 2014. Retrieved 27 August 2014. 
^ KKR invests in smart home tech company Savant Systems. Reuters, 4 September 2014
^ "Deals of the day - Mergers and acquisitions". Reuters. Retrieved 2015-01-22. 
^ "KKR | KKR agrees to acquire majority stake in Selecta from ACP". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2015-10-12. 
^ "Epicor Announces Close of KKR Acquisition and Executive Leadership Appointments to Accelerate Growth Strategy". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2016-09-01. 
^ "Klaba Family OVH, Europe No. 1 Web Host, Raises €250M from $KKR, TowerBrook". exithub. Retrieved 14 January 2017. 
^ "Lonza Buys Capsugel for $5.5B Cash - GEN Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News - Biotech from Bench to Business - GEN". GEN. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ Germany, wysiwyg* Software Design GmbH, Düsseldorf,. "Acceleratio Capital N.V.". www.acceleratio-angebot.de. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/us-webmd-m-a-kkr-idUKKBN1A915Y
^ "Buyout Pioneer Quitting Fray". The New York Times, June 19, 1987.
^ Kohlberg In Dispute Over Firm. The New York Times, August 30, 1989.
^ "Kohlberg Suit Settlement". The New York Times, February 23, 1990.
^ Duracell International Inc. SEC Form SC 13G/A ("Statement of acquisition of beneficial ownership"); filed February 6, 1996.
^ Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
^ Scott Nuttall profile at Forbes
^ "A kinder, gentler KKR wants a piece of your 401K", Forbes, January 23, 2013.
^ Profile of Scott Nuttall at investing.businessweek.com, Businessweek.com, January 23, 2013.
^ a b "KKR Appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers". KKR Press Release. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Next Generation at K.K.R. Set as It Names Two Co-Presidents". New York Times. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ ""For Saul Fox, Bigger Isn’t Always Better in the World of Buyouts". foxpaine.com, May 15, 2000. Retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Anders, George. "Bitter End of a Partnership", Wall Street Journal, September 15, 2007.
^ Blue Harbour Group> About Blue Harbour Archived 2008-03-13 at the Wayback Machine. (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ a b c Barbarians at the Gate: Contrasting fortunes for those closest to the deal. eFinancial News, November 3, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Pelosi Found Guilty of Murder". CBS News. December 13, 2004. Retrieved May 17, 2007. 
^ "Murder in East Hampton", Vanity Fair, January 2002.
^ "Mystery of the Murdered Millionaire". Dateline NBC; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Paul M. Hazen profile as Wells Fargo & Co. Chairman and CEO Archived 2005-09-14 at the Wayback Machine.; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Mehlman profile at KKR website Archived 2013-07-30 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR names former CIA head Petraeus as chairman of new institute". 30 May 2013. Retrieved 5 June 2017 – via Reuters. 


References[edit]


FT.com / Industries / Basic industries – "KKR set to buy Masonite for C$3.1bn"
Gross, Daniel & David Sterling. "Has Henry Kravis gone soft?". Slate, August 5, 2007; retrieved August 7, 2007.
The KKR Way. Bloomberg Markets, August 2007
"The barbarians at the gate have been losing their Midas touch". timesonline.co.uk, August 6, 2005; retrieved February 16, 2009.


External links[edit]

Yahoo! – Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. company profile







v
t
e


Kohlberg Kravis Roberts



Founders



Jerome Kohlberg Jr.
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts





Selected current investments



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Aricent Group
Bharti Enterprises
Capsugel
CICC
Café Coffee Day
Colonial Pipeline
Del Monte Foods
Dollar General
Eastman Kodak
El Paso Corp.
Energy Future Holdings
First Data
Hospital Corporation of America
KION Group
Laureate Education
Legg Mason
Legrand
Magma Fincorp
Maxeda
Nielsen Holdings
Northgate Information Solutions
NXP Semiconductors
Oriental Brewery
Pets at Home
ProSiebenSat.1 Media
Sealy Corporation
Seven West Media
TDC A/S
Toys "R" Us
US Foods
Visma
Wild
Yageo
Zhone Technologies








 Category












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kohlberg_Kravis_Roberts&oldid=792147823"					
Categories: Kohlberg Kravis RobertsCompanies based in New York CityCompanies established in 1976Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeKohlberg Kravis Roberts companiesMezzanine capital investment firmsPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from January 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with a promotional tone from June 2017All articles with a promotional toneArticles needing cleanup from June 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from June 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from June 2017Wikipedia articles needing style editing from June 2017All articles needing style editingArticles with peacock terms from June 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles that may be too long from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from September 2013Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


CatalàDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 19:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Kohlberg Kravis Roberts - Wikipedia





















 







Kohlberg Kravis Roberts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from KKR)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"KKR" redirects here. For other uses, see KKR (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Too much unnecessary detail and puffery Please help improve this article if you can. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may have too many section headers dividing up its content. Please help improve the article by merging similar sections and removing unneeded subheaders. (June 2017)







This article may contain an excessive amount of intricate detail that may only interest a specific audience. Please help by spinning off or relocating any relevant information, and removing excessive detail that may be against Wikipedia's inclusion policy. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may be too long to read and navigate comfortably. Please consider splitting content into sub-articles, condensing it, or adding or removing subheadings. (June 2017)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



KKR & Co. L.P.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: KKR


Industry
Financial services:
private equity
(1976–present)
investment banking
(2004–present)


Founded
1976; 41 years ago (1976)


Founder
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts
Jerome Kohlberg, Jr.


Headquarters
9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York City, New York 10019
United States



Number of locations

13 offices in 9 countries[1]



Key people

Henry R. Kravis
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)
George R. Roberts
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)


Products
Management buyouts
Leveraged finance
Venture capital
Growth capital


Revenue
US$ 8.896 billion (2013)



Net income

US$ 691.2 million (2013)


AUM
US$ 98.0 billion (2012)


Total assets
US$ 39 billion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

1700 (2017)


Website
www.kkr.com


KKR & Co. L.P. (formerly known as Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.) is an American multinational private equity firm, specializing in leveraged buyouts, headquartered in New York City. The firm sponsors and manages private equity investment funds. The firm has completed over $400 billion of private equity transactions since its inception.[3][4]
The firm was founded in 1976 by Jerome Kohlberg, Jr., and cousins Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts, all of whom had previously worked together at Bear Stearns, where they completed some of the earliest leveraged buyout transactions. Since its founding, KKR has completed a number of transactions including the 1989 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco, which was the largest buyout in history to that point, as well as the 2007 buyout of TXU, which is currently the largest buyout completed to date.[5][6] KKR has completed investments in over 160 companies since 1977, completing at least one investment in every year except in 1982 and in 1990.[7]
KKR has 13 additional offices in the United States, Europe and Asia.[1] The firm is currently located in the Solow Building (9 W. 57th Street), but recently announced its intentions to occupy a newly constructed 30 Hudson Yards.[8]
In October 2009, KKR listed shares in the company through KKR & Co., an affiliate that holds 30% of the firm's ownership equity, with the remainder held by the firm's partners. In March 2010, KKR filed to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE),[9] with trading commencing four months later, on July 15, 2010.



Contents


1 The Firm KKR
2 Investment funds and other affiliates

2.1 Private equity funds
2.2 KKR Financial
2.3 KKR Private Equity Investors


3 History

3.1 Founding and early history
3.2 Buyout of RJR Nabisco
3.3 Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco
3.4 Early 1990s: Investments
3.5 1996–1999
3.6 2000–2005
3.7 Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom
3.8 Initial public offering
3.9 2010 to present day


4 Notable current and former employees
5 Works about KKR
6 See also
7 Notes
8 References
9 External links



The Firm KKR[edit]
KKR is operated by its managing partners Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts and a team of approximately 140 investment professionals and 400 total employees, organized into industry-focused groups.[3] KKR is headquartered in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street, Manhattan, New York, with U.S. offices in Menlo Park, San Francisco, Houston, and Washington, D.C., and offices in London, Paris, Hong Kong, Tokyo, Beijing, Mumbai, Dubai, Seoul, São Paulo and Sydney.[1]
KKR invests primarily through leveraged buyouts as well as growth capital investments (including "PIPE" investments in public companies). It has traditionally specialized in private equity investments, focusing on specific industry sectors where the firm has created nine dedicated investment groups. The industries in which KKR has developed a specialization include:[10]

Chemicals
Consumer products
Energy & natural resources
Financial services
Health care
Industrial
Media and communications
Retail
Technology

The professionals in each of KKR's industry-focused groups are expected to have developed a proficiency in their respective industries.[10] The firm has traditionally had strong ties with its investors.[11]
Investment funds and other affiliates[edit]
Private equity funds[edit]
KKR has historically relied primarily on private equity funds, pools of committed capital that are raised from a broad array of institutional investors (e.g., pension funds, insurance companies, investment banks, commercial banks, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds).[3][12] As of March 31, 2014, KKR had completed fund-raising for approximately 23 traditional investment funds in the US, Europe and Asia with total committed capital of approximately US$80 billion:


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($m)


KKR Fund 1976
1977
$31


KKR Fund 1980
1980
$357


KKR Fund 1982
1982
$328


KKR Fund 1984
1984
$1,000


KKR Fund 1986
1986
$672


KKR Fund 1987
1987
$6,130


KKR Fund 1993
1993
$1,946


KKR Fund 1996
1996
$6,012


KKR European Fund
1999
$3,085


KKR Millennium Fund
2002
$6,000


KKR European Fund II
2005
$5,751


KKR Fund 2006
2006
$17,642


KKR Asian Fund
2007
$4,000


KKR European Fund III
2008
$6,238


KKR E2 Investors (Annex Fund)
2009
$209


KKR China Growth Fund
2010
$1,010


KKR Natural Resources Fund
2010
$876


KKR Infrastructure Fund
2011
$1,043


KKR North America Fund XI
2012
$8,718


KKR Asian Fund II
2013
$5,825


KKR Real Estate Partners Americas
2013
$1,226


KKR Energy Income and Growth Fund
2013
$1,974


Source: SEC Filings[13]
KKR Financial[edit]






Type

Public company (NYSE: KFN)


Founded
2004


Website
www.kkrfinancial.com


KKR Financial (NYSE: KFN) is a real estate investment trust (REIT) and specialty finance company that invests in residential and commercial mortgage loans and mortgage-backed securities as well as corporate loans and debt securities, asset-backed securities and equity securities. KFN was founded in 2004 raising $795 million in a private placement and raised $849 million in a June 2005 initial public offering, increasing the size of the offering from an original $600 million target.[14] KKR had initially considered structuring KFN as a business development company like Apollo Management's Apollo Investment Corporation but chose to pursue the REIT structure to capitalize on the strength in REIT valuations at the time.[14]
KFN was an early casualty of the subprime mortgage crisis and in September 2007, Henry Kravis and George Roberts injected $270 million into the company. On February 20, 2008, KFN was once again forced to delay the repayment of billions of dollars of commercial paper, and began a new round of talks with creditors.[15] In April, KFN sold a controlling interest in a real estate subsidiary to an investment firm to raise cash and entered an agreement with the noteholders of certain secured commercial paper issued by two asset-backed entities. Following the transaction, KFN converted from a REIT to a LLC.[16]
KKR Private Equity Investors[edit]






Type

Public company (Euronext: KPE)


Founded
2006


Website
www.kkrpei.com


KKR Private Equity Investors (Euronext: KPE) is a publicly traded private equity fund that invests as a fund of funds in KKR private equity funds. KPE also co-invests in transactions alongside KKR's private equity funds. KPE was founded in 2006. In May 2006, KKR raised $5 billion in an initial public offering for a KPE to serve as a new permanent investment vehicle listing it on the Euronext exchange in Amsterdam. KKR raised three times more than it expected, as many of the investors in KPE were hedge funds seeking exposure to private equity but could not make long term commitments to private equity funds. As private equity had been booming in preceding years, investing in a KKR fund was attractive to investors.[17]
However, KPE's first-day performance was lackluster, trading down 1.7% and trading volume was limited.[18] Initially, a handful of other private equity firms and hedge funds had planned to follow KKR's lead but shelved those plans when KPE's performance continued to falter after its IPO. KPE's stock declined from an IPO price of €25 per share to €18.16 (a 27% decline) at the end of 2007 and a low of €11.45 (a 54.2% decline) per share in Q1 2008.[19]
KPE disclosed in May 2008 that it had completed approximately $300 million of secondary sales of selected limited partnership interests in, and undrawn commitments to, certain KKR-managed funds in order to generate liquidity and repay borrowings.[20]
In October 2009 KPE changed its name to KKR & Co. (Guernsey) L.P.,[21] which was delisted from Euronext Amsterdam in July 2010 while common units of KKR & Co. L.P. began trading on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “KKR”.[22]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
Running the corporate finance department for Bear Stearns in the 1960s and 1970s, Jerome Kohlberg and later with protégés Henry Kravis and George Roberts completed a series of what they described as "bootstrap" investments beginning in 1964–65. They targeted family-owned businesses, many of which had been founded in the years following World War II which by the 1960s and 1970s were facing succession issues. Many of these companies lacked a viable or attractive exit for their founders as they were too small to be taken public and the founders were reluctant to sell out to competitors and so a sale to a financial buyer could prove attractive.[4]




Henry Kravis speaking at the World Economic Forum in 2009


Their acquisition of Orkin Exterminating Company in 1964 is among the first significant leveraged buyout transactions. In the following years the three Bear Stearns bankers would complete a series of buyouts including Stern Metals (1965), Incom (a division of Rockwood International, 1971), Cobblers Industries (1971), and Boren Clay (1973), as well as Thompson Wire, Eagle Motors and Barrows through their investment in Stern Metals. Despite a number of highly successful investments, the $27 million investment in Cobblers ended in bankruptcy.[23]
By 1976, tensions [clarification needed] had built up between Bear Stearns and Kohlberg, Kravis and Roberts, which led to the formation of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in that year. Most notably, Bear Stearns executive Cy Lewis had rejected repeated proposals to form a dedicated investment fund within Bear Stearns and Lewis took exception to the amount of time spent on outside activities. In 1976, Kravis had been required to serve as interim CEO of a failing direct mail company named Advo.[citation needed]
The new KKR completed its first buyout, that of manufacturer A.J. Industries, in 1977. KKR raised capital from a small group of investors including the Hillman Company and First Chicago Bank. By 1978, with the revision of the ERISA regulations, the nascent KKR was successful in raising its first institutional fund with over $30 million of investor commitments.[24] In 1981, KKR expanded its investor base significantly when the Oregon State Treasury's public pension fund invested in KKR's acquisition of retailer Fred Meyer, Inc. Oregon State remains an active investor in KKR funds.[4]
KKR closed out the 1970s completing the public-to-private buyout of Houdaille Industries in 1979,[25] probably the largest take-private of a public company to that point. As the 1980s began, KKR was among the most prominent practitioner of leveraged buyouts and would prove the most prolific of the private equity investors in the 1980s.[4] Among the firm's most notable acquisitions during the 1980s buyout boom were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


Malone & Hyde
1984
KKR completed the first buyout of a public company by tender offer, by acquiring the food distributor and supermarket operator together with the company's chairman Joseph R. Hyde III.
[26]


Wometco Enterprises
1984
KKR completed the first billion-dollar buyout transaction to acquire the leisure-time company with interests in television, movie theaters and tourist attractions. The buyout comprised the acquisition of 100% of the outstanding shares for $842 million and the assumption of $170 million of the company's outstanding debt.
[27]


Beatrice Companies
1985
KKR sponsored the $6.1 billion management buyout of Beatrice, which owned Samsonite and Tropicana among other consumer brands. At the time of its closing in 1985, Beatrice was the largest buyout completed.
[28][29]


Safeway
1986
KKR completed a friendly $5.5 billion buyout of Safeway to help management avoid hostile overtures from Herbert and Robert Haft of Dart Drug. Safeway was taken public again in 1990.
[30]


Jim Walter Corp.
(later Walter Industries)
1987
KKR acquired the company for $3.3 billion in early 1988 but faced issues with the buyout almost immediately. Most notably, a subsidiary of Jim Walter Corp (Celotex) faced a large asbestos lawsuit and incurred liabilities that the courts ruled would need to be satisfied by the parent company. In 1989, the holding company which KKR used for the Jim Walter buyout filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
[31][32]


Buyout of RJR Nabisco[edit]
Main article: RJR Nabisco
After the 1987 resignation of Jerome Kohlberg at age 61 (he later founded his own private equity firm, Kohlberg & Co.), Henry Kravis succeeded him as senior partner. Under Kravis and Roberts, the firm was responsible for the 1988 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco. RJR Nabisco proved to be not only the largest buyout in history to that time, at $25 billion ($31.1 billion, including assumed debt) as well as a high-water mark and sign of the end of the 1980s buyout boom. RJR—Nabisco, which would remain the largest buyout for the next 17 years, was chronicled in Barbarians at the Gate: The Fall of RJR Nabisco, and later made into a television movie starring James Garner.[33]
In 1988, F. Ross Johnson was the President and CEO of RJR Nabisco, formed in 1985 by the merger of Nabisco Brands and R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company, a leading producer of food products (Shredded Wheat, Oreo cookies, Ritz crackers, Planters peanuts, Life Savers, Del Monte Fruit and Vegetables, and Snickers Chocolate) as well as Winston, Camel and Salem cigarettes. In October 1988, Johnson proposed a $17 billion ($75 per share) management buyout of the company with the financial backing of investment bank Shearson Lehman Hutton and its parent company, American Express.[34][35]
Several days later, Kravis, who had originally suggested the idea of the buyout to Johnson, presented a new bid for $20.3 billion ($90 per share) financed with an aggressive debt package.[36][37][38] KKR had the support of significant equity co-investments from leading pension funds and other institutional investors. Investors included Coca-Cola, Georgia-Pacific and United Technologies corporate pension funds, as well as endowments from MIT, Harvard and the New York State Common Retirement Fund[12] However, KKR faced criticism from existing investors over the firm's use of hostile tactics in the buyout of RJR.[39]
KKR proposed to provide a joint offer with Johnson and Shearson Lehman but was rebuffed and Johnson attempted to stonewall KKR's access to financial information from RJR.[40][41][42][43] Rival private equity firm, Forstmann Little & Co. was invited into the process by Shearson Lehman but attempted to provide a bid for RJR with a consortium of Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Procter & Gamble, Ralston Purina and Castle & Cooke.[44]
Ultimately the Forstmann consortium came apart and did not provide a final bid for RJR.[45] Many of the major banking players of the day, including Shearson Lehman Hutton, Drexel Burnham Lambert, Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Salomon Brothers and Merrill Lynch were actively involved in advising and financing the parties.




Oreo cookies, one of RJR Nabisco's products


In November 1988, RJR set guidelines for a final bid submission at the end of the month.[46] The management and Shearson group submitted a final bid of $112, a figure they felt certain would enable them to outflank any response by Kravis and KKR. KKR's final bid of $109, while a lower dollar figure, was ultimately accepted by the board of directors of RJR Nabisco.[47] KKR's offer was guaranteed, whereas the management offer lacked a "reset", meaning that the final share price might have been lower than their stated $112 per share.[48]
Additionally, many in RJR's board of directors had grown concerned at recent disclosures of Ross Johnson' unprecedented golden parachute deal.[49][50] Time Magazine featured Ross Johnson on the cover of their December 1988 issue along with the headline, "A Game of Greed: This man could pocket $100 million from the largest corporate takeover in history. Has the buyout craze gone too far?".[51] KKR's offer was welcomed by the board, and, to some observers, it appeared that their elevation of the reset issue as a deal-breaker in KKR's favor was little more than an excuse to reject Ross Johnson's higher payout of $112 per share. Johnson received $53 million from the buyout.[52] KKR collected a $75 million fee in the RJR takeover.[53] At $31.1 billion of transaction value (including assumed debt), RJR Nabisco was by far the largest leveraged buyout in history.[54]
In 2006 and 2007, a number of leveraged buyout transactions were completed which, for the first time, surpassed the RJR Nabisco leveraged buyout in terms of nominal purchase price. The deal was first surpassed in July 2006 by the $33 billion buyout of U.S. hospital operator Hospital Corporation of America, in which KKR participated, though the RJR deal was larger, adjusted for inflation. However, adjusted for inflation, none of the leveraged buyouts of the 2006–07 period would surpass RJR Nabisco. The RJR transaction benefited many of the parties involved. Investment bankers and lawyers who advised KKR walked away with over $1 billion in fees. Kravis and Roberts attracted an unprecedented amount of publicity that turned the cousins into instant celebrities. Size did not, however, guarantee success as the high purchase price and debt load would burden the performance of the investment, which KKR overcame, raising a new investment fund and continuing to invest throughout the 1990s.[55]
Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco[edit]




KKR's headquarters in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street in New York City


The buyout of RJR Nabisco was completed in April 1989 and KKR would spend the early 1990s repaying the RJR's enormous debt load through a series of asset sales and restructuring transactions.[56][57][58] After the RJR Nabisco deal, KKR did not complete a single investment in 1990, the first such year since 1982. They would not complete another major leveraged buyout transaction for more than three years, largely because of the shutdown of the high yield bond market and the collapse of Drexel Burnham Lambert which filed for bankruptcy in February 1990. KKR began to focus primarily on its existing portfolio companies acquired during the buyout boom of the late 1980s. Six of KKR's portfolio companies completed IPOs in 1991, including RJR Nabisco and Duracell.[4]
As the new decade began, KKR began restructuring RJR. In January 1990, it completed the sale of RJR's Del Monte Foods to a group led by Merrill Lynch. KKR had originally identified a group of divisions that it could sell to reduce debt.[59] Over the coming years, RJR would pursue a number of additional restructurings, equity injections and public offerings of stock to provide the company with added financial flexibility. KKR contributed $1.7 billion of new equity into RJR in July 1990 to complete a restructuring of the company's balance sheet that appeased unhappy bondholders. KKR's equity contribution as part of the original leveraged buyout of RJR had been only $1.5 billion.[60][61] In mid-December 1990, RJR announced an exchange offer that would swap debt in RJR for a new public stock in the company, effectively an unusual means of taking RJR public again and simultaneously reducing debt on the company.[62]
RJR issued additional stock to the public in March 1991 to further reduce debt, resulting in an upgrade of the credit rating of RJR's debt from junk to investment grade. KKR began to reduce its ownership in RJR in 1994, when its stock in RJR was used as part of the consideration for its leveraged buyout of Borden, Inc., a producer of food and beverage products, consumer products, and industrial products, in an unprecedented and complex transaction.[63][64] [65][66] The following year, in 1995, KKR would divest itself of its final stake in RJR Nabisco when Borden sold a $638 million block of stock.[67]
While KKR no longer had any ownership of RJR Nabisco by 1995, its original investment would not be fully realized until KKR exited its last investment in 2004. After sixteen years of efforts, including contributing new equity, taking RJR public, asset sales and exchanging shares of RJR for the ownership of Borden, Inc., KKR finally sold the last remnants of its 1989 investment. In July 2004, KKR agreed to sell its stock in Borden Chemical to Apollo Management for $1.2 billion.[68]
Early 1990s: Investments[edit]
In the early 1990s, the absence of an active high yield market prompted KKR to change its tactics, avoiding large leveraged buyouts in favor of industry consolidations through what were described as leveraged buildups or rollups. One of KKR's largest investments in the 1990s was the leveraged buildup of Primedia in partnership with former executives of Macmillan Publishing, which KKR had failed to acquire in 1988.[69] KKR created Primedia's predecessor, K-III Communications,[70] a platform to buy media properties, initially completing the $310 million divisional buyout of the book club division of Macmillan along with the assets of Intertec Publishing Corporation in May 1989.[71][72]
During the early 1990s, K-III continued acquiring publishing assets, including a $650 million acquisition from News Corporation in 1991.[73] K-III went public, however instead of cashing out, KKR continued to make new investments in the company in 1998, 2000 and 2001 to support acquisition activity.[74] In 2005, Primedia redeemed KKR's preferred stock in the company but KKR was estimated to have lost hundreds of millions of dollars on its common stock holdings as the price of the company's stock collapsed.[72]
In 1991, KKR partnered with Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in the 1991 acquisition of the Bank of New England, from the US Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.[75] In January 1996, KKR would exchange its investment for a 7.5% interest in Fleet Bank.[76] KKR completed the 1992 buyout of American Re Corporation from Aetna[77] as well as a 47% interest in TW Corporation, later known as The Flagstar Companies and owner of Denny's in 1992.[78] Among the other notable investments KKR completed in the early 1990s included World Color Press (1993–95),[79] RELTEC Corporation (1995) and Bruno's (1995).[80]
1996–1999[edit]
By the mid-1990s, the debt markets were improving and KKR had moved on from the RJR Nabisco buyout. In 1996, KKR was able to complete the bulk of fundraising for what was then a record $6 billion private equity fund, the KKR 1996 Fund.[81] However, KKR was still burdened by the performance of the RJR investment and repeated obituaries in the media.[82] KKR was required by its investors to reduce the fees it charged and to calculate its carried interest based on the total profit of the fund (i.e., offsetting losses from failed deals against the profits from successful deals).[4]




KKR acquired Regal Cinemas in 1998, only to see the company in bankruptcy by 2000


KKR's activity level would accelerate over the second half of the 1990s making a series of notable investments including Spalding Holdings Corporation and Evenflo (1996),[83] Newsquest (1996),[84] KinderCare Learning Centers (1997),[85] Amphenol Corporation (1997),[86] Randalls Food Markets (1997),[87][88] The Boyds Collection (1998),[89] MedCath Corporation (1998),[90] Willis Group Holdings (1998),[91] Smiths Group (1999), and Wincor Nixdorf (1999).[92]
KKR's largest investment of the 1990s would be one of its least successful. In January 1998, KKR and Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst agreed to the $1.5 billion buyout of Regal Entertainment Group.[93] KKR and Hicks Muse had initially intended to combine Regal with Act III Cinemas, which KKR had acquired in 1997 for $706 million[94] and United Artists Theaters, which Hicks Muse had agreed to acquire for $840 million in November 1997. Shortly after agreeing to the Regal takeover, the deal with United Artists fell apart, destroying the strategy to eliminate costs by building a larger combined company.[95] Two years later, in 2000, Regal encountered significant financial issues and was forced to file for bankruptcy protection; the company passed to billionaire investor Philip Anschutz.[96]
2000–2005[edit]




Shoppers Drug Mart, the Canadian pharmacy was one of several successful buyouts in the early 2000s[97]


At the start of the 21st century, the landscape of large leveraged buyout firms was changing. Several large and storied firms, including Hicks Muse Tate & Furst and Forstmann Little & Company were dragged down by heavy losses in the bursting of the telecom bubble. Although, KKR's track record since RJR Nabisco was mixed, losses on such investments as Regal Entertainment Group, Spalding, Flagstar and Primedia (previously K-III Communications) were offset by successes in Willis Group, Wise Foods, Inc., Wincor Nixdorf and MTU Aero Engines, among others.[4]
Additionally, KKR was one of the few firms that was able to complete large leveraged buyout transactions in the years immediately following the collapse of the Internet bubble, including Shoppers Drug Mart and Bell Canada Yellow Pages.[4][98] KKR was able to realize its investment in Shoppers Drug Mart through a 2002 IPO and subsequent public stock offerings.[97] The directories business would be taken public in 2004 as Yellow Pages Income Fund, a Canadian income trust.[99]




KKR led a consortium in the buyout of Toys "R" Us in 2004


In 2004 a consortium comprising KKR, Bain Capital and real estate development company Vornado Realty Trust announced the $6.6 billion acquisition of Toys "R" Us, the toy retailer. A month earlier, Cerberus Capital Management, made a $5.5 billion offer for both the toy and baby supplies businesses.[100] The Toys 'R' Us buyout was one of the largest in several years.[101] Following this transaction, by the end of 2004 and in 2005, major buyouts were once again becoming common and market observers were stunned by the leverage levels and financing terms obtained by financial sponsors in their buyouts.[102]
In 2005, KKR was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. KKR's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Blackstone Group, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1988. SunGard was the largest buyout of a technology company until the Blackstone-led buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction was notable given the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point. The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[103][104]
Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom[edit]
In 2006, KKR raised a new $17.6 billion fund the KKR 2006 Fund, with which the firm began executing a series of some of the largest buyouts in history. KKR's $44 billion takeover of Texas-based power utility, TXU, in 2007, proved to be the largest leveraged buyout of the mid-2000s buyout boom and the largest buyout completed to date.[105] Among the most notable companies acquired by KKR in 2006 and 2007 were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


HCA
2006
KKR and Bain Capital, together with Merrill Lynch and the Frist family (which had founded the company) completed a $31.6 billion acquisition of the hospital company, 17 years after it was taken private for the first time in a management buyout. At the time of its announcement, the HCA buyout would be the first of several to set new records for the largest buyout, eclipsing the 1989 buyout of RJR Nabisco. It would later be surpassed by the buyouts of Equity Office Properties, and TXU.
[106]


NXP Semiconductors
2006
In August 2006, a consortium of KKR, Silver Lake Partners and AlpInvest Partners acquired a controlling 80.1% share of semiconductors unit of Philips for €6.4 billion. The new company, based in the Netherlands, was renamed NXP Semiconductors.
[107]


TDC A/S
2006
The Danish phone company was acquired by KKR, Apax Partners, Providence Equity Partners and Permira for €12.2 billion ($15.3 billion), which at the time made it the second largest European buyout in history.
[108][109]


Dollar General
2007
KKR completed a buyout of the chain of discount stores operating in the U.S.
[110]


Alliance Boots
2007
KKR and Stefano Pessina, the company’s deputy chairman and largest shareholder, acquired the UK drug store retailer for £12.4 billion ($24.8 billion) including assumed debt, after increasing their bid more than 40% amidst intense competition from Terra Firma Capital Partners and Wellcome Trust. The buyout came only a year after the merger of Boots Group plc (Boots the Chemist), and Alliance UniChem plc.
[111][112]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone Group, KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[113]


First Data
2007
KKR and TPG Capital completed the $29 billion buyout of the credit and debit card payment processor and former parent of Western Union. Michael Capellas, previously the CEO of MCI Communications and Compaq was named CEO of the privately held company.
[114][115]


TXU (Energy Future Holdings)
2007
An investor group led by KKR and TPG Capital and together with Goldman Sachs completed the $44.37 billion[116] buyout of the regulated utility and power producer. The investor group had to work closely with ERCOT regulators to gain approval of the transaction but had significant experience with the regulators from their earlier buyout of Texas Genco. TXU is the largest buyout in history, and retained this distinction when the announced buyout of BCE failed to close in December 2008. The deal was notable for a drastic change in environmental policy for the energy giant, in terms of its carbon emissions from coal power plants and funding alternative energy.
[117][118]


Other non-buyout investments completed by KKR during this period included Legg Mason, Sun Microsystems, Tarkett, Longview Power Plant and Seven Network. In October 2006, KKR acquired a 50% stake in Tarkett, a France-based distributor of flooring products, in a deal valued at about €1.4 billion ($1.8 billion). On November 20, 2006, KKR announced it would form a A$4 billion partnership with the Seven Network of Australia.[119] On January 23, 2007, KKR announced it would invest $700 million through a PIPE investment in Sun Microsystems.[120] In January 2008, KKR announced it had made a $1.25 billion PIPE investment in Legg Mason through a convertible preferred stock offering.[121]
In addition to its successful buyout transactions, KKR was involved in the failed buyout of Harman International Industries (NYSE: HAR), an upscale audio equipment maker. On April 26, 2007, Harman announced it had entered an agreement to be acquired by KKR and Goldman Sachs.[122] As the financing markets became more adverse [clarification needed] in the summer of 2007, the buyout was on tenuous ground. In September 2007, KKR and Goldman backed out of the $8 billion buyout of Harman. By the end of the day, Harman's shares had plummeted by more than 24% upon the news.[123]


Selected Kohlberg Kravis Roberts 2006–2008 Investments













Hospital Corporation of America 













NXP Semiconductors 













Dollar General 













Alliance Boots 













TXU 













Sun Microsystems 













Legg Mason 






Initial public offering[edit]
In 2007, KKR filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission[3] to raise $1.25 billion by selling an ownership interest in its management company.[124] The filing came less than two weeks after the initial public offering of rival private equity firm Blackstone Group. KKR had previously listed its KPE vehicle in 2006, but for the first time, KKR would offer investors an ownership interest in the management company itself. The onset of the credit crunch and the shutdown of the IPO market dampened the prospects of obtaining a valuation attractive to KKR. The flotation was repeatedly postponed, and called off by the end of August.[125]
The following year, in July 2008, KKR announced a new plan to list its shares. The plan called for KKR to complete a reverse takeover of its listed affiliate KKR Private Equity Investors in exchange for a 21% interest in the firm.[126] In November 2008, KKR announced a delay of this transaction until 2009. Shares of KPE had declined significantly in the second half of 2008 with the onset of the credit crunch. KKR has announced that it expects to close the transaction in 2009.[127] In October 2009, KKR listed shares in KKR & Co. on the Euronext exchange, replacing KPE and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange in 2010. The public entity represents a 30% interest in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts. In October 2010, KKR acquired about nine members of Goldman Sachs Group proprietary trading team after entertaining offers from investment firms such as Perella Weinberg and Blackrock. With Goldman shutting down its proprietary trading operations, its executives, led by Bob Howard, will help KKR expand beyond leveraged buyouts into areas such as hedge funds.
2010 to present day[edit]
In January 2014, KKR acquired Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc for $2.4 billion from two private equity companies - Stone Point, and Hellman & Friedman.[128]
In June 2014, KKR announced it was taking a one-third stake in a Spanish energy business of Acciona Energy, at a cost of €417 million ($567 million). The international renewable energy generation business operates renewable assets, largely wind farms, across 14 countries including the United States, Italy and South Africa.[129]
In August 2014, KKR announced it was investing $400 million to acquire Fujian Sunner Development, China's largest chicken farmer, which breeds, processes and supplies frozen and fresh chickens to consumers and corporate clients, such as KFC and McDonald's, across China.[130]
In September 2014, the firm invested $90 million in a lighting and electrics firm Savant Systems.[131]
In January 2015, KKR confirmed its purchase of British rail ticket website thetrainline.com, previously owned by Exponent. The purchase sum is unknown.[132]
On October 12, 2015, KKR announced that it has entered into definitive agreement with Allianz Capital Partners to acquire their majority stake in Selecta Group, a European vending services operator.[133]
On September 1, 2016, KKR announced that it had acquired Epicor Software Corporation, an American software company.[134]
In October 2016, it was reported that KKR invested $250 million in OVH to be used for further international expansion.[135] This funding round valued OVH at over $1 billion, making it a unicorn.
In December 2016, the Lonza Group announced it would acquire Capsugel for $5.5 billion from Kohlberg Kravis Roberts.[136]
In February 2017 KKR were reported to be trying to take over the international market research company ARI GfK SE.[137] In July of the same year KKR acquired WebMD Health Corp for $2.8 billion.[138]
Notable current and former employees[edit]
Over the years, KKR has seen the departure of many of its original partners, the most notable being original co-founder Jerome Kohlberg. After a leave of absence due to an illness in 1985, Kohlberg returned to find increasing differences in strategy with his partners Kravis and Roberts.[139] In 1987, Kohlberg left KKR to found a new private equity firm Kohlberg & Company. Kohlberg & Company returned to the investment style that Kohlberg had originally practiced at Bear Stearns and in KKR's earlier years, acquiring smaller, middle-market companies.[4][140][141]
Since 1996, general partners of KKR have included Henry Kravis, George R. Roberts, Paul Raether, Robert MacDonnell, Jose Gandarillas, Michael Michelson, Saul Fox, James Greene, Michael Tokarz, Clifton Robbins, Scott Stuart, Perry Golkin and Edward Gilhuly.[142] Among those who left were Saul Fox, Ted Ammon, Ned Gilhuly, Mike Tokarz and Scott Stuart who had been instrumental in establishing KKR's reputation and track record in the 1980s.[143] KKR remains tightly controlled by Kravis and Roberts. The issue of succession has remained an important consideration for KKR's future as an ongoing institutionalized firm.

Scott C. Nuttall (born 1972), heads KKR's fastest-growing department, the Global Capital and Asset Management Group, which includes Asset Management, Capital Markets and Client and Partner Group. He joined KKR in November 1996 after leaving the Blackstone Group. His group, the firm's fastest-growing division, has $25 billion under management. With the support of co-founder George Roberts, Nuttall has largely spearheaded the campaign to expand KKR beyond its institutional investors (legacy and otherwise) into credit investment, and alternative investments, pointing out that there are billions "in revenues up for grabs".[144][145][146] He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Joseph Bae on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. He will concentrate on KKR's corporate and real estate credit, capital markets, hedge fund and capital raising businesses together with the firm's corporate development, balance sheet and strategic growth initiatives.[147] New York Times called him and Joseph Bae as potential successors.[148] He graduated from University of Pennsylvania with a Bachelor of Science degree.
Joseph Bae (born circa 1972) joined KKR from Goldman Sachs in 1996. Most recently, he was the Managing Partner of KKR Asia and the Global Head of KKR's Infrastructure and Energy Real Asset businesses. Mr. Bae has been the architect of KKR's Asian expansion since 2005. He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Scott Nuttall on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. Mr. Bae will focus on KKR's global private equity businesses as well as the Firm's real asset platforms across energy, infrastructure and real estate private equity.[147] He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree from Harvard College.
Saul A. Fox left KKR in 1997 to found Fox Paine & Company, a middle market private equity firm with over $1.5 billion of capital under management[149][150]
Clifton S. Robbins left KKR to join competitor General Atlantic Partners in 2000 and later founded Blue Harbour Group,[151] a private investment firm based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[152]
Edward A. Gilhuly and Scott Stuart left KKR in 2004 to launch Sageview Capital. Prior to this, Gilhuly was the managing partner of KKR's European operations, based in London; Stuart managed KKR's energy and consumer products industry groups.[152]
Ted Ammon, started several new ventures including Big Flower Press, which printed newspaper circulars, and Chancery Lane Capital, a boutique private equity firm, before being murdered in his Long Island home October 2001. The lover of his estranged, now deceased wife, Generosa, was later convicted.[152][153][154][155]
Paul Hazen, served as chairman and CEO of Wells Fargo (1995–2001).[156] Hazen later returned to KKR to serve as chairman of Accel-KKR, a joint venture with Accel Partners and later as chairman of KKR's publicly listed affiliate, KFN.
Clive Hollick, Baron Hollick, CEO of United News and Media (1996–2005)
Ken Mehlman joined KKR in 2008 as Global Head of Public Affairs.[157]
David Petraeus, selected to serve as chairman of the newly formed KKR Global Institute (2013—present)[158]
Joseph Grundfest, Professor at Stanford Law School and youngest SEC Commissioner

Works about KKR[edit]


Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
Anders, George (1992). Merchants of Debt: KKR and the Mortgaging of American Business. New York: BasicBooks. ISBN 978-0-465-04522-8. 
Bartlett, Sarah (1991). The Money Machine: How KKR Manufactured Power & Profits. New York: Warner Books. ISBN 978-0-446-51608-2. 
Burrough, Bryan (1990). Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-016172-8. 


See also[edit]

Jerome Kohlberg
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts

Notes[edit]


^ a b c KKR locations (company Web site); retrieved March 8, 2010. Archived January 18, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ http://ir.kkr.com/common/download/download.cfm?companyid=KKR&fileid=930140&filekey=C070EEBD-B0D9-49A9-8346-B3E15E803AA6&filename=SEC-KKR-1404912-17-5.pdf
^ a b c d KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ a b c d e f g h i Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Company History. Funding Universe; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "What's An Aging 'Barbarian' To Do?" The New York Times, August 26, 2001.
^ What Does Henry Kravis Want?. The New York Times, September 6, 2008
^ KKR Investment History (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR to Relocate Corporate Headquarters to Manhattan’s Transformative New Neighborhood on the West Side | Business Wire". www.businesswire.com. Retrieved 2015-12-31. 
^ "KKR Files for NYSE Listing", March 17, 2010.
^ a b 2007 KKR Annual Review[dead link]; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Canada Pension Plan Unit to Join K.K.R. Merchant Banking Venture", New York Times (Dealbook Section), January 17, 2013.
^ a b "Several Giant Pension Funds Investing in Offer for Nabisco". The New York Times, October 31, 1988.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form 10-Q, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 31, 2014
^ a b "KKR Financial REIT IPO debuts: Kohlberg Kravis Roberts manages trust", Marketwatch.com, June 24, 2005.
^ KKR arm in talks after fresh repayment delays. Reuters, February 20, 2008.
^ "Kohlberg Affiliate Sells Stake in Unit", Reuters, April 1, 2008.
^ "Opening Private Equity's Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors". The New York Times, May 4, 2006.
^ Timmons, Heather. "Private Equity Goes Public for $5 Billion. Its Investors Ask, ‘What's Next?’". The New York Times, November 10, 2006
^ Anderson, Jenny. "Where Private Equity Goes, Hedge Funds May Follow", New York Times, June 23, 2006.
^ KKR Private Equity Investors Reports Results for Quarter Ended March 31, 2008 Archived March 20, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.. KKR Private Equity Investors Press Release, May 7, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ see pdf-document, retrieved in January 2015
^ statement on KKR-leaflet, retrieved in January 2015
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row, 1990; pp. 133-136.
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate (New York: Harper & Row, 1990), pp. 136-140.
^ Holland, Max (1989), When the Machine Stopped: A Cautionary Tale from Industrial America, Boston: Harvard Business School Press, ISBN 978-0-87584-208-0, OCLC 246343673. , pp. 149–169.
^ Malone & Hyde Accepts Bid The New York Times, June 12, 1984.
^ Wayne, Leslie. "Wometco Agrees To Buyout", The New York Times. September 22, 1983.
^ Dodson, Steve. "Beatrice Deal Is Biggest Buyout Yet". The New York Times, November 17, 1985.
^ Sterngold, James. "Drexel's Role in Beatrice Deal Examined". The New York Times, April 28, 1988.
^ Fisher, Lawrence M. Safeway Buyout: A Success Story. The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ Feder, Barnaby. "Asbestos: The Saga Drags On". The New York Times, April 2, 1989.
^ "Chapter 11 For Kohlberg, Kravis Unit". The New York Times, December 28, 1989.
^ "The Granddaddy Of All Takeovers", The New York Times Book Review, January 21, 1990.
^ "Nabisco Executives Offer $17 Billion for Company". The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ "Shearson Risks, Rewards on RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 22, 1988.
^ "Nabisco Bid Seen by Kohlberg". The New York Times, October 24, 1988.
^ "Buyout Specialist Bids $20.3 Billion For RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 25, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bid Gives New Respectability To Giant Deals Financed With Huge Debt". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "Concern Over Kohlberg, Kravis Strategy". The New York Times, November 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bidders Said to Talk". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "The Nabisco Battle's Key Moment". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ Joint Deal For Nabisco Is Rejected. The New York Times, October 27, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Will Give Kohlberg, Kravis Data. The New York Times, October 27, 1988
^ Forstmann Declines to Bid on RJR Nabisco. The New York Times, November 17, 1988.
^ "Suitors Quarrel Over RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, November 8, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Discloses Guidelines for Its Buyout. The New York Times, November 9, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Suitor Claims $24.88 Billion Victory". The New York Times, December 1, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Explains Its Choice". The New York Times, December 8, 1988
^ "Nabisco Executives to Take Huge Gains in Their Buyout". The New York Times, November 5, 1988.
^ "A Growing Backlash Against Greed". The New York Times, November 13, 1988
^ "Game of Greed", Time Magazine (1988)
^ "Losers Get Some Spoils In Fight for RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, December 2, 1988
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Collect $75 Million RJR Nabisco Fee". The New York Times, February 1, 1989.
^ "RJR Nabisco, An Epilogue". The New York Times, March 12, 1999.
^ "2 Buyout Firms Build New Funds". The New York Times, November 23, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Now RJR's Owner". Associated Press, April 29, 1989.
^ "History Of The RJR Nabisco Takeover". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "Is RJR Worth $25 Billion?" The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Completes Sale of Del Monte". The New York Times, January 11, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts Loan to RJR Renegotiated". The New York Times, June 27, 1990.
^ "RJR Move Helps Lift 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, July 17, 1990.
^ "RJR Offers Cash and Stock for 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, December 18, 1990.
^ Agrees to a Takeover. The New York Times, September 13, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg's Impetus in Borden Deal". The New York Times, September 14, 1994.
^ "Borden Signs Agreement for Sale to Kohlberg". The New York Times, September 24, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Says It Has Control of Borden". The New York Times, December 22, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans to Divest Remaining Stake in RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, March 16, 1995.
^ "Apollo Buys Borden Chemical for $649 million". The New York Times, July 7, 2004.
^ "Kohlberg Ends Bid for Macmillan". The New York Times, November 4, 1988.
^ K-III's New Name To Be 'Primedia'. The New York Times, November 1, 1997.
^ "Macmillan Book Club Unit And a Publisher Being Sold". The New York Times, May 23, 1989.
^ a b "As Primedia Falls, Preferred Stock Lives Up to Its Name". The New York Times, October 26, 2005.
^ Kravis Rouses Itself, The New York Times, April 29, 1991
^ "K-III Communications Files Plan For an Initial Offering of Stock". The New York Times, September 6, 1995.
^ Regulators Pick Buyer To Operate New England Bank. The New York Times, April 23, 1991.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis in Swap for 7.5% of Fleet". The New York Times, January 3, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis in Aetna Reinsurance Deal". The New York Times, June 9, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans Stake in TW". The New York Times, June 26, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg Unit to Buy Alden Press". The New York Times, January 19, 1993.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Acquire Bruno's Supermarket Chain". The New York Times, April 21, 1995.
^ "$5 Billion Fund By Kohlberg Seen". The New York Times, September 13, 1996.
^ "At K.K.R., the Glory Days Are Past". The New York Times, August 10, 1995.
^ "Kohlberg Plans Stake In Spalding And Evenflo". The New York Times, August 16, 1996.
^ "Newsquest Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Will Buy Kindercare for $467 Million". The New York Times, October 4, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Set to Offer $1.2 Billion for Cable Maker". The New York Times, January 24, 1997.
^ Roundup, An Interactive Edition News (1997-06-28). "KKR Completes Purchase Of Randalls for $225 Million". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2016-12-19. 
^ "Supermarkets Get a Brand New Bag". The New York Times, August 31, 1997.
^ "The Boyds Collection, Ltd. Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis And Welsh Carson Acquiring Medcath". The New York Times, March 14, 1998.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis-Led Group To Buy Big Insurance Broker". The New York Times, July 23, 1998.
^ "Wincor Nixdorf Holding Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ 2 Buyout Firms Make Deal To Acquire Regal Cinemas. The New York Times, January 21, 1998
^ Kohlberg Kravis In $660 Million Deal For Act III Cinemas. The New York Times, October 21, 1997.
^ "Amid Blame, United Artists Sale Collapses". The New York Times, February 23, 1998.
^ "Regal Cinemas Considers Filing For Bankruptcy". The New York Times, November 16, 2000.
^ a b Shoppers Drug Mart Sells Shares. Retail Merchandiser, March 17, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "BCE Sells Directory Unit". The New York Times, November 30, 2002.
^ "Yellow Pages Income Fund Announces, 43 Million Offering"[permanent dead link]. Yellow Pages Group press release, May 26, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Rozhon, Tracie. "Three Firms Are Said to Buy Toys 'R' Us for $6 Billion". New York Times, March 17, 2005.
^ What's Next for Toys 'R' Us?. The Wall Street Journal, March 18, 2005.
^ "Deal Mania: Shades of the '80s: The leveraged buyout is back in vogue" Archived 2008-11-01 at the Wayback Machine.. US News & World Report, April 10, 2005.
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal". The New York Times, March 29, 2005.
^ "Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?" The New York Times, April 3, 2005.
^ K.K.R., Texas Pacific Plan Record Buyout of TXU. The New York Times, February 23, 2007.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross. "HCA Buyout Highlights Era of Going Private". The New York Times, July 25, 2006.
^ Bloomberg News (August 4, 2006). "Technology; Royal Philips Sells Unit for $4.4 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ "Takeover firms will pay $15.3b to buy Danish phone giant TDC." Bloomberg, December 1, 2005
^ "TDC-One year on." Dow Jones Private Equity News, January 22, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Peters, Jeremy W. (March 13, 2007). "Buyout Firm Is Acquiring Dollar General Retail Chain". The New York Times. Retrieved January 4, 2009. 
^ Werdigier, Julia. "Equity Firm Wins Bidding for a Retailer, Alliance Boots". The New York Times, April 25, 2007.
^ "Terra Firma drops Boots bid plan". BBC. April 24, 2007. 
^ De la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer". New York Times, June 8, 2007
^ "KKR Offer of $26 Billion Is Accepted by First Data". Reuters, April 3, 2007
^ "Kohlberg Kravis to Buy First Data for $29 Billion". The New York Times, April 3, 2007.
^ Source: Thomson Financial
^ Lonkevich, Dan and Klump, Edward. KKR, Texas Pacific Will Acquire TXU for $45 Billion Bloomberg.com, February 26, 2007.
^ Skariachan, Dhanya (February 26, 2007). "KKR, Texas Pacific-led group to buy TXU Corp". Reuters. 
^ "Seven in $4bn asset sell-off" Archived 2007-11-14 at the Wayback Machine.. News.com.au, November 20, 2006
^ "Sun Microsystems Welcomes Endorsement and Investment From KKR". Sun Microsystems Press Release, January 23, 2007 Archived September 29, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Legg Mason Makes Deal With Equity Firm". Reuters, January 15, 2008
^ Harman International Industries to be Acquired by KKR and GS Capital Partners. Harman International press release, April 26, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived July 4, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Wary Buyers May Scuttle Two Deals". The New York Times, September 22, 2007.
^ Jenny Anderson and Michael J. de la Merced. "Kohlberg Kravis Plans to Go Public", The New York Times, July 4, 2007.
^ "KKR postpones $1.25 bn float as credit chaos deters buyers". The Times (UK), August 23, 2007.
^ After Delay, KKR Finds a Way to Go Public. The New York Times, July 28, 2008.
^ K.K.R. Calls Listing Delay ‘Process Related’. The New York Times, November 3, 2008.
^ Neha Dimri; Aman Shah (28 January 2014). "KKR to take control of Sedgwick Claims Management in $2.4 billion deal". Reuters. 
^ "Equity investor KKR picks stakes in Acciona Energia unit for 417mn euros". Spain News.Net. Retrieved 24 June 2014. 
^ "KKR to acquire China chicken developer for $400 mn". Business Sun. 26 August 2014. Retrieved 27 August 2014. 
^ KKR invests in smart home tech company Savant Systems. Reuters, 4 September 2014
^ "Deals of the day - Mergers and acquisitions". Reuters. Retrieved 2015-01-22. 
^ "KKR | KKR agrees to acquire majority stake in Selecta from ACP". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2015-10-12. 
^ "Epicor Announces Close of KKR Acquisition and Executive Leadership Appointments to Accelerate Growth Strategy". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2016-09-01. 
^ "Klaba Family OVH, Europe No. 1 Web Host, Raises €250M from $KKR, TowerBrook". exithub. Retrieved 14 January 2017. 
^ "Lonza Buys Capsugel for $5.5B Cash - GEN Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News - Biotech from Bench to Business - GEN". GEN. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ Germany, wysiwyg* Software Design GmbH, Düsseldorf,. "Acceleratio Capital N.V.". www.acceleratio-angebot.de. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/us-webmd-m-a-kkr-idUKKBN1A915Y
^ "Buyout Pioneer Quitting Fray". The New York Times, June 19, 1987.
^ Kohlberg In Dispute Over Firm. The New York Times, August 30, 1989.
^ "Kohlberg Suit Settlement". The New York Times, February 23, 1990.
^ Duracell International Inc. SEC Form SC 13G/A ("Statement of acquisition of beneficial ownership"); filed February 6, 1996.
^ Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
^ Scott Nuttall profile at Forbes
^ "A kinder, gentler KKR wants a piece of your 401K", Forbes, January 23, 2013.
^ Profile of Scott Nuttall at investing.businessweek.com, Businessweek.com, January 23, 2013.
^ a b "KKR Appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers". KKR Press Release. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Next Generation at K.K.R. Set as It Names Two Co-Presidents". New York Times. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ ""For Saul Fox, Bigger Isn’t Always Better in the World of Buyouts". foxpaine.com, May 15, 2000. Retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Anders, George. "Bitter End of a Partnership", Wall Street Journal, September 15, 2007.
^ Blue Harbour Group> About Blue Harbour Archived 2008-03-13 at the Wayback Machine. (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ a b c Barbarians at the Gate: Contrasting fortunes for those closest to the deal. eFinancial News, November 3, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Pelosi Found Guilty of Murder". CBS News. December 13, 2004. Retrieved May 17, 2007. 
^ "Murder in East Hampton", Vanity Fair, January 2002.
^ "Mystery of the Murdered Millionaire". Dateline NBC; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Paul M. Hazen profile as Wells Fargo & Co. Chairman and CEO Archived 2005-09-14 at the Wayback Machine.; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Mehlman profile at KKR website Archived 2013-07-30 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR names former CIA head Petraeus as chairman of new institute". 30 May 2013. Retrieved 5 June 2017 – via Reuters. 


References[edit]


FT.com / Industries / Basic industries – "KKR set to buy Masonite for C$3.1bn"
Gross, Daniel & David Sterling. "Has Henry Kravis gone soft?". Slate, August 5, 2007; retrieved August 7, 2007.
The KKR Way. Bloomberg Markets, August 2007
"The barbarians at the gate have been losing their Midas touch". timesonline.co.uk, August 6, 2005; retrieved February 16, 2009.


External links[edit]

Yahoo! – Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. company profile







v
t
e


Kohlberg Kravis Roberts



Founders



Jerome Kohlberg Jr.
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts





Selected current investments



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Aricent Group
Bharti Enterprises
Capsugel
CICC
Café Coffee Day
Colonial Pipeline
Del Monte Foods
Dollar General
Eastman Kodak
El Paso Corp.
Energy Future Holdings
First Data
Hospital Corporation of America
KION Group
Laureate Education
Legg Mason
Legrand
Magma Fincorp
Maxeda
Nielsen Holdings
Northgate Information Solutions
NXP Semiconductors
Oriental Brewery
Pets at Home
ProSiebenSat.1 Media
Sealy Corporation
Seven West Media
TDC A/S
Toys "R" Us
US Foods
Visma
Wild
Yageo
Zhone Technologies








 Category












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kohlberg_Kravis_Roberts&oldid=792147823"					
Categories: Kohlberg Kravis RobertsCompanies based in New York CityCompanies established in 1976Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeKohlberg Kravis Roberts companiesMezzanine capital investment firmsPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from January 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with a promotional tone from June 2017All articles with a promotional toneArticles needing cleanup from June 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from June 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from June 2017Wikipedia articles needing style editing from June 2017All articles needing style editingArticles with peacock terms from June 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles that may be too long from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from September 2013Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


CatalàDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 19:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      



Kohlberg Kravis Roberts - Wikipedia





















 







Kohlberg Kravis Roberts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from KKR)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"KKR" redirects here. For other uses, see KKR (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Too much unnecessary detail and puffery Please help improve this article if you can. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may have too many section headers dividing up its content. Please help improve the article by merging similar sections and removing unneeded subheaders. (June 2017)







This article may contain an excessive amount of intricate detail that may only interest a specific audience. Please help by spinning off or relocating any relevant information, and removing excessive detail that may be against Wikipedia's inclusion policy. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may be too long to read and navigate comfortably. Please consider splitting content into sub-articles, condensing it, or adding or removing subheadings. (June 2017)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



KKR & Co. L.P.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: KKR


Industry
Financial services:
private equity
(1976–present)
investment banking
(2004–present)


Founded
1976; 41 years ago (1976)


Founder
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts
Jerome Kohlberg, Jr.


Headquarters
9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York City, New York 10019
United States



Number of locations

13 offices in 9 countries[1]



Key people

Henry R. Kravis
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)
George R. Roberts
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)


Products
Management buyouts
Leveraged finance
Venture capital
Growth capital


Revenue
US$ 8.896 billion (2013)



Net income

US$ 691.2 million (2013)


AUM
US$ 98.0 billion (2012)


Total assets
US$ 39 billion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

1700 (2017)


Website
www.kkr.com


KKR & Co. L.P. (formerly known as Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.) is an American multinational private equity firm, specializing in leveraged buyouts, headquartered in New York City. The firm sponsors and manages private equity investment funds. The firm has completed over $400 billion of private equity transactions since its inception.[3][4]
The firm was founded in 1976 by Jerome Kohlberg, Jr., and cousins Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts, all of whom had previously worked together at Bear Stearns, where they completed some of the earliest leveraged buyout transactions. Since its founding, KKR has completed a number of transactions including the 1989 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco, which was the largest buyout in history to that point, as well as the 2007 buyout of TXU, which is currently the largest buyout completed to date.[5][6] KKR has completed investments in over 160 companies since 1977, completing at least one investment in every year except in 1982 and in 1990.[7]
KKR has 13 additional offices in the United States, Europe and Asia.[1] The firm is currently located in the Solow Building (9 W. 57th Street), but recently announced its intentions to occupy a newly constructed 30 Hudson Yards.[8]
In October 2009, KKR listed shares in the company through KKR & Co., an affiliate that holds 30% of the firm's ownership equity, with the remainder held by the firm's partners. In March 2010, KKR filed to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE),[9] with trading commencing four months later, on July 15, 2010.



Contents


1 The Firm KKR
2 Investment funds and other affiliates

2.1 Private equity funds
2.2 KKR Financial
2.3 KKR Private Equity Investors


3 History

3.1 Founding and early history
3.2 Buyout of RJR Nabisco
3.3 Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco
3.4 Early 1990s: Investments
3.5 1996–1999
3.6 2000–2005
3.7 Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom
3.8 Initial public offering
3.9 2010 to present day


4 Notable current and former employees
5 Works about KKR
6 See also
7 Notes
8 References
9 External links



The Firm KKR[edit]
KKR is operated by its managing partners Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts and a team of approximately 140 investment professionals and 400 total employees, organized into industry-focused groups.[3] KKR is headquartered in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street, Manhattan, New York, with U.S. offices in Menlo Park, San Francisco, Houston, and Washington, D.C., and offices in London, Paris, Hong Kong, Tokyo, Beijing, Mumbai, Dubai, Seoul, São Paulo and Sydney.[1]
KKR invests primarily through leveraged buyouts as well as growth capital investments (including "PIPE" investments in public companies). It has traditionally specialized in private equity investments, focusing on specific industry sectors where the firm has created nine dedicated investment groups. The industries in which KKR has developed a specialization include:[10]

Chemicals
Consumer products
Energy & natural resources
Financial services
Health care
Industrial
Media and communications
Retail
Technology

The professionals in each of KKR's industry-focused groups are expected to have developed a proficiency in their respective industries.[10] The firm has traditionally had strong ties with its investors.[11]
Investment funds and other affiliates[edit]
Private equity funds[edit]
KKR has historically relied primarily on private equity funds, pools of committed capital that are raised from a broad array of institutional investors (e.g., pension funds, insurance companies, investment banks, commercial banks, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds).[3][12] As of March 31, 2014, KKR had completed fund-raising for approximately 23 traditional investment funds in the US, Europe and Asia with total committed capital of approximately US$80 billion:


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($m)


KKR Fund 1976
1977
$31


KKR Fund 1980
1980
$357


KKR Fund 1982
1982
$328


KKR Fund 1984
1984
$1,000


KKR Fund 1986
1986
$672


KKR Fund 1987
1987
$6,130


KKR Fund 1993
1993
$1,946


KKR Fund 1996
1996
$6,012


KKR European Fund
1999
$3,085


KKR Millennium Fund
2002
$6,000


KKR European Fund II
2005
$5,751


KKR Fund 2006
2006
$17,642


KKR Asian Fund
2007
$4,000


KKR European Fund III
2008
$6,238


KKR E2 Investors (Annex Fund)
2009
$209


KKR China Growth Fund
2010
$1,010


KKR Natural Resources Fund
2010
$876


KKR Infrastructure Fund
2011
$1,043


KKR North America Fund XI
2012
$8,718


KKR Asian Fund II
2013
$5,825


KKR Real Estate Partners Americas
2013
$1,226


KKR Energy Income and Growth Fund
2013
$1,974


Source: SEC Filings[13]
KKR Financial[edit]






Type

Public company (NYSE: KFN)


Founded
2004


Website
www.kkrfinancial.com


KKR Financial (NYSE: KFN) is a real estate investment trust (REIT) and specialty finance company that invests in residential and commercial mortgage loans and mortgage-backed securities as well as corporate loans and debt securities, asset-backed securities and equity securities. KFN was founded in 2004 raising $795 million in a private placement and raised $849 million in a June 2005 initial public offering, increasing the size of the offering from an original $600 million target.[14] KKR had initially considered structuring KFN as a business development company like Apollo Management's Apollo Investment Corporation but chose to pursue the REIT structure to capitalize on the strength in REIT valuations at the time.[14]
KFN was an early casualty of the subprime mortgage crisis and in September 2007, Henry Kravis and George Roberts injected $270 million into the company. On February 20, 2008, KFN was once again forced to delay the repayment of billions of dollars of commercial paper, and began a new round of talks with creditors.[15] In April, KFN sold a controlling interest in a real estate subsidiary to an investment firm to raise cash and entered an agreement with the noteholders of certain secured commercial paper issued by two asset-backed entities. Following the transaction, KFN converted from a REIT to a LLC.[16]
KKR Private Equity Investors[edit]






Type

Public company (Euronext: KPE)


Founded
2006


Website
www.kkrpei.com


KKR Private Equity Investors (Euronext: KPE) is a publicly traded private equity fund that invests as a fund of funds in KKR private equity funds. KPE also co-invests in transactions alongside KKR's private equity funds. KPE was founded in 2006. In May 2006, KKR raised $5 billion in an initial public offering for a KPE to serve as a new permanent investment vehicle listing it on the Euronext exchange in Amsterdam. KKR raised three times more than it expected, as many of the investors in KPE were hedge funds seeking exposure to private equity but could not make long term commitments to private equity funds. As private equity had been booming in preceding years, investing in a KKR fund was attractive to investors.[17]
However, KPE's first-day performance was lackluster, trading down 1.7% and trading volume was limited.[18] Initially, a handful of other private equity firms and hedge funds had planned to follow KKR's lead but shelved those plans when KPE's performance continued to falter after its IPO. KPE's stock declined from an IPO price of €25 per share to €18.16 (a 27% decline) at the end of 2007 and a low of €11.45 (a 54.2% decline) per share in Q1 2008.[19]
KPE disclosed in May 2008 that it had completed approximately $300 million of secondary sales of selected limited partnership interests in, and undrawn commitments to, certain KKR-managed funds in order to generate liquidity and repay borrowings.[20]
In October 2009 KPE changed its name to KKR & Co. (Guernsey) L.P.,[21] which was delisted from Euronext Amsterdam in July 2010 while common units of KKR & Co. L.P. began trading on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “KKR”.[22]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
Running the corporate finance department for Bear Stearns in the 1960s and 1970s, Jerome Kohlberg and later with protégés Henry Kravis and George Roberts completed a series of what they described as "bootstrap" investments beginning in 1964–65. They targeted family-owned businesses, many of which had been founded in the years following World War II which by the 1960s and 1970s were facing succession issues. Many of these companies lacked a viable or attractive exit for their founders as they were too small to be taken public and the founders were reluctant to sell out to competitors and so a sale to a financial buyer could prove attractive.[4]




Henry Kravis speaking at the World Economic Forum in 2009


Their acquisition of Orkin Exterminating Company in 1964 is among the first significant leveraged buyout transactions. In the following years the three Bear Stearns bankers would complete a series of buyouts including Stern Metals (1965), Incom (a division of Rockwood International, 1971), Cobblers Industries (1971), and Boren Clay (1973), as well as Thompson Wire, Eagle Motors and Barrows through their investment in Stern Metals. Despite a number of highly successful investments, the $27 million investment in Cobblers ended in bankruptcy.[23]
By 1976, tensions [clarification needed] had built up between Bear Stearns and Kohlberg, Kravis and Roberts, which led to the formation of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in that year. Most notably, Bear Stearns executive Cy Lewis had rejected repeated proposals to form a dedicated investment fund within Bear Stearns and Lewis took exception to the amount of time spent on outside activities. In 1976, Kravis had been required to serve as interim CEO of a failing direct mail company named Advo.[citation needed]
The new KKR completed its first buyout, that of manufacturer A.J. Industries, in 1977. KKR raised capital from a small group of investors including the Hillman Company and First Chicago Bank. By 1978, with the revision of the ERISA regulations, the nascent KKR was successful in raising its first institutional fund with over $30 million of investor commitments.[24] In 1981, KKR expanded its investor base significantly when the Oregon State Treasury's public pension fund invested in KKR's acquisition of retailer Fred Meyer, Inc. Oregon State remains an active investor in KKR funds.[4]
KKR closed out the 1970s completing the public-to-private buyout of Houdaille Industries in 1979,[25] probably the largest take-private of a public company to that point. As the 1980s began, KKR was among the most prominent practitioner of leveraged buyouts and would prove the most prolific of the private equity investors in the 1980s.[4] Among the firm's most notable acquisitions during the 1980s buyout boom were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


Malone & Hyde
1984
KKR completed the first buyout of a public company by tender offer, by acquiring the food distributor and supermarket operator together with the company's chairman Joseph R. Hyde III.
[26]


Wometco Enterprises
1984
KKR completed the first billion-dollar buyout transaction to acquire the leisure-time company with interests in television, movie theaters and tourist attractions. The buyout comprised the acquisition of 100% of the outstanding shares for $842 million and the assumption of $170 million of the company's outstanding debt.
[27]


Beatrice Companies
1985
KKR sponsored the $6.1 billion management buyout of Beatrice, which owned Samsonite and Tropicana among other consumer brands. At the time of its closing in 1985, Beatrice was the largest buyout completed.
[28][29]


Safeway
1986
KKR completed a friendly $5.5 billion buyout of Safeway to help management avoid hostile overtures from Herbert and Robert Haft of Dart Drug. Safeway was taken public again in 1990.
[30]


Jim Walter Corp.
(later Walter Industries)
1987
KKR acquired the company for $3.3 billion in early 1988 but faced issues with the buyout almost immediately. Most notably, a subsidiary of Jim Walter Corp (Celotex) faced a large asbestos lawsuit and incurred liabilities that the courts ruled would need to be satisfied by the parent company. In 1989, the holding company which KKR used for the Jim Walter buyout filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
[31][32]


Buyout of RJR Nabisco[edit]
Main article: RJR Nabisco
After the 1987 resignation of Jerome Kohlberg at age 61 (he later founded his own private equity firm, Kohlberg & Co.), Henry Kravis succeeded him as senior partner. Under Kravis and Roberts, the firm was responsible for the 1988 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco. RJR Nabisco proved to be not only the largest buyout in history to that time, at $25 billion ($31.1 billion, including assumed debt) as well as a high-water mark and sign of the end of the 1980s buyout boom. RJR—Nabisco, which would remain the largest buyout for the next 17 years, was chronicled in Barbarians at the Gate: The Fall of RJR Nabisco, and later made into a television movie starring James Garner.[33]
In 1988, F. Ross Johnson was the President and CEO of RJR Nabisco, formed in 1985 by the merger of Nabisco Brands and R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company, a leading producer of food products (Shredded Wheat, Oreo cookies, Ritz crackers, Planters peanuts, Life Savers, Del Monte Fruit and Vegetables, and Snickers Chocolate) as well as Winston, Camel and Salem cigarettes. In October 1988, Johnson proposed a $17 billion ($75 per share) management buyout of the company with the financial backing of investment bank Shearson Lehman Hutton and its parent company, American Express.[34][35]
Several days later, Kravis, who had originally suggested the idea of the buyout to Johnson, presented a new bid for $20.3 billion ($90 per share) financed with an aggressive debt package.[36][37][38] KKR had the support of significant equity co-investments from leading pension funds and other institutional investors. Investors included Coca-Cola, Georgia-Pacific and United Technologies corporate pension funds, as well as endowments from MIT, Harvard and the New York State Common Retirement Fund[12] However, KKR faced criticism from existing investors over the firm's use of hostile tactics in the buyout of RJR.[39]
KKR proposed to provide a joint offer with Johnson and Shearson Lehman but was rebuffed and Johnson attempted to stonewall KKR's access to financial information from RJR.[40][41][42][43] Rival private equity firm, Forstmann Little & Co. was invited into the process by Shearson Lehman but attempted to provide a bid for RJR with a consortium of Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Procter & Gamble, Ralston Purina and Castle & Cooke.[44]
Ultimately the Forstmann consortium came apart and did not provide a final bid for RJR.[45] Many of the major banking players of the day, including Shearson Lehman Hutton, Drexel Burnham Lambert, Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Salomon Brothers and Merrill Lynch were actively involved in advising and financing the parties.




Oreo cookies, one of RJR Nabisco's products


In November 1988, RJR set guidelines for a final bid submission at the end of the month.[46] The management and Shearson group submitted a final bid of $112, a figure they felt certain would enable them to outflank any response by Kravis and KKR. KKR's final bid of $109, while a lower dollar figure, was ultimately accepted by the board of directors of RJR Nabisco.[47] KKR's offer was guaranteed, whereas the management offer lacked a "reset", meaning that the final share price might have been lower than their stated $112 per share.[48]
Additionally, many in RJR's board of directors had grown concerned at recent disclosures of Ross Johnson' unprecedented golden parachute deal.[49][50] Time Magazine featured Ross Johnson on the cover of their December 1988 issue along with the headline, "A Game of Greed: This man could pocket $100 million from the largest corporate takeover in history. Has the buyout craze gone too far?".[51] KKR's offer was welcomed by the board, and, to some observers, it appeared that their elevation of the reset issue as a deal-breaker in KKR's favor was little more than an excuse to reject Ross Johnson's higher payout of $112 per share. Johnson received $53 million from the buyout.[52] KKR collected a $75 million fee in the RJR takeover.[53] At $31.1 billion of transaction value (including assumed debt), RJR Nabisco was by far the largest leveraged buyout in history.[54]
In 2006 and 2007, a number of leveraged buyout transactions were completed which, for the first time, surpassed the RJR Nabisco leveraged buyout in terms of nominal purchase price. The deal was first surpassed in July 2006 by the $33 billion buyout of U.S. hospital operator Hospital Corporation of America, in which KKR participated, though the RJR deal was larger, adjusted for inflation. However, adjusted for inflation, none of the leveraged buyouts of the 2006–07 period would surpass RJR Nabisco. The RJR transaction benefited many of the parties involved. Investment bankers and lawyers who advised KKR walked away with over $1 billion in fees. Kravis and Roberts attracted an unprecedented amount of publicity that turned the cousins into instant celebrities. Size did not, however, guarantee success as the high purchase price and debt load would burden the performance of the investment, which KKR overcame, raising a new investment fund and continuing to invest throughout the 1990s.[55]
Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco[edit]




KKR's headquarters in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street in New York City


The buyout of RJR Nabisco was completed in April 1989 and KKR would spend the early 1990s repaying the RJR's enormous debt load through a series of asset sales and restructuring transactions.[56][57][58] After the RJR Nabisco deal, KKR did not complete a single investment in 1990, the first such year since 1982. They would not complete another major leveraged buyout transaction for more than three years, largely because of the shutdown of the high yield bond market and the collapse of Drexel Burnham Lambert which filed for bankruptcy in February 1990. KKR began to focus primarily on its existing portfolio companies acquired during the buyout boom of the late 1980s. Six of KKR's portfolio companies completed IPOs in 1991, including RJR Nabisco and Duracell.[4]
As the new decade began, KKR began restructuring RJR. In January 1990, it completed the sale of RJR's Del Monte Foods to a group led by Merrill Lynch. KKR had originally identified a group of divisions that it could sell to reduce debt.[59] Over the coming years, RJR would pursue a number of additional restructurings, equity injections and public offerings of stock to provide the company with added financial flexibility. KKR contributed $1.7 billion of new equity into RJR in July 1990 to complete a restructuring of the company's balance sheet that appeased unhappy bondholders. KKR's equity contribution as part of the original leveraged buyout of RJR had been only $1.5 billion.[60][61] In mid-December 1990, RJR announced an exchange offer that would swap debt in RJR for a new public stock in the company, effectively an unusual means of taking RJR public again and simultaneously reducing debt on the company.[62]
RJR issued additional stock to the public in March 1991 to further reduce debt, resulting in an upgrade of the credit rating of RJR's debt from junk to investment grade. KKR began to reduce its ownership in RJR in 1994, when its stock in RJR was used as part of the consideration for its leveraged buyout of Borden, Inc., a producer of food and beverage products, consumer products, and industrial products, in an unprecedented and complex transaction.[63][64] [65][66] The following year, in 1995, KKR would divest itself of its final stake in RJR Nabisco when Borden sold a $638 million block of stock.[67]
While KKR no longer had any ownership of RJR Nabisco by 1995, its original investment would not be fully realized until KKR exited its last investment in 2004. After sixteen years of efforts, including contributing new equity, taking RJR public, asset sales and exchanging shares of RJR for the ownership of Borden, Inc., KKR finally sold the last remnants of its 1989 investment. In July 2004, KKR agreed to sell its stock in Borden Chemical to Apollo Management for $1.2 billion.[68]
Early 1990s: Investments[edit]
In the early 1990s, the absence of an active high yield market prompted KKR to change its tactics, avoiding large leveraged buyouts in favor of industry consolidations through what were described as leveraged buildups or rollups. One of KKR's largest investments in the 1990s was the leveraged buildup of Primedia in partnership with former executives of Macmillan Publishing, which KKR had failed to acquire in 1988.[69] KKR created Primedia's predecessor, K-III Communications,[70] a platform to buy media properties, initially completing the $310 million divisional buyout of the book club division of Macmillan along with the assets of Intertec Publishing Corporation in May 1989.[71][72]
During the early 1990s, K-III continued acquiring publishing assets, including a $650 million acquisition from News Corporation in 1991.[73] K-III went public, however instead of cashing out, KKR continued to make new investments in the company in 1998, 2000 and 2001 to support acquisition activity.[74] In 2005, Primedia redeemed KKR's preferred stock in the company but KKR was estimated to have lost hundreds of millions of dollars on its common stock holdings as the price of the company's stock collapsed.[72]
In 1991, KKR partnered with Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in the 1991 acquisition of the Bank of New England, from the US Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.[75] In January 1996, KKR would exchange its investment for a 7.5% interest in Fleet Bank.[76] KKR completed the 1992 buyout of American Re Corporation from Aetna[77] as well as a 47% interest in TW Corporation, later known as The Flagstar Companies and owner of Denny's in 1992.[78] Among the other notable investments KKR completed in the early 1990s included World Color Press (1993–95),[79] RELTEC Corporation (1995) and Bruno's (1995).[80]
1996–1999[edit]
By the mid-1990s, the debt markets were improving and KKR had moved on from the RJR Nabisco buyout. In 1996, KKR was able to complete the bulk of fundraising for what was then a record $6 billion private equity fund, the KKR 1996 Fund.[81] However, KKR was still burdened by the performance of the RJR investment and repeated obituaries in the media.[82] KKR was required by its investors to reduce the fees it charged and to calculate its carried interest based on the total profit of the fund (i.e., offsetting losses from failed deals against the profits from successful deals).[4]




KKR acquired Regal Cinemas in 1998, only to see the company in bankruptcy by 2000


KKR's activity level would accelerate over the second half of the 1990s making a series of notable investments including Spalding Holdings Corporation and Evenflo (1996),[83] Newsquest (1996),[84] KinderCare Learning Centers (1997),[85] Amphenol Corporation (1997),[86] Randalls Food Markets (1997),[87][88] The Boyds Collection (1998),[89] MedCath Corporation (1998),[90] Willis Group Holdings (1998),[91] Smiths Group (1999), and Wincor Nixdorf (1999).[92]
KKR's largest investment of the 1990s would be one of its least successful. In January 1998, KKR and Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst agreed to the $1.5 billion buyout of Regal Entertainment Group.[93] KKR and Hicks Muse had initially intended to combine Regal with Act III Cinemas, which KKR had acquired in 1997 for $706 million[94] and United Artists Theaters, which Hicks Muse had agreed to acquire for $840 million in November 1997. Shortly after agreeing to the Regal takeover, the deal with United Artists fell apart, destroying the strategy to eliminate costs by building a larger combined company.[95] Two years later, in 2000, Regal encountered significant financial issues and was forced to file for bankruptcy protection; the company passed to billionaire investor Philip Anschutz.[96]
2000–2005[edit]




Shoppers Drug Mart, the Canadian pharmacy was one of several successful buyouts in the early 2000s[97]


At the start of the 21st century, the landscape of large leveraged buyout firms was changing. Several large and storied firms, including Hicks Muse Tate & Furst and Forstmann Little & Company were dragged down by heavy losses in the bursting of the telecom bubble. Although, KKR's track record since RJR Nabisco was mixed, losses on such investments as Regal Entertainment Group, Spalding, Flagstar and Primedia (previously K-III Communications) were offset by successes in Willis Group, Wise Foods, Inc., Wincor Nixdorf and MTU Aero Engines, among others.[4]
Additionally, KKR was one of the few firms that was able to complete large leveraged buyout transactions in the years immediately following the collapse of the Internet bubble, including Shoppers Drug Mart and Bell Canada Yellow Pages.[4][98] KKR was able to realize its investment in Shoppers Drug Mart through a 2002 IPO and subsequent public stock offerings.[97] The directories business would be taken public in 2004 as Yellow Pages Income Fund, a Canadian income trust.[99]




KKR led a consortium in the buyout of Toys "R" Us in 2004


In 2004 a consortium comprising KKR, Bain Capital and real estate development company Vornado Realty Trust announced the $6.6 billion acquisition of Toys "R" Us, the toy retailer. A month earlier, Cerberus Capital Management, made a $5.5 billion offer for both the toy and baby supplies businesses.[100] The Toys 'R' Us buyout was one of the largest in several years.[101] Following this transaction, by the end of 2004 and in 2005, major buyouts were once again becoming common and market observers were stunned by the leverage levels and financing terms obtained by financial sponsors in their buyouts.[102]
In 2005, KKR was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. KKR's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Blackstone Group, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1988. SunGard was the largest buyout of a technology company until the Blackstone-led buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction was notable given the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point. The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[103][104]
Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom[edit]
In 2006, KKR raised a new $17.6 billion fund the KKR 2006 Fund, with which the firm began executing a series of some of the largest buyouts in history. KKR's $44 billion takeover of Texas-based power utility, TXU, in 2007, proved to be the largest leveraged buyout of the mid-2000s buyout boom and the largest buyout completed to date.[105] Among the most notable companies acquired by KKR in 2006 and 2007 were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


HCA
2006
KKR and Bain Capital, together with Merrill Lynch and the Frist family (which had founded the company) completed a $31.6 billion acquisition of the hospital company, 17 years after it was taken private for the first time in a management buyout. At the time of its announcement, the HCA buyout would be the first of several to set new records for the largest buyout, eclipsing the 1989 buyout of RJR Nabisco. It would later be surpassed by the buyouts of Equity Office Properties, and TXU.
[106]


NXP Semiconductors
2006
In August 2006, a consortium of KKR, Silver Lake Partners and AlpInvest Partners acquired a controlling 80.1% share of semiconductors unit of Philips for €6.4 billion. The new company, based in the Netherlands, was renamed NXP Semiconductors.
[107]


TDC A/S
2006
The Danish phone company was acquired by KKR, Apax Partners, Providence Equity Partners and Permira for €12.2 billion ($15.3 billion), which at the time made it the second largest European buyout in history.
[108][109]


Dollar General
2007
KKR completed a buyout of the chain of discount stores operating in the U.S.
[110]


Alliance Boots
2007
KKR and Stefano Pessina, the company’s deputy chairman and largest shareholder, acquired the UK drug store retailer for £12.4 billion ($24.8 billion) including assumed debt, after increasing their bid more than 40% amidst intense competition from Terra Firma Capital Partners and Wellcome Trust. The buyout came only a year after the merger of Boots Group plc (Boots the Chemist), and Alliance UniChem plc.
[111][112]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone Group, KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[113]


First Data
2007
KKR and TPG Capital completed the $29 billion buyout of the credit and debit card payment processor and former parent of Western Union. Michael Capellas, previously the CEO of MCI Communications and Compaq was named CEO of the privately held company.
[114][115]


TXU (Energy Future Holdings)
2007
An investor group led by KKR and TPG Capital and together with Goldman Sachs completed the $44.37 billion[116] buyout of the regulated utility and power producer. The investor group had to work closely with ERCOT regulators to gain approval of the transaction but had significant experience with the regulators from their earlier buyout of Texas Genco. TXU is the largest buyout in history, and retained this distinction when the announced buyout of BCE failed to close in December 2008. The deal was notable for a drastic change in environmental policy for the energy giant, in terms of its carbon emissions from coal power plants and funding alternative energy.
[117][118]


Other non-buyout investments completed by KKR during this period included Legg Mason, Sun Microsystems, Tarkett, Longview Power Plant and Seven Network. In October 2006, KKR acquired a 50% stake in Tarkett, a France-based distributor of flooring products, in a deal valued at about €1.4 billion ($1.8 billion). On November 20, 2006, KKR announced it would form a A$4 billion partnership with the Seven Network of Australia.[119] On January 23, 2007, KKR announced it would invest $700 million through a PIPE investment in Sun Microsystems.[120] In January 2008, KKR announced it had made a $1.25 billion PIPE investment in Legg Mason through a convertible preferred stock offering.[121]
In addition to its successful buyout transactions, KKR was involved in the failed buyout of Harman International Industries (NYSE: HAR), an upscale audio equipment maker. On April 26, 2007, Harman announced it had entered an agreement to be acquired by KKR and Goldman Sachs.[122] As the financing markets became more adverse [clarification needed] in the summer of 2007, the buyout was on tenuous ground. In September 2007, KKR and Goldman backed out of the $8 billion buyout of Harman. By the end of the day, Harman's shares had plummeted by more than 24% upon the news.[123]


Selected Kohlberg Kravis Roberts 2006–2008 Investments













Hospital Corporation of America 













NXP Semiconductors 













Dollar General 













Alliance Boots 













TXU 













Sun Microsystems 













Legg Mason 






Initial public offering[edit]
In 2007, KKR filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission[3] to raise $1.25 billion by selling an ownership interest in its management company.[124] The filing came less than two weeks after the initial public offering of rival private equity firm Blackstone Group. KKR had previously listed its KPE vehicle in 2006, but for the first time, KKR would offer investors an ownership interest in the management company itself. The onset of the credit crunch and the shutdown of the IPO market dampened the prospects of obtaining a valuation attractive to KKR. The flotation was repeatedly postponed, and called off by the end of August.[125]
The following year, in July 2008, KKR announced a new plan to list its shares. The plan called for KKR to complete a reverse takeover of its listed affiliate KKR Private Equity Investors in exchange for a 21% interest in the firm.[126] In November 2008, KKR announced a delay of this transaction until 2009. Shares of KPE had declined significantly in the second half of 2008 with the onset of the credit crunch. KKR has announced that it expects to close the transaction in 2009.[127] In October 2009, KKR listed shares in KKR & Co. on the Euronext exchange, replacing KPE and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange in 2010. The public entity represents a 30% interest in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts. In October 2010, KKR acquired about nine members of Goldman Sachs Group proprietary trading team after entertaining offers from investment firms such as Perella Weinberg and Blackrock. With Goldman shutting down its proprietary trading operations, its executives, led by Bob Howard, will help KKR expand beyond leveraged buyouts into areas such as hedge funds.
2010 to present day[edit]
In January 2014, KKR acquired Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc for $2.4 billion from two private equity companies - Stone Point, and Hellman & Friedman.[128]
In June 2014, KKR announced it was taking a one-third stake in a Spanish energy business of Acciona Energy, at a cost of €417 million ($567 million). The international renewable energy generation business operates renewable assets, largely wind farms, across 14 countries including the United States, Italy and South Africa.[129]
In August 2014, KKR announced it was investing $400 million to acquire Fujian Sunner Development, China's largest chicken farmer, which breeds, processes and supplies frozen and fresh chickens to consumers and corporate clients, such as KFC and McDonald's, across China.[130]
In September 2014, the firm invested $90 million in a lighting and electrics firm Savant Systems.[131]
In January 2015, KKR confirmed its purchase of British rail ticket website thetrainline.com, previously owned by Exponent. The purchase sum is unknown.[132]
On October 12, 2015, KKR announced that it has entered into definitive agreement with Allianz Capital Partners to acquire their majority stake in Selecta Group, a European vending services operator.[133]
On September 1, 2016, KKR announced that it had acquired Epicor Software Corporation, an American software company.[134]
In October 2016, it was reported that KKR invested $250 million in OVH to be used for further international expansion.[135] This funding round valued OVH at over $1 billion, making it a unicorn.
In December 2016, the Lonza Group announced it would acquire Capsugel for $5.5 billion from Kohlberg Kravis Roberts.[136]
In February 2017 KKR were reported to be trying to take over the international market research company ARI GfK SE.[137] In July of the same year KKR acquired WebMD Health Corp for $2.8 billion.[138]
Notable current and former employees[edit]
Over the years, KKR has seen the departure of many of its original partners, the most notable being original co-founder Jerome Kohlberg. After a leave of absence due to an illness in 1985, Kohlberg returned to find increasing differences in strategy with his partners Kravis and Roberts.[139] In 1987, Kohlberg left KKR to found a new private equity firm Kohlberg & Company. Kohlberg & Company returned to the investment style that Kohlberg had originally practiced at Bear Stearns and in KKR's earlier years, acquiring smaller, middle-market companies.[4][140][141]
Since 1996, general partners of KKR have included Henry Kravis, George R. Roberts, Paul Raether, Robert MacDonnell, Jose Gandarillas, Michael Michelson, Saul Fox, James Greene, Michael Tokarz, Clifton Robbins, Scott Stuart, Perry Golkin and Edward Gilhuly.[142] Among those who left were Saul Fox, Ted Ammon, Ned Gilhuly, Mike Tokarz and Scott Stuart who had been instrumental in establishing KKR's reputation and track record in the 1980s.[143] KKR remains tightly controlled by Kravis and Roberts. The issue of succession has remained an important consideration for KKR's future as an ongoing institutionalized firm.

Scott C. Nuttall (born 1972), heads KKR's fastest-growing department, the Global Capital and Asset Management Group, which includes Asset Management, Capital Markets and Client and Partner Group. He joined KKR in November 1996 after leaving the Blackstone Group. His group, the firm's fastest-growing division, has $25 billion under management. With the support of co-founder George Roberts, Nuttall has largely spearheaded the campaign to expand KKR beyond its institutional investors (legacy and otherwise) into credit investment, and alternative investments, pointing out that there are billions "in revenues up for grabs".[144][145][146] He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Joseph Bae on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. He will concentrate on KKR's corporate and real estate credit, capital markets, hedge fund and capital raising businesses together with the firm's corporate development, balance sheet and strategic growth initiatives.[147] New York Times called him and Joseph Bae as potential successors.[148] He graduated from University of Pennsylvania with a Bachelor of Science degree.
Joseph Bae (born circa 1972) joined KKR from Goldman Sachs in 1996. Most recently, he was the Managing Partner of KKR Asia and the Global Head of KKR's Infrastructure and Energy Real Asset businesses. Mr. Bae has been the architect of KKR's Asian expansion since 2005. He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Scott Nuttall on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. Mr. Bae will focus on KKR's global private equity businesses as well as the Firm's real asset platforms across energy, infrastructure and real estate private equity.[147] He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree from Harvard College.
Saul A. Fox left KKR in 1997 to found Fox Paine & Company, a middle market private equity firm with over $1.5 billion of capital under management[149][150]
Clifton S. Robbins left KKR to join competitor General Atlantic Partners in 2000 and later founded Blue Harbour Group,[151] a private investment firm based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[152]
Edward A. Gilhuly and Scott Stuart left KKR in 2004 to launch Sageview Capital. Prior to this, Gilhuly was the managing partner of KKR's European operations, based in London; Stuart managed KKR's energy and consumer products industry groups.[152]
Ted Ammon, started several new ventures including Big Flower Press, which printed newspaper circulars, and Chancery Lane Capital, a boutique private equity firm, before being murdered in his Long Island home October 2001. The lover of his estranged, now deceased wife, Generosa, was later convicted.[152][153][154][155]
Paul Hazen, served as chairman and CEO of Wells Fargo (1995–2001).[156] Hazen later returned to KKR to serve as chairman of Accel-KKR, a joint venture with Accel Partners and later as chairman of KKR's publicly listed affiliate, KFN.
Clive Hollick, Baron Hollick, CEO of United News and Media (1996–2005)
Ken Mehlman joined KKR in 2008 as Global Head of Public Affairs.[157]
David Petraeus, selected to serve as chairman of the newly formed KKR Global Institute (2013—present)[158]
Joseph Grundfest, Professor at Stanford Law School and youngest SEC Commissioner

Works about KKR[edit]


Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
Anders, George (1992). Merchants of Debt: KKR and the Mortgaging of American Business. New York: BasicBooks. ISBN 978-0-465-04522-8. 
Bartlett, Sarah (1991). The Money Machine: How KKR Manufactured Power & Profits. New York: Warner Books. ISBN 978-0-446-51608-2. 
Burrough, Bryan (1990). Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-016172-8. 


See also[edit]

Jerome Kohlberg
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts

Notes[edit]


^ a b c KKR locations (company Web site); retrieved March 8, 2010. Archived January 18, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ http://ir.kkr.com/common/download/download.cfm?companyid=KKR&fileid=930140&filekey=C070EEBD-B0D9-49A9-8346-B3E15E803AA6&filename=SEC-KKR-1404912-17-5.pdf
^ a b c d KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ a b c d e f g h i Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Company History. Funding Universe; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "What's An Aging 'Barbarian' To Do?" The New York Times, August 26, 2001.
^ What Does Henry Kravis Want?. The New York Times, September 6, 2008
^ KKR Investment History (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR to Relocate Corporate Headquarters to Manhattan’s Transformative New Neighborhood on the West Side | Business Wire". www.businesswire.com. Retrieved 2015-12-31. 
^ "KKR Files for NYSE Listing", March 17, 2010.
^ a b 2007 KKR Annual Review[dead link]; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Canada Pension Plan Unit to Join K.K.R. Merchant Banking Venture", New York Times (Dealbook Section), January 17, 2013.
^ a b "Several Giant Pension Funds Investing in Offer for Nabisco". The New York Times, October 31, 1988.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form 10-Q, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 31, 2014
^ a b "KKR Financial REIT IPO debuts: Kohlberg Kravis Roberts manages trust", Marketwatch.com, June 24, 2005.
^ KKR arm in talks after fresh repayment delays. Reuters, February 20, 2008.
^ "Kohlberg Affiliate Sells Stake in Unit", Reuters, April 1, 2008.
^ "Opening Private Equity's Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors". The New York Times, May 4, 2006.
^ Timmons, Heather. "Private Equity Goes Public for $5 Billion. Its Investors Ask, ‘What's Next?’". The New York Times, November 10, 2006
^ Anderson, Jenny. "Where Private Equity Goes, Hedge Funds May Follow", New York Times, June 23, 2006.
^ KKR Private Equity Investors Reports Results for Quarter Ended March 31, 2008 Archived March 20, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.. KKR Private Equity Investors Press Release, May 7, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ see pdf-document, retrieved in January 2015
^ statement on KKR-leaflet, retrieved in January 2015
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row, 1990; pp. 133-136.
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate (New York: Harper & Row, 1990), pp. 136-140.
^ Holland, Max (1989), When the Machine Stopped: A Cautionary Tale from Industrial America, Boston: Harvard Business School Press, ISBN 978-0-87584-208-0, OCLC 246343673. , pp. 149–169.
^ Malone & Hyde Accepts Bid The New York Times, June 12, 1984.
^ Wayne, Leslie. "Wometco Agrees To Buyout", The New York Times. September 22, 1983.
^ Dodson, Steve. "Beatrice Deal Is Biggest Buyout Yet". The New York Times, November 17, 1985.
^ Sterngold, James. "Drexel's Role in Beatrice Deal Examined". The New York Times, April 28, 1988.
^ Fisher, Lawrence M. Safeway Buyout: A Success Story. The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ Feder, Barnaby. "Asbestos: The Saga Drags On". The New York Times, April 2, 1989.
^ "Chapter 11 For Kohlberg, Kravis Unit". The New York Times, December 28, 1989.
^ "The Granddaddy Of All Takeovers", The New York Times Book Review, January 21, 1990.
^ "Nabisco Executives Offer $17 Billion for Company". The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ "Shearson Risks, Rewards on RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 22, 1988.
^ "Nabisco Bid Seen by Kohlberg". The New York Times, October 24, 1988.
^ "Buyout Specialist Bids $20.3 Billion For RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 25, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bid Gives New Respectability To Giant Deals Financed With Huge Debt". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "Concern Over Kohlberg, Kravis Strategy". The New York Times, November 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bidders Said to Talk". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "The Nabisco Battle's Key Moment". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ Joint Deal For Nabisco Is Rejected. The New York Times, October 27, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Will Give Kohlberg, Kravis Data. The New York Times, October 27, 1988
^ Forstmann Declines to Bid on RJR Nabisco. The New York Times, November 17, 1988.
^ "Suitors Quarrel Over RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, November 8, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Discloses Guidelines for Its Buyout. The New York Times, November 9, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Suitor Claims $24.88 Billion Victory". The New York Times, December 1, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Explains Its Choice". The New York Times, December 8, 1988
^ "Nabisco Executives to Take Huge Gains in Their Buyout". The New York Times, November 5, 1988.
^ "A Growing Backlash Against Greed". The New York Times, November 13, 1988
^ "Game of Greed", Time Magazine (1988)
^ "Losers Get Some Spoils In Fight for RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, December 2, 1988
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Collect $75 Million RJR Nabisco Fee". The New York Times, February 1, 1989.
^ "RJR Nabisco, An Epilogue". The New York Times, March 12, 1999.
^ "2 Buyout Firms Build New Funds". The New York Times, November 23, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Now RJR's Owner". Associated Press, April 29, 1989.
^ "History Of The RJR Nabisco Takeover". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "Is RJR Worth $25 Billion?" The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Completes Sale of Del Monte". The New York Times, January 11, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts Loan to RJR Renegotiated". The New York Times, June 27, 1990.
^ "RJR Move Helps Lift 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, July 17, 1990.
^ "RJR Offers Cash and Stock for 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, December 18, 1990.
^ Agrees to a Takeover. The New York Times, September 13, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg's Impetus in Borden Deal". The New York Times, September 14, 1994.
^ "Borden Signs Agreement for Sale to Kohlberg". The New York Times, September 24, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Says It Has Control of Borden". The New York Times, December 22, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans to Divest Remaining Stake in RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, March 16, 1995.
^ "Apollo Buys Borden Chemical for $649 million". The New York Times, July 7, 2004.
^ "Kohlberg Ends Bid for Macmillan". The New York Times, November 4, 1988.
^ K-III's New Name To Be 'Primedia'. The New York Times, November 1, 1997.
^ "Macmillan Book Club Unit And a Publisher Being Sold". The New York Times, May 23, 1989.
^ a b "As Primedia Falls, Preferred Stock Lives Up to Its Name". The New York Times, October 26, 2005.
^ Kravis Rouses Itself, The New York Times, April 29, 1991
^ "K-III Communications Files Plan For an Initial Offering of Stock". The New York Times, September 6, 1995.
^ Regulators Pick Buyer To Operate New England Bank. The New York Times, April 23, 1991.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis in Swap for 7.5% of Fleet". The New York Times, January 3, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis in Aetna Reinsurance Deal". The New York Times, June 9, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans Stake in TW". The New York Times, June 26, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg Unit to Buy Alden Press". The New York Times, January 19, 1993.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Acquire Bruno's Supermarket Chain". The New York Times, April 21, 1995.
^ "$5 Billion Fund By Kohlberg Seen". The New York Times, September 13, 1996.
^ "At K.K.R., the Glory Days Are Past". The New York Times, August 10, 1995.
^ "Kohlberg Plans Stake In Spalding And Evenflo". The New York Times, August 16, 1996.
^ "Newsquest Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Will Buy Kindercare for $467 Million". The New York Times, October 4, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Set to Offer $1.2 Billion for Cable Maker". The New York Times, January 24, 1997.
^ Roundup, An Interactive Edition News (1997-06-28). "KKR Completes Purchase Of Randalls for $225 Million". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2016-12-19. 
^ "Supermarkets Get a Brand New Bag". The New York Times, August 31, 1997.
^ "The Boyds Collection, Ltd. Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis And Welsh Carson Acquiring Medcath". The New York Times, March 14, 1998.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis-Led Group To Buy Big Insurance Broker". The New York Times, July 23, 1998.
^ "Wincor Nixdorf Holding Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ 2 Buyout Firms Make Deal To Acquire Regal Cinemas. The New York Times, January 21, 1998
^ Kohlberg Kravis In $660 Million Deal For Act III Cinemas. The New York Times, October 21, 1997.
^ "Amid Blame, United Artists Sale Collapses". The New York Times, February 23, 1998.
^ "Regal Cinemas Considers Filing For Bankruptcy". The New York Times, November 16, 2000.
^ a b Shoppers Drug Mart Sells Shares. Retail Merchandiser, March 17, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "BCE Sells Directory Unit". The New York Times, November 30, 2002.
^ "Yellow Pages Income Fund Announces, 43 Million Offering"[permanent dead link]. Yellow Pages Group press release, May 26, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Rozhon, Tracie. "Three Firms Are Said to Buy Toys 'R' Us for $6 Billion". New York Times, March 17, 2005.
^ What's Next for Toys 'R' Us?. The Wall Street Journal, March 18, 2005.
^ "Deal Mania: Shades of the '80s: The leveraged buyout is back in vogue" Archived 2008-11-01 at the Wayback Machine.. US News & World Report, April 10, 2005.
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal". The New York Times, March 29, 2005.
^ "Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?" The New York Times, April 3, 2005.
^ K.K.R., Texas Pacific Plan Record Buyout of TXU. The New York Times, February 23, 2007.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross. "HCA Buyout Highlights Era of Going Private". The New York Times, July 25, 2006.
^ Bloomberg News (August 4, 2006). "Technology; Royal Philips Sells Unit for $4.4 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ "Takeover firms will pay $15.3b to buy Danish phone giant TDC." Bloomberg, December 1, 2005
^ "TDC-One year on." Dow Jones Private Equity News, January 22, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Peters, Jeremy W. (March 13, 2007). "Buyout Firm Is Acquiring Dollar General Retail Chain". The New York Times. Retrieved January 4, 2009. 
^ Werdigier, Julia. "Equity Firm Wins Bidding for a Retailer, Alliance Boots". The New York Times, April 25, 2007.
^ "Terra Firma drops Boots bid plan". BBC. April 24, 2007. 
^ De la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer". New York Times, June 8, 2007
^ "KKR Offer of $26 Billion Is Accepted by First Data". Reuters, April 3, 2007
^ "Kohlberg Kravis to Buy First Data for $29 Billion". The New York Times, April 3, 2007.
^ Source: Thomson Financial
^ Lonkevich, Dan and Klump, Edward. KKR, Texas Pacific Will Acquire TXU for $45 Billion Bloomberg.com, February 26, 2007.
^ Skariachan, Dhanya (February 26, 2007). "KKR, Texas Pacific-led group to buy TXU Corp". Reuters. 
^ "Seven in $4bn asset sell-off" Archived 2007-11-14 at the Wayback Machine.. News.com.au, November 20, 2006
^ "Sun Microsystems Welcomes Endorsement and Investment From KKR". Sun Microsystems Press Release, January 23, 2007 Archived September 29, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Legg Mason Makes Deal With Equity Firm". Reuters, January 15, 2008
^ Harman International Industries to be Acquired by KKR and GS Capital Partners. Harman International press release, April 26, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived July 4, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Wary Buyers May Scuttle Two Deals". The New York Times, September 22, 2007.
^ Jenny Anderson and Michael J. de la Merced. "Kohlberg Kravis Plans to Go Public", The New York Times, July 4, 2007.
^ "KKR postpones $1.25 bn float as credit chaos deters buyers". The Times (UK), August 23, 2007.
^ After Delay, KKR Finds a Way to Go Public. The New York Times, July 28, 2008.
^ K.K.R. Calls Listing Delay ‘Process Related’. The New York Times, November 3, 2008.
^ Neha Dimri; Aman Shah (28 January 2014). "KKR to take control of Sedgwick Claims Management in $2.4 billion deal". Reuters. 
^ "Equity investor KKR picks stakes in Acciona Energia unit for 417mn euros". Spain News.Net. Retrieved 24 June 2014. 
^ "KKR to acquire China chicken developer for $400 mn". Business Sun. 26 August 2014. Retrieved 27 August 2014. 
^ KKR invests in smart home tech company Savant Systems. Reuters, 4 September 2014
^ "Deals of the day - Mergers and acquisitions". Reuters. Retrieved 2015-01-22. 
^ "KKR | KKR agrees to acquire majority stake in Selecta from ACP". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2015-10-12. 
^ "Epicor Announces Close of KKR Acquisition and Executive Leadership Appointments to Accelerate Growth Strategy". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2016-09-01. 
^ "Klaba Family OVH, Europe No. 1 Web Host, Raises €250M from $KKR, TowerBrook". exithub. Retrieved 14 January 2017. 
^ "Lonza Buys Capsugel for $5.5B Cash - GEN Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News - Biotech from Bench to Business - GEN". GEN. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ Germany, wysiwyg* Software Design GmbH, Düsseldorf,. "Acceleratio Capital N.V.". www.acceleratio-angebot.de. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/us-webmd-m-a-kkr-idUKKBN1A915Y
^ "Buyout Pioneer Quitting Fray". The New York Times, June 19, 1987.
^ Kohlberg In Dispute Over Firm. The New York Times, August 30, 1989.
^ "Kohlberg Suit Settlement". The New York Times, February 23, 1990.
^ Duracell International Inc. SEC Form SC 13G/A ("Statement of acquisition of beneficial ownership"); filed February 6, 1996.
^ Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
^ Scott Nuttall profile at Forbes
^ "A kinder, gentler KKR wants a piece of your 401K", Forbes, January 23, 2013.
^ Profile of Scott Nuttall at investing.businessweek.com, Businessweek.com, January 23, 2013.
^ a b "KKR Appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers". KKR Press Release. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Next Generation at K.K.R. Set as It Names Two Co-Presidents". New York Times. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ ""For Saul Fox, Bigger Isn’t Always Better in the World of Buyouts". foxpaine.com, May 15, 2000. Retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Anders, George. "Bitter End of a Partnership", Wall Street Journal, September 15, 2007.
^ Blue Harbour Group> About Blue Harbour Archived 2008-03-13 at the Wayback Machine. (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ a b c Barbarians at the Gate: Contrasting fortunes for those closest to the deal. eFinancial News, November 3, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Pelosi Found Guilty of Murder". CBS News. December 13, 2004. Retrieved May 17, 2007. 
^ "Murder in East Hampton", Vanity Fair, January 2002.
^ "Mystery of the Murdered Millionaire". Dateline NBC; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Paul M. Hazen profile as Wells Fargo & Co. Chairman and CEO Archived 2005-09-14 at the Wayback Machine.; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Mehlman profile at KKR website Archived 2013-07-30 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR names former CIA head Petraeus as chairman of new institute". 30 May 2013. Retrieved 5 June 2017 – via Reuters. 


References[edit]


FT.com / Industries / Basic industries – "KKR set to buy Masonite for C$3.1bn"
Gross, Daniel & David Sterling. "Has Henry Kravis gone soft?". Slate, August 5, 2007; retrieved August 7, 2007.
The KKR Way. Bloomberg Markets, August 2007
"The barbarians at the gate have been losing their Midas touch". timesonline.co.uk, August 6, 2005; retrieved February 16, 2009.


External links[edit]

Yahoo! – Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. company profile







v
t
e


Kohlberg Kravis Roberts



Founders



Jerome Kohlberg Jr.
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts





Selected current investments



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Aricent Group
Bharti Enterprises
Capsugel
CICC
Café Coffee Day
Colonial Pipeline
Del Monte Foods
Dollar General
Eastman Kodak
El Paso Corp.
Energy Future Holdings
First Data
Hospital Corporation of America
KION Group
Laureate Education
Legg Mason
Legrand
Magma Fincorp
Maxeda
Nielsen Holdings
Northgate Information Solutions
NXP Semiconductors
Oriental Brewery
Pets at Home
ProSiebenSat.1 Media
Sealy Corporation
Seven West Media
TDC A/S
Toys "R" Us
US Foods
Visma
Wild
Yageo
Zhone Technologies








 Category












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kohlberg_Kravis_Roberts&oldid=792147823"					
Categories: Kohlberg Kravis RobertsCompanies based in New York CityCompanies established in 1976Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeKohlberg Kravis Roberts companiesMezzanine capital investment firmsPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from January 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with a promotional tone from June 2017All articles with a promotional toneArticles needing cleanup from June 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from June 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from June 2017Wikipedia articles needing style editing from June 2017All articles needing style editingArticles with peacock terms from June 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles that may be too long from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from September 2013Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


CatalàDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 19:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Kohlberg Kravis Roberts - Wikipedia





















 







Kohlberg Kravis Roberts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from KKR)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"KKR" redirects here. For other uses, see KKR (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Too much unnecessary detail and puffery Please help improve this article if you can. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may have too many section headers dividing up its content. Please help improve the article by merging similar sections and removing unneeded subheaders. (June 2017)







This article may contain an excessive amount of intricate detail that may only interest a specific audience. Please help by spinning off or relocating any relevant information, and removing excessive detail that may be against Wikipedia's inclusion policy. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may be too long to read and navigate comfortably. Please consider splitting content into sub-articles, condensing it, or adding or removing subheadings. (June 2017)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



KKR & Co. L.P.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: KKR


Industry
Financial services:
private equity
(1976–present)
investment banking
(2004–present)


Founded
1976; 41 years ago (1976)


Founder
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts
Jerome Kohlberg, Jr.


Headquarters
9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York City, New York 10019
United States



Number of locations

13 offices in 9 countries[1]



Key people

Henry R. Kravis
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)
George R. Roberts
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)


Products
Management buyouts
Leveraged finance
Venture capital
Growth capital


Revenue
US$ 8.896 billion (2013)



Net income

US$ 691.2 million (2013)


AUM
US$ 98.0 billion (2012)


Total assets
US$ 39 billion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

1700 (2017)


Website
www.kkr.com


KKR & Co. L.P. (formerly known as Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.) is an American multinational private equity firm, specializing in leveraged buyouts, headquartered in New York City. The firm sponsors and manages private equity investment funds. The firm has completed over $400 billion of private equity transactions since its inception.[3][4]
The firm was founded in 1976 by Jerome Kohlberg, Jr., and cousins Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts, all of whom had previously worked together at Bear Stearns, where they completed some of the earliest leveraged buyout transactions. Since its founding, KKR has completed a number of transactions including the 1989 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco, which was the largest buyout in history to that point, as well as the 2007 buyout of TXU, which is currently the largest buyout completed to date.[5][6] KKR has completed investments in over 160 companies since 1977, completing at least one investment in every year except in 1982 and in 1990.[7]
KKR has 13 additional offices in the United States, Europe and Asia.[1] The firm is currently located in the Solow Building (9 W. 57th Street), but recently announced its intentions to occupy a newly constructed 30 Hudson Yards.[8]
In October 2009, KKR listed shares in the company through KKR & Co., an affiliate that holds 30% of the firm's ownership equity, with the remainder held by the firm's partners. In March 2010, KKR filed to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE),[9] with trading commencing four months later, on July 15, 2010.



Contents


1 The Firm KKR
2 Investment funds and other affiliates

2.1 Private equity funds
2.2 KKR Financial
2.3 KKR Private Equity Investors


3 History

3.1 Founding and early history
3.2 Buyout of RJR Nabisco
3.3 Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco
3.4 Early 1990s: Investments
3.5 1996–1999
3.6 2000–2005
3.7 Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom
3.8 Initial public offering
3.9 2010 to present day


4 Notable current and former employees
5 Works about KKR
6 See also
7 Notes
8 References
9 External links



The Firm KKR[edit]
KKR is operated by its managing partners Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts and a team of approximately 140 investment professionals and 400 total employees, organized into industry-focused groups.[3] KKR is headquartered in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street, Manhattan, New York, with U.S. offices in Menlo Park, San Francisco, Houston, and Washington, D.C., and offices in London, Paris, Hong Kong, Tokyo, Beijing, Mumbai, Dubai, Seoul, São Paulo and Sydney.[1]
KKR invests primarily through leveraged buyouts as well as growth capital investments (including "PIPE" investments in public companies). It has traditionally specialized in private equity investments, focusing on specific industry sectors where the firm has created nine dedicated investment groups. The industries in which KKR has developed a specialization include:[10]

Chemicals
Consumer products
Energy & natural resources
Financial services
Health care
Industrial
Media and communications
Retail
Technology

The professionals in each of KKR's industry-focused groups are expected to have developed a proficiency in their respective industries.[10] The firm has traditionally had strong ties with its investors.[11]
Investment funds and other affiliates[edit]
Private equity funds[edit]
KKR has historically relied primarily on private equity funds, pools of committed capital that are raised from a broad array of institutional investors (e.g., pension funds, insurance companies, investment banks, commercial banks, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds).[3][12] As of March 31, 2014, KKR had completed fund-raising for approximately 23 traditional investment funds in the US, Europe and Asia with total committed capital of approximately US$80 billion:


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($m)


KKR Fund 1976
1977
$31


KKR Fund 1980
1980
$357


KKR Fund 1982
1982
$328


KKR Fund 1984
1984
$1,000


KKR Fund 1986
1986
$672


KKR Fund 1987
1987
$6,130


KKR Fund 1993
1993
$1,946


KKR Fund 1996
1996
$6,012


KKR European Fund
1999
$3,085


KKR Millennium Fund
2002
$6,000


KKR European Fund II
2005
$5,751


KKR Fund 2006
2006
$17,642


KKR Asian Fund
2007
$4,000


KKR European Fund III
2008
$6,238


KKR E2 Investors (Annex Fund)
2009
$209


KKR China Growth Fund
2010
$1,010


KKR Natural Resources Fund
2010
$876


KKR Infrastructure Fund
2011
$1,043


KKR North America Fund XI
2012
$8,718


KKR Asian Fund II
2013
$5,825


KKR Real Estate Partners Americas
2013
$1,226


KKR Energy Income and Growth Fund
2013
$1,974


Source: SEC Filings[13]
KKR Financial[edit]






Type

Public company (NYSE: KFN)


Founded
2004


Website
www.kkrfinancial.com


KKR Financial (NYSE: KFN) is a real estate investment trust (REIT) and specialty finance company that invests in residential and commercial mortgage loans and mortgage-backed securities as well as corporate loans and debt securities, asset-backed securities and equity securities. KFN was founded in 2004 raising $795 million in a private placement and raised $849 million in a June 2005 initial public offering, increasing the size of the offering from an original $600 million target.[14] KKR had initially considered structuring KFN as a business development company like Apollo Management's Apollo Investment Corporation but chose to pursue the REIT structure to capitalize on the strength in REIT valuations at the time.[14]
KFN was an early casualty of the subprime mortgage crisis and in September 2007, Henry Kravis and George Roberts injected $270 million into the company. On February 20, 2008, KFN was once again forced to delay the repayment of billions of dollars of commercial paper, and began a new round of talks with creditors.[15] In April, KFN sold a controlling interest in a real estate subsidiary to an investment firm to raise cash and entered an agreement with the noteholders of certain secured commercial paper issued by two asset-backed entities. Following the transaction, KFN converted from a REIT to a LLC.[16]
KKR Private Equity Investors[edit]






Type

Public company (Euronext: KPE)


Founded
2006


Website
www.kkrpei.com


KKR Private Equity Investors (Euronext: KPE) is a publicly traded private equity fund that invests as a fund of funds in KKR private equity funds. KPE also co-invests in transactions alongside KKR's private equity funds. KPE was founded in 2006. In May 2006, KKR raised $5 billion in an initial public offering for a KPE to serve as a new permanent investment vehicle listing it on the Euronext exchange in Amsterdam. KKR raised three times more than it expected, as many of the investors in KPE were hedge funds seeking exposure to private equity but could not make long term commitments to private equity funds. As private equity had been booming in preceding years, investing in a KKR fund was attractive to investors.[17]
However, KPE's first-day performance was lackluster, trading down 1.7% and trading volume was limited.[18] Initially, a handful of other private equity firms and hedge funds had planned to follow KKR's lead but shelved those plans when KPE's performance continued to falter after its IPO. KPE's stock declined from an IPO price of €25 per share to €18.16 (a 27% decline) at the end of 2007 and a low of €11.45 (a 54.2% decline) per share in Q1 2008.[19]
KPE disclosed in May 2008 that it had completed approximately $300 million of secondary sales of selected limited partnership interests in, and undrawn commitments to, certain KKR-managed funds in order to generate liquidity and repay borrowings.[20]
In October 2009 KPE changed its name to KKR & Co. (Guernsey) L.P.,[21] which was delisted from Euronext Amsterdam in July 2010 while common units of KKR & Co. L.P. began trading on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “KKR”.[22]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
Running the corporate finance department for Bear Stearns in the 1960s and 1970s, Jerome Kohlberg and later with protégés Henry Kravis and George Roberts completed a series of what they described as "bootstrap" investments beginning in 1964–65. They targeted family-owned businesses, many of which had been founded in the years following World War II which by the 1960s and 1970s were facing succession issues. Many of these companies lacked a viable or attractive exit for their founders as they were too small to be taken public and the founders were reluctant to sell out to competitors and so a sale to a financial buyer could prove attractive.[4]




Henry Kravis speaking at the World Economic Forum in 2009


Their acquisition of Orkin Exterminating Company in 1964 is among the first significant leveraged buyout transactions. In the following years the three Bear Stearns bankers would complete a series of buyouts including Stern Metals (1965), Incom (a division of Rockwood International, 1971), Cobblers Industries (1971), and Boren Clay (1973), as well as Thompson Wire, Eagle Motors and Barrows through their investment in Stern Metals. Despite a number of highly successful investments, the $27 million investment in Cobblers ended in bankruptcy.[23]
By 1976, tensions [clarification needed] had built up between Bear Stearns and Kohlberg, Kravis and Roberts, which led to the formation of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in that year. Most notably, Bear Stearns executive Cy Lewis had rejected repeated proposals to form a dedicated investment fund within Bear Stearns and Lewis took exception to the amount of time spent on outside activities. In 1976, Kravis had been required to serve as interim CEO of a failing direct mail company named Advo.[citation needed]
The new KKR completed its first buyout, that of manufacturer A.J. Industries, in 1977. KKR raised capital from a small group of investors including the Hillman Company and First Chicago Bank. By 1978, with the revision of the ERISA regulations, the nascent KKR was successful in raising its first institutional fund with over $30 million of investor commitments.[24] In 1981, KKR expanded its investor base significantly when the Oregon State Treasury's public pension fund invested in KKR's acquisition of retailer Fred Meyer, Inc. Oregon State remains an active investor in KKR funds.[4]
KKR closed out the 1970s completing the public-to-private buyout of Houdaille Industries in 1979,[25] probably the largest take-private of a public company to that point. As the 1980s began, KKR was among the most prominent practitioner of leveraged buyouts and would prove the most prolific of the private equity investors in the 1980s.[4] Among the firm's most notable acquisitions during the 1980s buyout boom were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


Malone & Hyde
1984
KKR completed the first buyout of a public company by tender offer, by acquiring the food distributor and supermarket operator together with the company's chairman Joseph R. Hyde III.
[26]


Wometco Enterprises
1984
KKR completed the first billion-dollar buyout transaction to acquire the leisure-time company with interests in television, movie theaters and tourist attractions. The buyout comprised the acquisition of 100% of the outstanding shares for $842 million and the assumption of $170 million of the company's outstanding debt.
[27]


Beatrice Companies
1985
KKR sponsored the $6.1 billion management buyout of Beatrice, which owned Samsonite and Tropicana among other consumer brands. At the time of its closing in 1985, Beatrice was the largest buyout completed.
[28][29]


Safeway
1986
KKR completed a friendly $5.5 billion buyout of Safeway to help management avoid hostile overtures from Herbert and Robert Haft of Dart Drug. Safeway was taken public again in 1990.
[30]


Jim Walter Corp.
(later Walter Industries)
1987
KKR acquired the company for $3.3 billion in early 1988 but faced issues with the buyout almost immediately. Most notably, a subsidiary of Jim Walter Corp (Celotex) faced a large asbestos lawsuit and incurred liabilities that the courts ruled would need to be satisfied by the parent company. In 1989, the holding company which KKR used for the Jim Walter buyout filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
[31][32]


Buyout of RJR Nabisco[edit]
Main article: RJR Nabisco
After the 1987 resignation of Jerome Kohlberg at age 61 (he later founded his own private equity firm, Kohlberg & Co.), Henry Kravis succeeded him as senior partner. Under Kravis and Roberts, the firm was responsible for the 1988 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco. RJR Nabisco proved to be not only the largest buyout in history to that time, at $25 billion ($31.1 billion, including assumed debt) as well as a high-water mark and sign of the end of the 1980s buyout boom. RJR—Nabisco, which would remain the largest buyout for the next 17 years, was chronicled in Barbarians at the Gate: The Fall of RJR Nabisco, and later made into a television movie starring James Garner.[33]
In 1988, F. Ross Johnson was the President and CEO of RJR Nabisco, formed in 1985 by the merger of Nabisco Brands and R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company, a leading producer of food products (Shredded Wheat, Oreo cookies, Ritz crackers, Planters peanuts, Life Savers, Del Monte Fruit and Vegetables, and Snickers Chocolate) as well as Winston, Camel and Salem cigarettes. In October 1988, Johnson proposed a $17 billion ($75 per share) management buyout of the company with the financial backing of investment bank Shearson Lehman Hutton and its parent company, American Express.[34][35]
Several days later, Kravis, who had originally suggested the idea of the buyout to Johnson, presented a new bid for $20.3 billion ($90 per share) financed with an aggressive debt package.[36][37][38] KKR had the support of significant equity co-investments from leading pension funds and other institutional investors. Investors included Coca-Cola, Georgia-Pacific and United Technologies corporate pension funds, as well as endowments from MIT, Harvard and the New York State Common Retirement Fund[12] However, KKR faced criticism from existing investors over the firm's use of hostile tactics in the buyout of RJR.[39]
KKR proposed to provide a joint offer with Johnson and Shearson Lehman but was rebuffed and Johnson attempted to stonewall KKR's access to financial information from RJR.[40][41][42][43] Rival private equity firm, Forstmann Little & Co. was invited into the process by Shearson Lehman but attempted to provide a bid for RJR with a consortium of Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Procter & Gamble, Ralston Purina and Castle & Cooke.[44]
Ultimately the Forstmann consortium came apart and did not provide a final bid for RJR.[45] Many of the major banking players of the day, including Shearson Lehman Hutton, Drexel Burnham Lambert, Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Salomon Brothers and Merrill Lynch were actively involved in advising and financing the parties.




Oreo cookies, one of RJR Nabisco's products


In November 1988, RJR set guidelines for a final bid submission at the end of the month.[46] The management and Shearson group submitted a final bid of $112, a figure they felt certain would enable them to outflank any response by Kravis and KKR. KKR's final bid of $109, while a lower dollar figure, was ultimately accepted by the board of directors of RJR Nabisco.[47] KKR's offer was guaranteed, whereas the management offer lacked a "reset", meaning that the final share price might have been lower than their stated $112 per share.[48]
Additionally, many in RJR's board of directors had grown concerned at recent disclosures of Ross Johnson' unprecedented golden parachute deal.[49][50] Time Magazine featured Ross Johnson on the cover of their December 1988 issue along with the headline, "A Game of Greed: This man could pocket $100 million from the largest corporate takeover in history. Has the buyout craze gone too far?".[51] KKR's offer was welcomed by the board, and, to some observers, it appeared that their elevation of the reset issue as a deal-breaker in KKR's favor was little more than an excuse to reject Ross Johnson's higher payout of $112 per share. Johnson received $53 million from the buyout.[52] KKR collected a $75 million fee in the RJR takeover.[53] At $31.1 billion of transaction value (including assumed debt), RJR Nabisco was by far the largest leveraged buyout in history.[54]
In 2006 and 2007, a number of leveraged buyout transactions were completed which, for the first time, surpassed the RJR Nabisco leveraged buyout in terms of nominal purchase price. The deal was first surpassed in July 2006 by the $33 billion buyout of U.S. hospital operator Hospital Corporation of America, in which KKR participated, though the RJR deal was larger, adjusted for inflation. However, adjusted for inflation, none of the leveraged buyouts of the 2006–07 period would surpass RJR Nabisco. The RJR transaction benefited many of the parties involved. Investment bankers and lawyers who advised KKR walked away with over $1 billion in fees. Kravis and Roberts attracted an unprecedented amount of publicity that turned the cousins into instant celebrities. Size did not, however, guarantee success as the high purchase price and debt load would burden the performance of the investment, which KKR overcame, raising a new investment fund and continuing to invest throughout the 1990s.[55]
Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco[edit]




KKR's headquarters in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street in New York City


The buyout of RJR Nabisco was completed in April 1989 and KKR would spend the early 1990s repaying the RJR's enormous debt load through a series of asset sales and restructuring transactions.[56][57][58] After the RJR Nabisco deal, KKR did not complete a single investment in 1990, the first such year since 1982. They would not complete another major leveraged buyout transaction for more than three years, largely because of the shutdown of the high yield bond market and the collapse of Drexel Burnham Lambert which filed for bankruptcy in February 1990. KKR began to focus primarily on its existing portfolio companies acquired during the buyout boom of the late 1980s. Six of KKR's portfolio companies completed IPOs in 1991, including RJR Nabisco and Duracell.[4]
As the new decade began, KKR began restructuring RJR. In January 1990, it completed the sale of RJR's Del Monte Foods to a group led by Merrill Lynch. KKR had originally identified a group of divisions that it could sell to reduce debt.[59] Over the coming years, RJR would pursue a number of additional restructurings, equity injections and public offerings of stock to provide the company with added financial flexibility. KKR contributed $1.7 billion of new equity into RJR in July 1990 to complete a restructuring of the company's balance sheet that appeased unhappy bondholders. KKR's equity contribution as part of the original leveraged buyout of RJR had been only $1.5 billion.[60][61] In mid-December 1990, RJR announced an exchange offer that would swap debt in RJR for a new public stock in the company, effectively an unusual means of taking RJR public again and simultaneously reducing debt on the company.[62]
RJR issued additional stock to the public in March 1991 to further reduce debt, resulting in an upgrade of the credit rating of RJR's debt from junk to investment grade. KKR began to reduce its ownership in RJR in 1994, when its stock in RJR was used as part of the consideration for its leveraged buyout of Borden, Inc., a producer of food and beverage products, consumer products, and industrial products, in an unprecedented and complex transaction.[63][64] [65][66] The following year, in 1995, KKR would divest itself of its final stake in RJR Nabisco when Borden sold a $638 million block of stock.[67]
While KKR no longer had any ownership of RJR Nabisco by 1995, its original investment would not be fully realized until KKR exited its last investment in 2004. After sixteen years of efforts, including contributing new equity, taking RJR public, asset sales and exchanging shares of RJR for the ownership of Borden, Inc., KKR finally sold the last remnants of its 1989 investment. In July 2004, KKR agreed to sell its stock in Borden Chemical to Apollo Management for $1.2 billion.[68]
Early 1990s: Investments[edit]
In the early 1990s, the absence of an active high yield market prompted KKR to change its tactics, avoiding large leveraged buyouts in favor of industry consolidations through what were described as leveraged buildups or rollups. One of KKR's largest investments in the 1990s was the leveraged buildup of Primedia in partnership with former executives of Macmillan Publishing, which KKR had failed to acquire in 1988.[69] KKR created Primedia's predecessor, K-III Communications,[70] a platform to buy media properties, initially completing the $310 million divisional buyout of the book club division of Macmillan along with the assets of Intertec Publishing Corporation in May 1989.[71][72]
During the early 1990s, K-III continued acquiring publishing assets, including a $650 million acquisition from News Corporation in 1991.[73] K-III went public, however instead of cashing out, KKR continued to make new investments in the company in 1998, 2000 and 2001 to support acquisition activity.[74] In 2005, Primedia redeemed KKR's preferred stock in the company but KKR was estimated to have lost hundreds of millions of dollars on its common stock holdings as the price of the company's stock collapsed.[72]
In 1991, KKR partnered with Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in the 1991 acquisition of the Bank of New England, from the US Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.[75] In January 1996, KKR would exchange its investment for a 7.5% interest in Fleet Bank.[76] KKR completed the 1992 buyout of American Re Corporation from Aetna[77] as well as a 47% interest in TW Corporation, later known as The Flagstar Companies and owner of Denny's in 1992.[78] Among the other notable investments KKR completed in the early 1990s included World Color Press (1993–95),[79] RELTEC Corporation (1995) and Bruno's (1995).[80]
1996–1999[edit]
By the mid-1990s, the debt markets were improving and KKR had moved on from the RJR Nabisco buyout. In 1996, KKR was able to complete the bulk of fundraising for what was then a record $6 billion private equity fund, the KKR 1996 Fund.[81] However, KKR was still burdened by the performance of the RJR investment and repeated obituaries in the media.[82] KKR was required by its investors to reduce the fees it charged and to calculate its carried interest based on the total profit of the fund (i.e., offsetting losses from failed deals against the profits from successful deals).[4]




KKR acquired Regal Cinemas in 1998, only to see the company in bankruptcy by 2000


KKR's activity level would accelerate over the second half of the 1990s making a series of notable investments including Spalding Holdings Corporation and Evenflo (1996),[83] Newsquest (1996),[84] KinderCare Learning Centers (1997),[85] Amphenol Corporation (1997),[86] Randalls Food Markets (1997),[87][88] The Boyds Collection (1998),[89] MedCath Corporation (1998),[90] Willis Group Holdings (1998),[91] Smiths Group (1999), and Wincor Nixdorf (1999).[92]
KKR's largest investment of the 1990s would be one of its least successful. In January 1998, KKR and Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst agreed to the $1.5 billion buyout of Regal Entertainment Group.[93] KKR and Hicks Muse had initially intended to combine Regal with Act III Cinemas, which KKR had acquired in 1997 for $706 million[94] and United Artists Theaters, which Hicks Muse had agreed to acquire for $840 million in November 1997. Shortly after agreeing to the Regal takeover, the deal with United Artists fell apart, destroying the strategy to eliminate costs by building a larger combined company.[95] Two years later, in 2000, Regal encountered significant financial issues and was forced to file for bankruptcy protection; the company passed to billionaire investor Philip Anschutz.[96]
2000–2005[edit]




Shoppers Drug Mart, the Canadian pharmacy was one of several successful buyouts in the early 2000s[97]


At the start of the 21st century, the landscape of large leveraged buyout firms was changing. Several large and storied firms, including Hicks Muse Tate & Furst and Forstmann Little & Company were dragged down by heavy losses in the bursting of the telecom bubble. Although, KKR's track record since RJR Nabisco was mixed, losses on such investments as Regal Entertainment Group, Spalding, Flagstar and Primedia (previously K-III Communications) were offset by successes in Willis Group, Wise Foods, Inc., Wincor Nixdorf and MTU Aero Engines, among others.[4]
Additionally, KKR was one of the few firms that was able to complete large leveraged buyout transactions in the years immediately following the collapse of the Internet bubble, including Shoppers Drug Mart and Bell Canada Yellow Pages.[4][98] KKR was able to realize its investment in Shoppers Drug Mart through a 2002 IPO and subsequent public stock offerings.[97] The directories business would be taken public in 2004 as Yellow Pages Income Fund, a Canadian income trust.[99]




KKR led a consortium in the buyout of Toys "R" Us in 2004


In 2004 a consortium comprising KKR, Bain Capital and real estate development company Vornado Realty Trust announced the $6.6 billion acquisition of Toys "R" Us, the toy retailer. A month earlier, Cerberus Capital Management, made a $5.5 billion offer for both the toy and baby supplies businesses.[100] The Toys 'R' Us buyout was one of the largest in several years.[101] Following this transaction, by the end of 2004 and in 2005, major buyouts were once again becoming common and market observers were stunned by the leverage levels and financing terms obtained by financial sponsors in their buyouts.[102]
In 2005, KKR was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. KKR's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Blackstone Group, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1988. SunGard was the largest buyout of a technology company until the Blackstone-led buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction was notable given the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point. The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[103][104]
Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom[edit]
In 2006, KKR raised a new $17.6 billion fund the KKR 2006 Fund, with which the firm began executing a series of some of the largest buyouts in history. KKR's $44 billion takeover of Texas-based power utility, TXU, in 2007, proved to be the largest leveraged buyout of the mid-2000s buyout boom and the largest buyout completed to date.[105] Among the most notable companies acquired by KKR in 2006 and 2007 were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


HCA
2006
KKR and Bain Capital, together with Merrill Lynch and the Frist family (which had founded the company) completed a $31.6 billion acquisition of the hospital company, 17 years after it was taken private for the first time in a management buyout. At the time of its announcement, the HCA buyout would be the first of several to set new records for the largest buyout, eclipsing the 1989 buyout of RJR Nabisco. It would later be surpassed by the buyouts of Equity Office Properties, and TXU.
[106]


NXP Semiconductors
2006
In August 2006, a consortium of KKR, Silver Lake Partners and AlpInvest Partners acquired a controlling 80.1% share of semiconductors unit of Philips for €6.4 billion. The new company, based in the Netherlands, was renamed NXP Semiconductors.
[107]


TDC A/S
2006
The Danish phone company was acquired by KKR, Apax Partners, Providence Equity Partners and Permira for €12.2 billion ($15.3 billion), which at the time made it the second largest European buyout in history.
[108][109]


Dollar General
2007
KKR completed a buyout of the chain of discount stores operating in the U.S.
[110]


Alliance Boots
2007
KKR and Stefano Pessina, the company’s deputy chairman and largest shareholder, acquired the UK drug store retailer for £12.4 billion ($24.8 billion) including assumed debt, after increasing their bid more than 40% amidst intense competition from Terra Firma Capital Partners and Wellcome Trust. The buyout came only a year after the merger of Boots Group plc (Boots the Chemist), and Alliance UniChem plc.
[111][112]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone Group, KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[113]


First Data
2007
KKR and TPG Capital completed the $29 billion buyout of the credit and debit card payment processor and former parent of Western Union. Michael Capellas, previously the CEO of MCI Communications and Compaq was named CEO of the privately held company.
[114][115]


TXU (Energy Future Holdings)
2007
An investor group led by KKR and TPG Capital and together with Goldman Sachs completed the $44.37 billion[116] buyout of the regulated utility and power producer. The investor group had to work closely with ERCOT regulators to gain approval of the transaction but had significant experience with the regulators from their earlier buyout of Texas Genco. TXU is the largest buyout in history, and retained this distinction when the announced buyout of BCE failed to close in December 2008. The deal was notable for a drastic change in environmental policy for the energy giant, in terms of its carbon emissions from coal power plants and funding alternative energy.
[117][118]


Other non-buyout investments completed by KKR during this period included Legg Mason, Sun Microsystems, Tarkett, Longview Power Plant and Seven Network. In October 2006, KKR acquired a 50% stake in Tarkett, a France-based distributor of flooring products, in a deal valued at about €1.4 billion ($1.8 billion). On November 20, 2006, KKR announced it would form a A$4 billion partnership with the Seven Network of Australia.[119] On January 23, 2007, KKR announced it would invest $700 million through a PIPE investment in Sun Microsystems.[120] In January 2008, KKR announced it had made a $1.25 billion PIPE investment in Legg Mason through a convertible preferred stock offering.[121]
In addition to its successful buyout transactions, KKR was involved in the failed buyout of Harman International Industries (NYSE: HAR), an upscale audio equipment maker. On April 26, 2007, Harman announced it had entered an agreement to be acquired by KKR and Goldman Sachs.[122] As the financing markets became more adverse [clarification needed] in the summer of 2007, the buyout was on tenuous ground. In September 2007, KKR and Goldman backed out of the $8 billion buyout of Harman. By the end of the day, Harman's shares had plummeted by more than 24% upon the news.[123]


Selected Kohlberg Kravis Roberts 2006–2008 Investments













Hospital Corporation of America 













NXP Semiconductors 













Dollar General 













Alliance Boots 













TXU 













Sun Microsystems 













Legg Mason 






Initial public offering[edit]
In 2007, KKR filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission[3] to raise $1.25 billion by selling an ownership interest in its management company.[124] The filing came less than two weeks after the initial public offering of rival private equity firm Blackstone Group. KKR had previously listed its KPE vehicle in 2006, but for the first time, KKR would offer investors an ownership interest in the management company itself. The onset of the credit crunch and the shutdown of the IPO market dampened the prospects of obtaining a valuation attractive to KKR. The flotation was repeatedly postponed, and called off by the end of August.[125]
The following year, in July 2008, KKR announced a new plan to list its shares. The plan called for KKR to complete a reverse takeover of its listed affiliate KKR Private Equity Investors in exchange for a 21% interest in the firm.[126] In November 2008, KKR announced a delay of this transaction until 2009. Shares of KPE had declined significantly in the second half of 2008 with the onset of the credit crunch. KKR has announced that it expects to close the transaction in 2009.[127] In October 2009, KKR listed shares in KKR & Co. on the Euronext exchange, replacing KPE and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange in 2010. The public entity represents a 30% interest in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts. In October 2010, KKR acquired about nine members of Goldman Sachs Group proprietary trading team after entertaining offers from investment firms such as Perella Weinberg and Blackrock. With Goldman shutting down its proprietary trading operations, its executives, led by Bob Howard, will help KKR expand beyond leveraged buyouts into areas such as hedge funds.
2010 to present day[edit]
In January 2014, KKR acquired Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc for $2.4 billion from two private equity companies - Stone Point, and Hellman & Friedman.[128]
In June 2014, KKR announced it was taking a one-third stake in a Spanish energy business of Acciona Energy, at a cost of €417 million ($567 million). The international renewable energy generation business operates renewable assets, largely wind farms, across 14 countries including the United States, Italy and South Africa.[129]
In August 2014, KKR announced it was investing $400 million to acquire Fujian Sunner Development, China's largest chicken farmer, which breeds, processes and supplies frozen and fresh chickens to consumers and corporate clients, such as KFC and McDonald's, across China.[130]
In September 2014, the firm invested $90 million in a lighting and electrics firm Savant Systems.[131]
In January 2015, KKR confirmed its purchase of British rail ticket website thetrainline.com, previously owned by Exponent. The purchase sum is unknown.[132]
On October 12, 2015, KKR announced that it has entered into definitive agreement with Allianz Capital Partners to acquire their majority stake in Selecta Group, a European vending services operator.[133]
On September 1, 2016, KKR announced that it had acquired Epicor Software Corporation, an American software company.[134]
In October 2016, it was reported that KKR invested $250 million in OVH to be used for further international expansion.[135] This funding round valued OVH at over $1 billion, making it a unicorn.
In December 2016, the Lonza Group announced it would acquire Capsugel for $5.5 billion from Kohlberg Kravis Roberts.[136]
In February 2017 KKR were reported to be trying to take over the international market research company ARI GfK SE.[137] In July of the same year KKR acquired WebMD Health Corp for $2.8 billion.[138]
Notable current and former employees[edit]
Over the years, KKR has seen the departure of many of its original partners, the most notable being original co-founder Jerome Kohlberg. After a leave of absence due to an illness in 1985, Kohlberg returned to find increasing differences in strategy with his partners Kravis and Roberts.[139] In 1987, Kohlberg left KKR to found a new private equity firm Kohlberg & Company. Kohlberg & Company returned to the investment style that Kohlberg had originally practiced at Bear Stearns and in KKR's earlier years, acquiring smaller, middle-market companies.[4][140][141]
Since 1996, general partners of KKR have included Henry Kravis, George R. Roberts, Paul Raether, Robert MacDonnell, Jose Gandarillas, Michael Michelson, Saul Fox, James Greene, Michael Tokarz, Clifton Robbins, Scott Stuart, Perry Golkin and Edward Gilhuly.[142] Among those who left were Saul Fox, Ted Ammon, Ned Gilhuly, Mike Tokarz and Scott Stuart who had been instrumental in establishing KKR's reputation and track record in the 1980s.[143] KKR remains tightly controlled by Kravis and Roberts. The issue of succession has remained an important consideration for KKR's future as an ongoing institutionalized firm.

Scott C. Nuttall (born 1972), heads KKR's fastest-growing department, the Global Capital and Asset Management Group, which includes Asset Management, Capital Markets and Client and Partner Group. He joined KKR in November 1996 after leaving the Blackstone Group. His group, the firm's fastest-growing division, has $25 billion under management. With the support of co-founder George Roberts, Nuttall has largely spearheaded the campaign to expand KKR beyond its institutional investors (legacy and otherwise) into credit investment, and alternative investments, pointing out that there are billions "in revenues up for grabs".[144][145][146] He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Joseph Bae on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. He will concentrate on KKR's corporate and real estate credit, capital markets, hedge fund and capital raising businesses together with the firm's corporate development, balance sheet and strategic growth initiatives.[147] New York Times called him and Joseph Bae as potential successors.[148] He graduated from University of Pennsylvania with a Bachelor of Science degree.
Joseph Bae (born circa 1972) joined KKR from Goldman Sachs in 1996. Most recently, he was the Managing Partner of KKR Asia and the Global Head of KKR's Infrastructure and Energy Real Asset businesses. Mr. Bae has been the architect of KKR's Asian expansion since 2005. He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Scott Nuttall on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. Mr. Bae will focus on KKR's global private equity businesses as well as the Firm's real asset platforms across energy, infrastructure and real estate private equity.[147] He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree from Harvard College.
Saul A. Fox left KKR in 1997 to found Fox Paine & Company, a middle market private equity firm with over $1.5 billion of capital under management[149][150]
Clifton S. Robbins left KKR to join competitor General Atlantic Partners in 2000 and later founded Blue Harbour Group,[151] a private investment firm based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[152]
Edward A. Gilhuly and Scott Stuart left KKR in 2004 to launch Sageview Capital. Prior to this, Gilhuly was the managing partner of KKR's European operations, based in London; Stuart managed KKR's energy and consumer products industry groups.[152]
Ted Ammon, started several new ventures including Big Flower Press, which printed newspaper circulars, and Chancery Lane Capital, a boutique private equity firm, before being murdered in his Long Island home October 2001. The lover of his estranged, now deceased wife, Generosa, was later convicted.[152][153][154][155]
Paul Hazen, served as chairman and CEO of Wells Fargo (1995–2001).[156] Hazen later returned to KKR to serve as chairman of Accel-KKR, a joint venture with Accel Partners and later as chairman of KKR's publicly listed affiliate, KFN.
Clive Hollick, Baron Hollick, CEO of United News and Media (1996–2005)
Ken Mehlman joined KKR in 2008 as Global Head of Public Affairs.[157]
David Petraeus, selected to serve as chairman of the newly formed KKR Global Institute (2013—present)[158]
Joseph Grundfest, Professor at Stanford Law School and youngest SEC Commissioner

Works about KKR[edit]


Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
Anders, George (1992). Merchants of Debt: KKR and the Mortgaging of American Business. New York: BasicBooks. ISBN 978-0-465-04522-8. 
Bartlett, Sarah (1991). The Money Machine: How KKR Manufactured Power & Profits. New York: Warner Books. ISBN 978-0-446-51608-2. 
Burrough, Bryan (1990). Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-016172-8. 


See also[edit]

Jerome Kohlberg
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts

Notes[edit]


^ a b c KKR locations (company Web site); retrieved March 8, 2010. Archived January 18, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ http://ir.kkr.com/common/download/download.cfm?companyid=KKR&fileid=930140&filekey=C070EEBD-B0D9-49A9-8346-B3E15E803AA6&filename=SEC-KKR-1404912-17-5.pdf
^ a b c d KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ a b c d e f g h i Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Company History. Funding Universe; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "What's An Aging 'Barbarian' To Do?" The New York Times, August 26, 2001.
^ What Does Henry Kravis Want?. The New York Times, September 6, 2008
^ KKR Investment History (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR to Relocate Corporate Headquarters to Manhattan’s Transformative New Neighborhood on the West Side | Business Wire". www.businesswire.com. Retrieved 2015-12-31. 
^ "KKR Files for NYSE Listing", March 17, 2010.
^ a b 2007 KKR Annual Review[dead link]; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Canada Pension Plan Unit to Join K.K.R. Merchant Banking Venture", New York Times (Dealbook Section), January 17, 2013.
^ a b "Several Giant Pension Funds Investing in Offer for Nabisco". The New York Times, October 31, 1988.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form 10-Q, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 31, 2014
^ a b "KKR Financial REIT IPO debuts: Kohlberg Kravis Roberts manages trust", Marketwatch.com, June 24, 2005.
^ KKR arm in talks after fresh repayment delays. Reuters, February 20, 2008.
^ "Kohlberg Affiliate Sells Stake in Unit", Reuters, April 1, 2008.
^ "Opening Private Equity's Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors". The New York Times, May 4, 2006.
^ Timmons, Heather. "Private Equity Goes Public for $5 Billion. Its Investors Ask, ‘What's Next?’". The New York Times, November 10, 2006
^ Anderson, Jenny. "Where Private Equity Goes, Hedge Funds May Follow", New York Times, June 23, 2006.
^ KKR Private Equity Investors Reports Results for Quarter Ended March 31, 2008 Archived March 20, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.. KKR Private Equity Investors Press Release, May 7, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ see pdf-document, retrieved in January 2015
^ statement on KKR-leaflet, retrieved in January 2015
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row, 1990; pp. 133-136.
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate (New York: Harper & Row, 1990), pp. 136-140.
^ Holland, Max (1989), When the Machine Stopped: A Cautionary Tale from Industrial America, Boston: Harvard Business School Press, ISBN 978-0-87584-208-0, OCLC 246343673. , pp. 149–169.
^ Malone & Hyde Accepts Bid The New York Times, June 12, 1984.
^ Wayne, Leslie. "Wometco Agrees To Buyout", The New York Times. September 22, 1983.
^ Dodson, Steve. "Beatrice Deal Is Biggest Buyout Yet". The New York Times, November 17, 1985.
^ Sterngold, James. "Drexel's Role in Beatrice Deal Examined". The New York Times, April 28, 1988.
^ Fisher, Lawrence M. Safeway Buyout: A Success Story. The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ Feder, Barnaby. "Asbestos: The Saga Drags On". The New York Times, April 2, 1989.
^ "Chapter 11 For Kohlberg, Kravis Unit". The New York Times, December 28, 1989.
^ "The Granddaddy Of All Takeovers", The New York Times Book Review, January 21, 1990.
^ "Nabisco Executives Offer $17 Billion for Company". The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ "Shearson Risks, Rewards on RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 22, 1988.
^ "Nabisco Bid Seen by Kohlberg". The New York Times, October 24, 1988.
^ "Buyout Specialist Bids $20.3 Billion For RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 25, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bid Gives New Respectability To Giant Deals Financed With Huge Debt". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "Concern Over Kohlberg, Kravis Strategy". The New York Times, November 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bidders Said to Talk". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "The Nabisco Battle's Key Moment". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ Joint Deal For Nabisco Is Rejected. The New York Times, October 27, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Will Give Kohlberg, Kravis Data. The New York Times, October 27, 1988
^ Forstmann Declines to Bid on RJR Nabisco. The New York Times, November 17, 1988.
^ "Suitors Quarrel Over RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, November 8, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Discloses Guidelines for Its Buyout. The New York Times, November 9, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Suitor Claims $24.88 Billion Victory". The New York Times, December 1, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Explains Its Choice". The New York Times, December 8, 1988
^ "Nabisco Executives to Take Huge Gains in Their Buyout". The New York Times, November 5, 1988.
^ "A Growing Backlash Against Greed". The New York Times, November 13, 1988
^ "Game of Greed", Time Magazine (1988)
^ "Losers Get Some Spoils In Fight for RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, December 2, 1988
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Collect $75 Million RJR Nabisco Fee". The New York Times, February 1, 1989.
^ "RJR Nabisco, An Epilogue". The New York Times, March 12, 1999.
^ "2 Buyout Firms Build New Funds". The New York Times, November 23, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Now RJR's Owner". Associated Press, April 29, 1989.
^ "History Of The RJR Nabisco Takeover". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "Is RJR Worth $25 Billion?" The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Completes Sale of Del Monte". The New York Times, January 11, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts Loan to RJR Renegotiated". The New York Times, June 27, 1990.
^ "RJR Move Helps Lift 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, July 17, 1990.
^ "RJR Offers Cash and Stock for 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, December 18, 1990.
^ Agrees to a Takeover. The New York Times, September 13, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg's Impetus in Borden Deal". The New York Times, September 14, 1994.
^ "Borden Signs Agreement for Sale to Kohlberg". The New York Times, September 24, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Says It Has Control of Borden". The New York Times, December 22, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans to Divest Remaining Stake in RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, March 16, 1995.
^ "Apollo Buys Borden Chemical for $649 million". The New York Times, July 7, 2004.
^ "Kohlberg Ends Bid for Macmillan". The New York Times, November 4, 1988.
^ K-III's New Name To Be 'Primedia'. The New York Times, November 1, 1997.
^ "Macmillan Book Club Unit And a Publisher Being Sold". The New York Times, May 23, 1989.
^ a b "As Primedia Falls, Preferred Stock Lives Up to Its Name". The New York Times, October 26, 2005.
^ Kravis Rouses Itself, The New York Times, April 29, 1991
^ "K-III Communications Files Plan For an Initial Offering of Stock". The New York Times, September 6, 1995.
^ Regulators Pick Buyer To Operate New England Bank. The New York Times, April 23, 1991.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis in Swap for 7.5% of Fleet". The New York Times, January 3, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis in Aetna Reinsurance Deal". The New York Times, June 9, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans Stake in TW". The New York Times, June 26, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg Unit to Buy Alden Press". The New York Times, January 19, 1993.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Acquire Bruno's Supermarket Chain". The New York Times, April 21, 1995.
^ "$5 Billion Fund By Kohlberg Seen". The New York Times, September 13, 1996.
^ "At K.K.R., the Glory Days Are Past". The New York Times, August 10, 1995.
^ "Kohlberg Plans Stake In Spalding And Evenflo". The New York Times, August 16, 1996.
^ "Newsquest Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Will Buy Kindercare for $467 Million". The New York Times, October 4, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Set to Offer $1.2 Billion for Cable Maker". The New York Times, January 24, 1997.
^ Roundup, An Interactive Edition News (1997-06-28). "KKR Completes Purchase Of Randalls for $225 Million". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2016-12-19. 
^ "Supermarkets Get a Brand New Bag". The New York Times, August 31, 1997.
^ "The Boyds Collection, Ltd. Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis And Welsh Carson Acquiring Medcath". The New York Times, March 14, 1998.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis-Led Group To Buy Big Insurance Broker". The New York Times, July 23, 1998.
^ "Wincor Nixdorf Holding Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ 2 Buyout Firms Make Deal To Acquire Regal Cinemas. The New York Times, January 21, 1998
^ Kohlberg Kravis In $660 Million Deal For Act III Cinemas. The New York Times, October 21, 1997.
^ "Amid Blame, United Artists Sale Collapses". The New York Times, February 23, 1998.
^ "Regal Cinemas Considers Filing For Bankruptcy". The New York Times, November 16, 2000.
^ a b Shoppers Drug Mart Sells Shares. Retail Merchandiser, March 17, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "BCE Sells Directory Unit". The New York Times, November 30, 2002.
^ "Yellow Pages Income Fund Announces, 43 Million Offering"[permanent dead link]. Yellow Pages Group press release, May 26, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Rozhon, Tracie. "Three Firms Are Said to Buy Toys 'R' Us for $6 Billion". New York Times, March 17, 2005.
^ What's Next for Toys 'R' Us?. The Wall Street Journal, March 18, 2005.
^ "Deal Mania: Shades of the '80s: The leveraged buyout is back in vogue" Archived 2008-11-01 at the Wayback Machine.. US News & World Report, April 10, 2005.
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal". The New York Times, March 29, 2005.
^ "Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?" The New York Times, April 3, 2005.
^ K.K.R., Texas Pacific Plan Record Buyout of TXU. The New York Times, February 23, 2007.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross. "HCA Buyout Highlights Era of Going Private". The New York Times, July 25, 2006.
^ Bloomberg News (August 4, 2006). "Technology; Royal Philips Sells Unit for $4.4 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ "Takeover firms will pay $15.3b to buy Danish phone giant TDC." Bloomberg, December 1, 2005
^ "TDC-One year on." Dow Jones Private Equity News, January 22, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Peters, Jeremy W. (March 13, 2007). "Buyout Firm Is Acquiring Dollar General Retail Chain". The New York Times. Retrieved January 4, 2009. 
^ Werdigier, Julia. "Equity Firm Wins Bidding for a Retailer, Alliance Boots". The New York Times, April 25, 2007.
^ "Terra Firma drops Boots bid plan". BBC. April 24, 2007. 
^ De la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer". New York Times, June 8, 2007
^ "KKR Offer of $26 Billion Is Accepted by First Data". Reuters, April 3, 2007
^ "Kohlberg Kravis to Buy First Data for $29 Billion". The New York Times, April 3, 2007.
^ Source: Thomson Financial
^ Lonkevich, Dan and Klump, Edward. KKR, Texas Pacific Will Acquire TXU for $45 Billion Bloomberg.com, February 26, 2007.
^ Skariachan, Dhanya (February 26, 2007). "KKR, Texas Pacific-led group to buy TXU Corp". Reuters. 
^ "Seven in $4bn asset sell-off" Archived 2007-11-14 at the Wayback Machine.. News.com.au, November 20, 2006
^ "Sun Microsystems Welcomes Endorsement and Investment From KKR". Sun Microsystems Press Release, January 23, 2007 Archived September 29, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Legg Mason Makes Deal With Equity Firm". Reuters, January 15, 2008
^ Harman International Industries to be Acquired by KKR and GS Capital Partners. Harman International press release, April 26, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived July 4, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Wary Buyers May Scuttle Two Deals". The New York Times, September 22, 2007.
^ Jenny Anderson and Michael J. de la Merced. "Kohlberg Kravis Plans to Go Public", The New York Times, July 4, 2007.
^ "KKR postpones $1.25 bn float as credit chaos deters buyers". The Times (UK), August 23, 2007.
^ After Delay, KKR Finds a Way to Go Public. The New York Times, July 28, 2008.
^ K.K.R. Calls Listing Delay ‘Process Related’. The New York Times, November 3, 2008.
^ Neha Dimri; Aman Shah (28 January 2014). "KKR to take control of Sedgwick Claims Management in $2.4 billion deal". Reuters. 
^ "Equity investor KKR picks stakes in Acciona Energia unit for 417mn euros". Spain News.Net. Retrieved 24 June 2014. 
^ "KKR to acquire China chicken developer for $400 mn". Business Sun. 26 August 2014. Retrieved 27 August 2014. 
^ KKR invests in smart home tech company Savant Systems. Reuters, 4 September 2014
^ "Deals of the day - Mergers and acquisitions". Reuters. Retrieved 2015-01-22. 
^ "KKR | KKR agrees to acquire majority stake in Selecta from ACP". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2015-10-12. 
^ "Epicor Announces Close of KKR Acquisition and Executive Leadership Appointments to Accelerate Growth Strategy". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2016-09-01. 
^ "Klaba Family OVH, Europe No. 1 Web Host, Raises €250M from $KKR, TowerBrook". exithub. Retrieved 14 January 2017. 
^ "Lonza Buys Capsugel for $5.5B Cash - GEN Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News - Biotech from Bench to Business - GEN". GEN. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ Germany, wysiwyg* Software Design GmbH, Düsseldorf,. "Acceleratio Capital N.V.". www.acceleratio-angebot.de. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/us-webmd-m-a-kkr-idUKKBN1A915Y
^ "Buyout Pioneer Quitting Fray". The New York Times, June 19, 1987.
^ Kohlberg In Dispute Over Firm. The New York Times, August 30, 1989.
^ "Kohlberg Suit Settlement". The New York Times, February 23, 1990.
^ Duracell International Inc. SEC Form SC 13G/A ("Statement of acquisition of beneficial ownership"); filed February 6, 1996.
^ Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
^ Scott Nuttall profile at Forbes
^ "A kinder, gentler KKR wants a piece of your 401K", Forbes, January 23, 2013.
^ Profile of Scott Nuttall at investing.businessweek.com, Businessweek.com, January 23, 2013.
^ a b "KKR Appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers". KKR Press Release. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Next Generation at K.K.R. Set as It Names Two Co-Presidents". New York Times. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ ""For Saul Fox, Bigger Isn’t Always Better in the World of Buyouts". foxpaine.com, May 15, 2000. Retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Anders, George. "Bitter End of a Partnership", Wall Street Journal, September 15, 2007.
^ Blue Harbour Group> About Blue Harbour Archived 2008-03-13 at the Wayback Machine. (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ a b c Barbarians at the Gate: Contrasting fortunes for those closest to the deal. eFinancial News, November 3, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Pelosi Found Guilty of Murder". CBS News. December 13, 2004. Retrieved May 17, 2007. 
^ "Murder in East Hampton", Vanity Fair, January 2002.
^ "Mystery of the Murdered Millionaire". Dateline NBC; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Paul M. Hazen profile as Wells Fargo & Co. Chairman and CEO Archived 2005-09-14 at the Wayback Machine.; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Mehlman profile at KKR website Archived 2013-07-30 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR names former CIA head Petraeus as chairman of new institute". 30 May 2013. Retrieved 5 June 2017 – via Reuters. 


References[edit]


FT.com / Industries / Basic industries – "KKR set to buy Masonite for C$3.1bn"
Gross, Daniel & David Sterling. "Has Henry Kravis gone soft?". Slate, August 5, 2007; retrieved August 7, 2007.
The KKR Way. Bloomberg Markets, August 2007
"The barbarians at the gate have been losing their Midas touch". timesonline.co.uk, August 6, 2005; retrieved February 16, 2009.


External links[edit]

Yahoo! – Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. company profile







v
t
e


Kohlberg Kravis Roberts



Founders



Jerome Kohlberg Jr.
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts





Selected current investments



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Aricent Group
Bharti Enterprises
Capsugel
CICC
Café Coffee Day
Colonial Pipeline
Del Monte Foods
Dollar General
Eastman Kodak
El Paso Corp.
Energy Future Holdings
First Data
Hospital Corporation of America
KION Group
Laureate Education
Legg Mason
Legrand
Magma Fincorp
Maxeda
Nielsen Holdings
Northgate Information Solutions
NXP Semiconductors
Oriental Brewery
Pets at Home
ProSiebenSat.1 Media
Sealy Corporation
Seven West Media
TDC A/S
Toys "R" Us
US Foods
Visma
Wild
Yageo
Zhone Technologies








 Category












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kohlberg_Kravis_Roberts&oldid=792147823"					
Categories: Kohlberg Kravis RobertsCompanies based in New York CityCompanies established in 1976Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeKohlberg Kravis Roberts companiesMezzanine capital investment firmsPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from January 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with a promotional tone from June 2017All articles with a promotional toneArticles needing cleanup from June 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from June 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from June 2017Wikipedia articles needing style editing from June 2017All articles needing style editingArticles with peacock terms from June 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles that may be too long from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from September 2013Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


CatalàDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 19:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






 


KKR & Co. L.P. - K-1 & Tax Information




























































  





 Toggle navigation      MENU 


















 
















KKR Financial Holdings


  Navigation 


Overview
Corporate Governance
Events & Presentations
Distribution History
Email Alerts
FAQs
K-1 & Tax Information
Press Releases
SEC Filings
   ARCHIVE  
Annual Reports
Earnings Releases



 Briefcase
 RSS Feeds
 Email Alerts











	2016 K-1 Information

	The 2016 K-1 tax information for the KFN Preferred Shares is now available. To view or download your 2016 K-1 information please click the link below. You will be directed to the Tax Package Support website. This site is for informational purposes only and is not intended to constitute, supplement or substitute for independent tax or legal advice. 


 2016 K-1 Information


Alternatively, you may contact Tax Package Support directly at (855) 521-8159 or (800) 854-9346 if calling outside the U.S.

	For years 2015 and prior

	To obtain a copy of your K-1 information for 2015 and prior years please contact Tax Package Support at (855) 521-8159 for KFN Common, (855) 521-8159 for KFN Preferred, or (800) 854-9346 if calling outside the U.S.

 2007 Dividend Information 
 2006 Dividend Information 











×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






 


























Locations | KKR





































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 
















Toggle navigation





MENU












































×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK





 



Locations





Locations


Toggle navigation





more locations

Map of All Locations




















Americas


New York

KKR
							9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York, New York 10019 
							+ 1 (212) 750-8300                        


KKR CREDIT ADVISORS (US) LLC
							9 West 57th Street
New York, New York 10019 
							+ 1 (212) 750-8300                        


KKR Capital Markets
							9 West 57th Street
Suite 4160
New York, New York 10019 
							+ 1 (212) 230-9433                        


KKR Prisma
							9 West 57th Street
New York, New York 10019 
							+1 (212) 590-0800                        


KKR Global Institute
							9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York, New York 10019 
							+ 1 (212) 750-8300                        



Houston

KKR
							600 Travis Street
Suite 7200
Houston, Texas 77002 
							+ 1 (713) 343-5142                        



Menlo Park

KKR
							2800 Sand Hill Road
Suite 200
Menlo Park, California 94025 
							+ 1 (650) 233-6560                        



São Paulo

KKR
							Jerônimo da Veiga, 384
7th floor
São Paulo, SP
Brazil 04536-001 
							+5511 3074-0430                        



San Francisco

KKR Credit Advisors (US) LLC
							555 California Street
50th Floor
San Francisco, California 94104 
							+ 1 (415) 315-3620                        







Europe, the Middle East and Africa


Dubai

KKR
							Gate Village 4
Levels 5 & 6
DIFC, P.O. Box 506804,
Dubai, UAE 
							+ 971 (0)4 378 1500                        



Paris

KKR
							SAS
42 Avenue Montaigne
75008 Paris 
							+ 33 1 53 53 96 00                        



London

Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Partners LLP
							Stirling Square
7 Carlton Gardens
London SW1Y 5AD
Authorized and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority 
							+ 44 20 7839 9800                        


KKR Credit Advisors (UK) LLP
							100 Pall Mall
London SW1Y 5NQ
Authorized and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority 
							+ 44 20 7839 9800                        


KKR Capital Markets
							Stirling Square
7 Carlton Gardens
London, SW1Y 5AD
Authorized and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority 
							+ 44 20 7839 9800                        


Prisma Capital Management International LLP
							100 Pall Mall
London
SW1Y 5NQ
Authorized and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority 
							+44 0207 318 1650                        


KKR Asset Management Partners LLP
							100 Pall Mall
London, SW1Y 5NQ
Authorized and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority 
							+44 0207 839 9800                        



Riyadh

KKR
							Level 18, Al Faisaliah Tower
KING FAHED ROAD
Box 54995, Riyadh 11311
Riyadh, KSA
11311
 
							+966 11 490 3767                        



Dublin

KKR Credit Advisors (Ireland)
							75 St. Stephens Green
Dublin 2
Ireland 
							+353 1 4757499                        



Madrid

KKR
							(España) Asesores, S.L.
Edificio Beatriz
Calle de José Ortega y Gasset 29
28006 Madrid
Spain 
							+ 34 (91) 198 00 04                        



Luxembourg

KKR Luxembourg S.à r.l.
							63, rue de Rollingergrund
L-2440 Luxembourg 
							(+352) 270 243 – 1                        







Asia-Pacific


Hong Kong

KKR
							Level 56, Cheung Kong Center
2 Queen’s Road Central
Hong Kong 
							+ 852 3602-7300                        


KKR Capital Markets
							Level 56, Cheung Kong Center
2 Queen’s Road Central
Hong Kong 
							+ 852 3602-7508                        



Beijing

KKR
							41/F, China World Tower 3
No.1 Jianguomenwai Street,
Chaoyang District
Beijing 100004, China 
							+ 86 10 5895-3800                        



Seoul

KKR
							35/F, West Tower, Mirae Asset Center 1 Building
26 Eulji-ro 5-gil, Jung-gu
Seoul 04539
Korea 
							+ 82 2 6321-7700                        



Tokyo

KKR Capital Markets
							11F, Meiji Yasuda Seimei Building
2-1-1 Marunouchi
Chiyoda-ku
Tokyo 100-0005 
							+ 81 3-6268-6666                        


KKR
							11F, Meiji Yasuda Seimei Building
 2-1-1 Marunouchi
 Chiyoda-ku
 Tokyo 100-0005 
							+ 81 3-6268-6000                        



Mumbai

KKR
							2nd Floor, Piramal Tower
Peninsula Corporate Park
Ganpatrao Kadam Marg, Lower Parel (West)
Mumbai 400 013, India 
							+ 91 22 4355-1300                        



Sydney

KKR
							Level 42, Gateway Building,
1 Macquarie Place,
Sydney NSW 2000
Australia 
							+ 61 2 8298 5500                        



Singapore

KKR
							Asia Square Tower 1
8 Marina View, #33-04
Singapore 018960 
							+65 6922-5800                        








  



















Kohlberg Kravis Roberts - Wikipedia





















 







Kohlberg Kravis Roberts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from KKR)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"KKR" redirects here. For other uses, see KKR (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Too much unnecessary detail and puffery Please help improve this article if you can. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may have too many section headers dividing up its content. Please help improve the article by merging similar sections and removing unneeded subheaders. (June 2017)







This article may contain an excessive amount of intricate detail that may only interest a specific audience. Please help by spinning off or relocating any relevant information, and removing excessive detail that may be against Wikipedia's inclusion policy. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may be too long to read and navigate comfortably. Please consider splitting content into sub-articles, condensing it, or adding or removing subheadings. (June 2017)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



KKR & Co. L.P.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: KKR


Industry
Financial services:
private equity
(1976–present)
investment banking
(2004–present)


Founded
1976; 41 years ago (1976)


Founder
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts
Jerome Kohlberg, Jr.


Headquarters
9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York City, New York 10019
United States



Number of locations

13 offices in 9 countries[1]



Key people

Henry R. Kravis
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)
George R. Roberts
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)


Products
Management buyouts
Leveraged finance
Venture capital
Growth capital


Revenue
US$ 8.896 billion (2013)



Net income

US$ 691.2 million (2013)


AUM
US$ 98.0 billion (2012)


Total assets
US$ 39 billion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

1700 (2017)


Website
www.kkr.com


KKR & Co. L.P. (formerly known as Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.) is an American multinational private equity firm, specializing in leveraged buyouts, headquartered in New York City. The firm sponsors and manages private equity investment funds. The firm has completed over $400 billion of private equity transactions since its inception.[3][4]
The firm was founded in 1976 by Jerome Kohlberg, Jr., and cousins Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts, all of whom had previously worked together at Bear Stearns, where they completed some of the earliest leveraged buyout transactions. Since its founding, KKR has completed a number of transactions including the 1989 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco, which was the largest buyout in history to that point, as well as the 2007 buyout of TXU, which is currently the largest buyout completed to date.[5][6] KKR has completed investments in over 160 companies since 1977, completing at least one investment in every year except in 1982 and in 1990.[7]
KKR has 13 additional offices in the United States, Europe and Asia.[1] The firm is currently located in the Solow Building (9 W. 57th Street), but recently announced its intentions to occupy a newly constructed 30 Hudson Yards.[8]
In October 2009, KKR listed shares in the company through KKR & Co., an affiliate that holds 30% of the firm's ownership equity, with the remainder held by the firm's partners. In March 2010, KKR filed to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE),[9] with trading commencing four months later, on July 15, 2010.



Contents


1 The Firm KKR
2 Investment funds and other affiliates

2.1 Private equity funds
2.2 KKR Financial
2.3 KKR Private Equity Investors


3 History

3.1 Founding and early history
3.2 Buyout of RJR Nabisco
3.3 Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco
3.4 Early 1990s: Investments
3.5 1996–1999
3.6 2000–2005
3.7 Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom
3.8 Initial public offering
3.9 2010 to present day


4 Notable current and former employees
5 Works about KKR
6 See also
7 Notes
8 References
9 External links



The Firm KKR[edit]
KKR is operated by its managing partners Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts and a team of approximately 140 investment professionals and 400 total employees, organized into industry-focused groups.[3] KKR is headquartered in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street, Manhattan, New York, with U.S. offices in Menlo Park, San Francisco, Houston, and Washington, D.C., and offices in London, Paris, Hong Kong, Tokyo, Beijing, Mumbai, Dubai, Seoul, São Paulo and Sydney.[1]
KKR invests primarily through leveraged buyouts as well as growth capital investments (including "PIPE" investments in public companies). It has traditionally specialized in private equity investments, focusing on specific industry sectors where the firm has created nine dedicated investment groups. The industries in which KKR has developed a specialization include:[10]

Chemicals
Consumer products
Energy & natural resources
Financial services
Health care
Industrial
Media and communications
Retail
Technology

The professionals in each of KKR's industry-focused groups are expected to have developed a proficiency in their respective industries.[10] The firm has traditionally had strong ties with its investors.[11]
Investment funds and other affiliates[edit]
Private equity funds[edit]
KKR has historically relied primarily on private equity funds, pools of committed capital that are raised from a broad array of institutional investors (e.g., pension funds, insurance companies, investment banks, commercial banks, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds).[3][12] As of March 31, 2014, KKR had completed fund-raising for approximately 23 traditional investment funds in the US, Europe and Asia with total committed capital of approximately US$80 billion:


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($m)


KKR Fund 1976
1977
$31


KKR Fund 1980
1980
$357


KKR Fund 1982
1982
$328


KKR Fund 1984
1984
$1,000


KKR Fund 1986
1986
$672


KKR Fund 1987
1987
$6,130


KKR Fund 1993
1993
$1,946


KKR Fund 1996
1996
$6,012


KKR European Fund
1999
$3,085


KKR Millennium Fund
2002
$6,000


KKR European Fund II
2005
$5,751


KKR Fund 2006
2006
$17,642


KKR Asian Fund
2007
$4,000


KKR European Fund III
2008
$6,238


KKR E2 Investors (Annex Fund)
2009
$209


KKR China Growth Fund
2010
$1,010


KKR Natural Resources Fund
2010
$876


KKR Infrastructure Fund
2011
$1,043


KKR North America Fund XI
2012
$8,718


KKR Asian Fund II
2013
$5,825


KKR Real Estate Partners Americas
2013
$1,226


KKR Energy Income and Growth Fund
2013
$1,974


Source: SEC Filings[13]
KKR Financial[edit]






Type

Public company (NYSE: KFN)


Founded
2004


Website
www.kkrfinancial.com


KKR Financial (NYSE: KFN) is a real estate investment trust (REIT) and specialty finance company that invests in residential and commercial mortgage loans and mortgage-backed securities as well as corporate loans and debt securities, asset-backed securities and equity securities. KFN was founded in 2004 raising $795 million in a private placement and raised $849 million in a June 2005 initial public offering, increasing the size of the offering from an original $600 million target.[14] KKR had initially considered structuring KFN as a business development company like Apollo Management's Apollo Investment Corporation but chose to pursue the REIT structure to capitalize on the strength in REIT valuations at the time.[14]
KFN was an early casualty of the subprime mortgage crisis and in September 2007, Henry Kravis and George Roberts injected $270 million into the company. On February 20, 2008, KFN was once again forced to delay the repayment of billions of dollars of commercial paper, and began a new round of talks with creditors.[15] In April, KFN sold a controlling interest in a real estate subsidiary to an investment firm to raise cash and entered an agreement with the noteholders of certain secured commercial paper issued by two asset-backed entities. Following the transaction, KFN converted from a REIT to a LLC.[16]
KKR Private Equity Investors[edit]






Type

Public company (Euronext: KPE)


Founded
2006


Website
www.kkrpei.com


KKR Private Equity Investors (Euronext: KPE) is a publicly traded private equity fund that invests as a fund of funds in KKR private equity funds. KPE also co-invests in transactions alongside KKR's private equity funds. KPE was founded in 2006. In May 2006, KKR raised $5 billion in an initial public offering for a KPE to serve as a new permanent investment vehicle listing it on the Euronext exchange in Amsterdam. KKR raised three times more than it expected, as many of the investors in KPE were hedge funds seeking exposure to private equity but could not make long term commitments to private equity funds. As private equity had been booming in preceding years, investing in a KKR fund was attractive to investors.[17]
However, KPE's first-day performance was lackluster, trading down 1.7% and trading volume was limited.[18] Initially, a handful of other private equity firms and hedge funds had planned to follow KKR's lead but shelved those plans when KPE's performance continued to falter after its IPO. KPE's stock declined from an IPO price of €25 per share to €18.16 (a 27% decline) at the end of 2007 and a low of €11.45 (a 54.2% decline) per share in Q1 2008.[19]
KPE disclosed in May 2008 that it had completed approximately $300 million of secondary sales of selected limited partnership interests in, and undrawn commitments to, certain KKR-managed funds in order to generate liquidity and repay borrowings.[20]
In October 2009 KPE changed its name to KKR & Co. (Guernsey) L.P.,[21] which was delisted from Euronext Amsterdam in July 2010 while common units of KKR & Co. L.P. began trading on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “KKR”.[22]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
Running the corporate finance department for Bear Stearns in the 1960s and 1970s, Jerome Kohlberg and later with protégés Henry Kravis and George Roberts completed a series of what they described as "bootstrap" investments beginning in 1964–65. They targeted family-owned businesses, many of which had been founded in the years following World War II which by the 1960s and 1970s were facing succession issues. Many of these companies lacked a viable or attractive exit for their founders as they were too small to be taken public and the founders were reluctant to sell out to competitors and so a sale to a financial buyer could prove attractive.[4]




Henry Kravis speaking at the World Economic Forum in 2009


Their acquisition of Orkin Exterminating Company in 1964 is among the first significant leveraged buyout transactions. In the following years the three Bear Stearns bankers would complete a series of buyouts including Stern Metals (1965), Incom (a division of Rockwood International, 1971), Cobblers Industries (1971), and Boren Clay (1973), as well as Thompson Wire, Eagle Motors and Barrows through their investment in Stern Metals. Despite a number of highly successful investments, the $27 million investment in Cobblers ended in bankruptcy.[23]
By 1976, tensions [clarification needed] had built up between Bear Stearns and Kohlberg, Kravis and Roberts, which led to the formation of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in that year. Most notably, Bear Stearns executive Cy Lewis had rejected repeated proposals to form a dedicated investment fund within Bear Stearns and Lewis took exception to the amount of time spent on outside activities. In 1976, Kravis had been required to serve as interim CEO of a failing direct mail company named Advo.[citation needed]
The new KKR completed its first buyout, that of manufacturer A.J. Industries, in 1977. KKR raised capital from a small group of investors including the Hillman Company and First Chicago Bank. By 1978, with the revision of the ERISA regulations, the nascent KKR was successful in raising its first institutional fund with over $30 million of investor commitments.[24] In 1981, KKR expanded its investor base significantly when the Oregon State Treasury's public pension fund invested in KKR's acquisition of retailer Fred Meyer, Inc. Oregon State remains an active investor in KKR funds.[4]
KKR closed out the 1970s completing the public-to-private buyout of Houdaille Industries in 1979,[25] probably the largest take-private of a public company to that point. As the 1980s began, KKR was among the most prominent practitioner of leveraged buyouts and would prove the most prolific of the private equity investors in the 1980s.[4] Among the firm's most notable acquisitions during the 1980s buyout boom were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


Malone & Hyde
1984
KKR completed the first buyout of a public company by tender offer, by acquiring the food distributor and supermarket operator together with the company's chairman Joseph R. Hyde III.
[26]


Wometco Enterprises
1984
KKR completed the first billion-dollar buyout transaction to acquire the leisure-time company with interests in television, movie theaters and tourist attractions. The buyout comprised the acquisition of 100% of the outstanding shares for $842 million and the assumption of $170 million of the company's outstanding debt.
[27]


Beatrice Companies
1985
KKR sponsored the $6.1 billion management buyout of Beatrice, which owned Samsonite and Tropicana among other consumer brands. At the time of its closing in 1985, Beatrice was the largest buyout completed.
[28][29]


Safeway
1986
KKR completed a friendly $5.5 billion buyout of Safeway to help management avoid hostile overtures from Herbert and Robert Haft of Dart Drug. Safeway was taken public again in 1990.
[30]


Jim Walter Corp.
(later Walter Industries)
1987
KKR acquired the company for $3.3 billion in early 1988 but faced issues with the buyout almost immediately. Most notably, a subsidiary of Jim Walter Corp (Celotex) faced a large asbestos lawsuit and incurred liabilities that the courts ruled would need to be satisfied by the parent company. In 1989, the holding company which KKR used for the Jim Walter buyout filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
[31][32]


Buyout of RJR Nabisco[edit]
Main article: RJR Nabisco
After the 1987 resignation of Jerome Kohlberg at age 61 (he later founded his own private equity firm, Kohlberg & Co.), Henry Kravis succeeded him as senior partner. Under Kravis and Roberts, the firm was responsible for the 1988 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco. RJR Nabisco proved to be not only the largest buyout in history to that time, at $25 billion ($31.1 billion, including assumed debt) as well as a high-water mark and sign of the end of the 1980s buyout boom. RJR—Nabisco, which would remain the largest buyout for the next 17 years, was chronicled in Barbarians at the Gate: The Fall of RJR Nabisco, and later made into a television movie starring James Garner.[33]
In 1988, F. Ross Johnson was the President and CEO of RJR Nabisco, formed in 1985 by the merger of Nabisco Brands and R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company, a leading producer of food products (Shredded Wheat, Oreo cookies, Ritz crackers, Planters peanuts, Life Savers, Del Monte Fruit and Vegetables, and Snickers Chocolate) as well as Winston, Camel and Salem cigarettes. In October 1988, Johnson proposed a $17 billion ($75 per share) management buyout of the company with the financial backing of investment bank Shearson Lehman Hutton and its parent company, American Express.[34][35]
Several days later, Kravis, who had originally suggested the idea of the buyout to Johnson, presented a new bid for $20.3 billion ($90 per share) financed with an aggressive debt package.[36][37][38] KKR had the support of significant equity co-investments from leading pension funds and other institutional investors. Investors included Coca-Cola, Georgia-Pacific and United Technologies corporate pension funds, as well as endowments from MIT, Harvard and the New York State Common Retirement Fund[12] However, KKR faced criticism from existing investors over the firm's use of hostile tactics in the buyout of RJR.[39]
KKR proposed to provide a joint offer with Johnson and Shearson Lehman but was rebuffed and Johnson attempted to stonewall KKR's access to financial information from RJR.[40][41][42][43] Rival private equity firm, Forstmann Little & Co. was invited into the process by Shearson Lehman but attempted to provide a bid for RJR with a consortium of Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Procter & Gamble, Ralston Purina and Castle & Cooke.[44]
Ultimately the Forstmann consortium came apart and did not provide a final bid for RJR.[45] Many of the major banking players of the day, including Shearson Lehman Hutton, Drexel Burnham Lambert, Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Salomon Brothers and Merrill Lynch were actively involved in advising and financing the parties.




Oreo cookies, one of RJR Nabisco's products


In November 1988, RJR set guidelines for a final bid submission at the end of the month.[46] The management and Shearson group submitted a final bid of $112, a figure they felt certain would enable them to outflank any response by Kravis and KKR. KKR's final bid of $109, while a lower dollar figure, was ultimately accepted by the board of directors of RJR Nabisco.[47] KKR's offer was guaranteed, whereas the management offer lacked a "reset", meaning that the final share price might have been lower than their stated $112 per share.[48]
Additionally, many in RJR's board of directors had grown concerned at recent disclosures of Ross Johnson' unprecedented golden parachute deal.[49][50] Time Magazine featured Ross Johnson on the cover of their December 1988 issue along with the headline, "A Game of Greed: This man could pocket $100 million from the largest corporate takeover in history. Has the buyout craze gone too far?".[51] KKR's offer was welcomed by the board, and, to some observers, it appeared that their elevation of the reset issue as a deal-breaker in KKR's favor was little more than an excuse to reject Ross Johnson's higher payout of $112 per share. Johnson received $53 million from the buyout.[52] KKR collected a $75 million fee in the RJR takeover.[53] At $31.1 billion of transaction value (including assumed debt), RJR Nabisco was by far the largest leveraged buyout in history.[54]
In 2006 and 2007, a number of leveraged buyout transactions were completed which, for the first time, surpassed the RJR Nabisco leveraged buyout in terms of nominal purchase price. The deal was first surpassed in July 2006 by the $33 billion buyout of U.S. hospital operator Hospital Corporation of America, in which KKR participated, though the RJR deal was larger, adjusted for inflation. However, adjusted for inflation, none of the leveraged buyouts of the 2006–07 period would surpass RJR Nabisco. The RJR transaction benefited many of the parties involved. Investment bankers and lawyers who advised KKR walked away with over $1 billion in fees. Kravis and Roberts attracted an unprecedented amount of publicity that turned the cousins into instant celebrities. Size did not, however, guarantee success as the high purchase price and debt load would burden the performance of the investment, which KKR overcame, raising a new investment fund and continuing to invest throughout the 1990s.[55]
Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco[edit]




KKR's headquarters in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street in New York City


The buyout of RJR Nabisco was completed in April 1989 and KKR would spend the early 1990s repaying the RJR's enormous debt load through a series of asset sales and restructuring transactions.[56][57][58] After the RJR Nabisco deal, KKR did not complete a single investment in 1990, the first such year since 1982. They would not complete another major leveraged buyout transaction for more than three years, largely because of the shutdown of the high yield bond market and the collapse of Drexel Burnham Lambert which filed for bankruptcy in February 1990. KKR began to focus primarily on its existing portfolio companies acquired during the buyout boom of the late 1980s. Six of KKR's portfolio companies completed IPOs in 1991, including RJR Nabisco and Duracell.[4]
As the new decade began, KKR began restructuring RJR. In January 1990, it completed the sale of RJR's Del Monte Foods to a group led by Merrill Lynch. KKR had originally identified a group of divisions that it could sell to reduce debt.[59] Over the coming years, RJR would pursue a number of additional restructurings, equity injections and public offerings of stock to provide the company with added financial flexibility. KKR contributed $1.7 billion of new equity into RJR in July 1990 to complete a restructuring of the company's balance sheet that appeased unhappy bondholders. KKR's equity contribution as part of the original leveraged buyout of RJR had been only $1.5 billion.[60][61] In mid-December 1990, RJR announced an exchange offer that would swap debt in RJR for a new public stock in the company, effectively an unusual means of taking RJR public again and simultaneously reducing debt on the company.[62]
RJR issued additional stock to the public in March 1991 to further reduce debt, resulting in an upgrade of the credit rating of RJR's debt from junk to investment grade. KKR began to reduce its ownership in RJR in 1994, when its stock in RJR was used as part of the consideration for its leveraged buyout of Borden, Inc., a producer of food and beverage products, consumer products, and industrial products, in an unprecedented and complex transaction.[63][64] [65][66] The following year, in 1995, KKR would divest itself of its final stake in RJR Nabisco when Borden sold a $638 million block of stock.[67]
While KKR no longer had any ownership of RJR Nabisco by 1995, its original investment would not be fully realized until KKR exited its last investment in 2004. After sixteen years of efforts, including contributing new equity, taking RJR public, asset sales and exchanging shares of RJR for the ownership of Borden, Inc., KKR finally sold the last remnants of its 1989 investment. In July 2004, KKR agreed to sell its stock in Borden Chemical to Apollo Management for $1.2 billion.[68]
Early 1990s: Investments[edit]
In the early 1990s, the absence of an active high yield market prompted KKR to change its tactics, avoiding large leveraged buyouts in favor of industry consolidations through what were described as leveraged buildups or rollups. One of KKR's largest investments in the 1990s was the leveraged buildup of Primedia in partnership with former executives of Macmillan Publishing, which KKR had failed to acquire in 1988.[69] KKR created Primedia's predecessor, K-III Communications,[70] a platform to buy media properties, initially completing the $310 million divisional buyout of the book club division of Macmillan along with the assets of Intertec Publishing Corporation in May 1989.[71][72]
During the early 1990s, K-III continued acquiring publishing assets, including a $650 million acquisition from News Corporation in 1991.[73] K-III went public, however instead of cashing out, KKR continued to make new investments in the company in 1998, 2000 and 2001 to support acquisition activity.[74] In 2005, Primedia redeemed KKR's preferred stock in the company but KKR was estimated to have lost hundreds of millions of dollars on its common stock holdings as the price of the company's stock collapsed.[72]
In 1991, KKR partnered with Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in the 1991 acquisition of the Bank of New England, from the US Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.[75] In January 1996, KKR would exchange its investment for a 7.5% interest in Fleet Bank.[76] KKR completed the 1992 buyout of American Re Corporation from Aetna[77] as well as a 47% interest in TW Corporation, later known as The Flagstar Companies and owner of Denny's in 1992.[78] Among the other notable investments KKR completed in the early 1990s included World Color Press (1993–95),[79] RELTEC Corporation (1995) and Bruno's (1995).[80]
1996–1999[edit]
By the mid-1990s, the debt markets were improving and KKR had moved on from the RJR Nabisco buyout. In 1996, KKR was able to complete the bulk of fundraising for what was then a record $6 billion private equity fund, the KKR 1996 Fund.[81] However, KKR was still burdened by the performance of the RJR investment and repeated obituaries in the media.[82] KKR was required by its investors to reduce the fees it charged and to calculate its carried interest based on the total profit of the fund (i.e., offsetting losses from failed deals against the profits from successful deals).[4]




KKR acquired Regal Cinemas in 1998, only to see the company in bankruptcy by 2000


KKR's activity level would accelerate over the second half of the 1990s making a series of notable investments including Spalding Holdings Corporation and Evenflo (1996),[83] Newsquest (1996),[84] KinderCare Learning Centers (1997),[85] Amphenol Corporation (1997),[86] Randalls Food Markets (1997),[87][88] The Boyds Collection (1998),[89] MedCath Corporation (1998),[90] Willis Group Holdings (1998),[91] Smiths Group (1999), and Wincor Nixdorf (1999).[92]
KKR's largest investment of the 1990s would be one of its least successful. In January 1998, KKR and Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst agreed to the $1.5 billion buyout of Regal Entertainment Group.[93] KKR and Hicks Muse had initially intended to combine Regal with Act III Cinemas, which KKR had acquired in 1997 for $706 million[94] and United Artists Theaters, which Hicks Muse had agreed to acquire for $840 million in November 1997. Shortly after agreeing to the Regal takeover, the deal with United Artists fell apart, destroying the strategy to eliminate costs by building a larger combined company.[95] Two years later, in 2000, Regal encountered significant financial issues and was forced to file for bankruptcy protection; the company passed to billionaire investor Philip Anschutz.[96]
2000–2005[edit]




Shoppers Drug Mart, the Canadian pharmacy was one of several successful buyouts in the early 2000s[97]


At the start of the 21st century, the landscape of large leveraged buyout firms was changing. Several large and storied firms, including Hicks Muse Tate & Furst and Forstmann Little & Company were dragged down by heavy losses in the bursting of the telecom bubble. Although, KKR's track record since RJR Nabisco was mixed, losses on such investments as Regal Entertainment Group, Spalding, Flagstar and Primedia (previously K-III Communications) were offset by successes in Willis Group, Wise Foods, Inc., Wincor Nixdorf and MTU Aero Engines, among others.[4]
Additionally, KKR was one of the few firms that was able to complete large leveraged buyout transactions in the years immediately following the collapse of the Internet bubble, including Shoppers Drug Mart and Bell Canada Yellow Pages.[4][98] KKR was able to realize its investment in Shoppers Drug Mart through a 2002 IPO and subsequent public stock offerings.[97] The directories business would be taken public in 2004 as Yellow Pages Income Fund, a Canadian income trust.[99]




KKR led a consortium in the buyout of Toys "R" Us in 2004


In 2004 a consortium comprising KKR, Bain Capital and real estate development company Vornado Realty Trust announced the $6.6 billion acquisition of Toys "R" Us, the toy retailer. A month earlier, Cerberus Capital Management, made a $5.5 billion offer for both the toy and baby supplies businesses.[100] The Toys 'R' Us buyout was one of the largest in several years.[101] Following this transaction, by the end of 2004 and in 2005, major buyouts were once again becoming common and market observers were stunned by the leverage levels and financing terms obtained by financial sponsors in their buyouts.[102]
In 2005, KKR was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. KKR's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Blackstone Group, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1988. SunGard was the largest buyout of a technology company until the Blackstone-led buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction was notable given the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point. The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[103][104]
Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom[edit]
In 2006, KKR raised a new $17.6 billion fund the KKR 2006 Fund, with which the firm began executing a series of some of the largest buyouts in history. KKR's $44 billion takeover of Texas-based power utility, TXU, in 2007, proved to be the largest leveraged buyout of the mid-2000s buyout boom and the largest buyout completed to date.[105] Among the most notable companies acquired by KKR in 2006 and 2007 were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


HCA
2006
KKR and Bain Capital, together with Merrill Lynch and the Frist family (which had founded the company) completed a $31.6 billion acquisition of the hospital company, 17 years after it was taken private for the first time in a management buyout. At the time of its announcement, the HCA buyout would be the first of several to set new records for the largest buyout, eclipsing the 1989 buyout of RJR Nabisco. It would later be surpassed by the buyouts of Equity Office Properties, and TXU.
[106]


NXP Semiconductors
2006
In August 2006, a consortium of KKR, Silver Lake Partners and AlpInvest Partners acquired a controlling 80.1% share of semiconductors unit of Philips for €6.4 billion. The new company, based in the Netherlands, was renamed NXP Semiconductors.
[107]


TDC A/S
2006
The Danish phone company was acquired by KKR, Apax Partners, Providence Equity Partners and Permira for €12.2 billion ($15.3 billion), which at the time made it the second largest European buyout in history.
[108][109]


Dollar General
2007
KKR completed a buyout of the chain of discount stores operating in the U.S.
[110]


Alliance Boots
2007
KKR and Stefano Pessina, the company’s deputy chairman and largest shareholder, acquired the UK drug store retailer for £12.4 billion ($24.8 billion) including assumed debt, after increasing their bid more than 40% amidst intense competition from Terra Firma Capital Partners and Wellcome Trust. The buyout came only a year after the merger of Boots Group plc (Boots the Chemist), and Alliance UniChem plc.
[111][112]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone Group, KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[113]


First Data
2007
KKR and TPG Capital completed the $29 billion buyout of the credit and debit card payment processor and former parent of Western Union. Michael Capellas, previously the CEO of MCI Communications and Compaq was named CEO of the privately held company.
[114][115]


TXU (Energy Future Holdings)
2007
An investor group led by KKR and TPG Capital and together with Goldman Sachs completed the $44.37 billion[116] buyout of the regulated utility and power producer. The investor group had to work closely with ERCOT regulators to gain approval of the transaction but had significant experience with the regulators from their earlier buyout of Texas Genco. TXU is the largest buyout in history, and retained this distinction when the announced buyout of BCE failed to close in December 2008. The deal was notable for a drastic change in environmental policy for the energy giant, in terms of its carbon emissions from coal power plants and funding alternative energy.
[117][118]


Other non-buyout investments completed by KKR during this period included Legg Mason, Sun Microsystems, Tarkett, Longview Power Plant and Seven Network. In October 2006, KKR acquired a 50% stake in Tarkett, a France-based distributor of flooring products, in a deal valued at about €1.4 billion ($1.8 billion). On November 20, 2006, KKR announced it would form a A$4 billion partnership with the Seven Network of Australia.[119] On January 23, 2007, KKR announced it would invest $700 million through a PIPE investment in Sun Microsystems.[120] In January 2008, KKR announced it had made a $1.25 billion PIPE investment in Legg Mason through a convertible preferred stock offering.[121]
In addition to its successful buyout transactions, KKR was involved in the failed buyout of Harman International Industries (NYSE: HAR), an upscale audio equipment maker. On April 26, 2007, Harman announced it had entered an agreement to be acquired by KKR and Goldman Sachs.[122] As the financing markets became more adverse [clarification needed] in the summer of 2007, the buyout was on tenuous ground. In September 2007, KKR and Goldman backed out of the $8 billion buyout of Harman. By the end of the day, Harman's shares had plummeted by more than 24% upon the news.[123]


Selected Kohlberg Kravis Roberts 2006–2008 Investments













Hospital Corporation of America 













NXP Semiconductors 













Dollar General 













Alliance Boots 













TXU 













Sun Microsystems 













Legg Mason 






Initial public offering[edit]
In 2007, KKR filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission[3] to raise $1.25 billion by selling an ownership interest in its management company.[124] The filing came less than two weeks after the initial public offering of rival private equity firm Blackstone Group. KKR had previously listed its KPE vehicle in 2006, but for the first time, KKR would offer investors an ownership interest in the management company itself. The onset of the credit crunch and the shutdown of the IPO market dampened the prospects of obtaining a valuation attractive to KKR. The flotation was repeatedly postponed, and called off by the end of August.[125]
The following year, in July 2008, KKR announced a new plan to list its shares. The plan called for KKR to complete a reverse takeover of its listed affiliate KKR Private Equity Investors in exchange for a 21% interest in the firm.[126] In November 2008, KKR announced a delay of this transaction until 2009. Shares of KPE had declined significantly in the second half of 2008 with the onset of the credit crunch. KKR has announced that it expects to close the transaction in 2009.[127] In October 2009, KKR listed shares in KKR & Co. on the Euronext exchange, replacing KPE and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange in 2010. The public entity represents a 30% interest in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts. In October 2010, KKR acquired about nine members of Goldman Sachs Group proprietary trading team after entertaining offers from investment firms such as Perella Weinberg and Blackrock. With Goldman shutting down its proprietary trading operations, its executives, led by Bob Howard, will help KKR expand beyond leveraged buyouts into areas such as hedge funds.
2010 to present day[edit]
In January 2014, KKR acquired Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc for $2.4 billion from two private equity companies - Stone Point, and Hellman & Friedman.[128]
In June 2014, KKR announced it was taking a one-third stake in a Spanish energy business of Acciona Energy, at a cost of €417 million ($567 million). The international renewable energy generation business operates renewable assets, largely wind farms, across 14 countries including the United States, Italy and South Africa.[129]
In August 2014, KKR announced it was investing $400 million to acquire Fujian Sunner Development, China's largest chicken farmer, which breeds, processes and supplies frozen and fresh chickens to consumers and corporate clients, such as KFC and McDonald's, across China.[130]
In September 2014, the firm invested $90 million in a lighting and electrics firm Savant Systems.[131]
In January 2015, KKR confirmed its purchase of British rail ticket website thetrainline.com, previously owned by Exponent. The purchase sum is unknown.[132]
On October 12, 2015, KKR announced that it has entered into definitive agreement with Allianz Capital Partners to acquire their majority stake in Selecta Group, a European vending services operator.[133]
On September 1, 2016, KKR announced that it had acquired Epicor Software Corporation, an American software company.[134]
In October 2016, it was reported that KKR invested $250 million in OVH to be used for further international expansion.[135] This funding round valued OVH at over $1 billion, making it a unicorn.
In December 2016, the Lonza Group announced it would acquire Capsugel for $5.5 billion from Kohlberg Kravis Roberts.[136]
In February 2017 KKR were reported to be trying to take over the international market research company ARI GfK SE.[137] In July of the same year KKR acquired WebMD Health Corp for $2.8 billion.[138]
Notable current and former employees[edit]
Over the years, KKR has seen the departure of many of its original partners, the most notable being original co-founder Jerome Kohlberg. After a leave of absence due to an illness in 1985, Kohlberg returned to find increasing differences in strategy with his partners Kravis and Roberts.[139] In 1987, Kohlberg left KKR to found a new private equity firm Kohlberg & Company. Kohlberg & Company returned to the investment style that Kohlberg had originally practiced at Bear Stearns and in KKR's earlier years, acquiring smaller, middle-market companies.[4][140][141]
Since 1996, general partners of KKR have included Henry Kravis, George R. Roberts, Paul Raether, Robert MacDonnell, Jose Gandarillas, Michael Michelson, Saul Fox, James Greene, Michael Tokarz, Clifton Robbins, Scott Stuart, Perry Golkin and Edward Gilhuly.[142] Among those who left were Saul Fox, Ted Ammon, Ned Gilhuly, Mike Tokarz and Scott Stuart who had been instrumental in establishing KKR's reputation and track record in the 1980s.[143] KKR remains tightly controlled by Kravis and Roberts. The issue of succession has remained an important consideration for KKR's future as an ongoing institutionalized firm.

Scott C. Nuttall (born 1972), heads KKR's fastest-growing department, the Global Capital and Asset Management Group, which includes Asset Management, Capital Markets and Client and Partner Group. He joined KKR in November 1996 after leaving the Blackstone Group. His group, the firm's fastest-growing division, has $25 billion under management. With the support of co-founder George Roberts, Nuttall has largely spearheaded the campaign to expand KKR beyond its institutional investors (legacy and otherwise) into credit investment, and alternative investments, pointing out that there are billions "in revenues up for grabs".[144][145][146] He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Joseph Bae on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. He will concentrate on KKR's corporate and real estate credit, capital markets, hedge fund and capital raising businesses together with the firm's corporate development, balance sheet and strategic growth initiatives.[147] New York Times called him and Joseph Bae as potential successors.[148] He graduated from University of Pennsylvania with a Bachelor of Science degree.
Joseph Bae (born circa 1972) joined KKR from Goldman Sachs in 1996. Most recently, he was the Managing Partner of KKR Asia and the Global Head of KKR's Infrastructure and Energy Real Asset businesses. Mr. Bae has been the architect of KKR's Asian expansion since 2005. He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Scott Nuttall on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. Mr. Bae will focus on KKR's global private equity businesses as well as the Firm's real asset platforms across energy, infrastructure and real estate private equity.[147] He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree from Harvard College.
Saul A. Fox left KKR in 1997 to found Fox Paine & Company, a middle market private equity firm with over $1.5 billion of capital under management[149][150]
Clifton S. Robbins left KKR to join competitor General Atlantic Partners in 2000 and later founded Blue Harbour Group,[151] a private investment firm based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[152]
Edward A. Gilhuly and Scott Stuart left KKR in 2004 to launch Sageview Capital. Prior to this, Gilhuly was the managing partner of KKR's European operations, based in London; Stuart managed KKR's energy and consumer products industry groups.[152]
Ted Ammon, started several new ventures including Big Flower Press, which printed newspaper circulars, and Chancery Lane Capital, a boutique private equity firm, before being murdered in his Long Island home October 2001. The lover of his estranged, now deceased wife, Generosa, was later convicted.[152][153][154][155]
Paul Hazen, served as chairman and CEO of Wells Fargo (1995–2001).[156] Hazen later returned to KKR to serve as chairman of Accel-KKR, a joint venture with Accel Partners and later as chairman of KKR's publicly listed affiliate, KFN.
Clive Hollick, Baron Hollick, CEO of United News and Media (1996–2005)
Ken Mehlman joined KKR in 2008 as Global Head of Public Affairs.[157]
David Petraeus, selected to serve as chairman of the newly formed KKR Global Institute (2013—present)[158]
Joseph Grundfest, Professor at Stanford Law School and youngest SEC Commissioner

Works about KKR[edit]


Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
Anders, George (1992). Merchants of Debt: KKR and the Mortgaging of American Business. New York: BasicBooks. ISBN 978-0-465-04522-8. 
Bartlett, Sarah (1991). The Money Machine: How KKR Manufactured Power & Profits. New York: Warner Books. ISBN 978-0-446-51608-2. 
Burrough, Bryan (1990). Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-016172-8. 


See also[edit]

Jerome Kohlberg
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts

Notes[edit]


^ a b c KKR locations (company Web site); retrieved March 8, 2010. Archived January 18, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ http://ir.kkr.com/common/download/download.cfm?companyid=KKR&fileid=930140&filekey=C070EEBD-B0D9-49A9-8346-B3E15E803AA6&filename=SEC-KKR-1404912-17-5.pdf
^ a b c d KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ a b c d e f g h i Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Company History. Funding Universe; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "What's An Aging 'Barbarian' To Do?" The New York Times, August 26, 2001.
^ What Does Henry Kravis Want?. The New York Times, September 6, 2008
^ KKR Investment History (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR to Relocate Corporate Headquarters to Manhattan’s Transformative New Neighborhood on the West Side | Business Wire". www.businesswire.com. Retrieved 2015-12-31. 
^ "KKR Files for NYSE Listing", March 17, 2010.
^ a b 2007 KKR Annual Review[dead link]; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Canada Pension Plan Unit to Join K.K.R. Merchant Banking Venture", New York Times (Dealbook Section), January 17, 2013.
^ a b "Several Giant Pension Funds Investing in Offer for Nabisco". The New York Times, October 31, 1988.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form 10-Q, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 31, 2014
^ a b "KKR Financial REIT IPO debuts: Kohlberg Kravis Roberts manages trust", Marketwatch.com, June 24, 2005.
^ KKR arm in talks after fresh repayment delays. Reuters, February 20, 2008.
^ "Kohlberg Affiliate Sells Stake in Unit", Reuters, April 1, 2008.
^ "Opening Private Equity's Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors". The New York Times, May 4, 2006.
^ Timmons, Heather. "Private Equity Goes Public for $5 Billion. Its Investors Ask, ‘What's Next?’". The New York Times, November 10, 2006
^ Anderson, Jenny. "Where Private Equity Goes, Hedge Funds May Follow", New York Times, June 23, 2006.
^ KKR Private Equity Investors Reports Results for Quarter Ended March 31, 2008 Archived March 20, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.. KKR Private Equity Investors Press Release, May 7, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ see pdf-document, retrieved in January 2015
^ statement on KKR-leaflet, retrieved in January 2015
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row, 1990; pp. 133-136.
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate (New York: Harper & Row, 1990), pp. 136-140.
^ Holland, Max (1989), When the Machine Stopped: A Cautionary Tale from Industrial America, Boston: Harvard Business School Press, ISBN 978-0-87584-208-0, OCLC 246343673. , pp. 149–169.
^ Malone & Hyde Accepts Bid The New York Times, June 12, 1984.
^ Wayne, Leslie. "Wometco Agrees To Buyout", The New York Times. September 22, 1983.
^ Dodson, Steve. "Beatrice Deal Is Biggest Buyout Yet". The New York Times, November 17, 1985.
^ Sterngold, James. "Drexel's Role in Beatrice Deal Examined". The New York Times, April 28, 1988.
^ Fisher, Lawrence M. Safeway Buyout: A Success Story. The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ Feder, Barnaby. "Asbestos: The Saga Drags On". The New York Times, April 2, 1989.
^ "Chapter 11 For Kohlberg, Kravis Unit". The New York Times, December 28, 1989.
^ "The Granddaddy Of All Takeovers", The New York Times Book Review, January 21, 1990.
^ "Nabisco Executives Offer $17 Billion for Company". The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ "Shearson Risks, Rewards on RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 22, 1988.
^ "Nabisco Bid Seen by Kohlberg". The New York Times, October 24, 1988.
^ "Buyout Specialist Bids $20.3 Billion For RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 25, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bid Gives New Respectability To Giant Deals Financed With Huge Debt". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "Concern Over Kohlberg, Kravis Strategy". The New York Times, November 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bidders Said to Talk". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "The Nabisco Battle's Key Moment". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ Joint Deal For Nabisco Is Rejected. The New York Times, October 27, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Will Give Kohlberg, Kravis Data. The New York Times, October 27, 1988
^ Forstmann Declines to Bid on RJR Nabisco. The New York Times, November 17, 1988.
^ "Suitors Quarrel Over RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, November 8, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Discloses Guidelines for Its Buyout. The New York Times, November 9, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Suitor Claims $24.88 Billion Victory". The New York Times, December 1, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Explains Its Choice". The New York Times, December 8, 1988
^ "Nabisco Executives to Take Huge Gains in Their Buyout". The New York Times, November 5, 1988.
^ "A Growing Backlash Against Greed". The New York Times, November 13, 1988
^ "Game of Greed", Time Magazine (1988)
^ "Losers Get Some Spoils In Fight for RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, December 2, 1988
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Collect $75 Million RJR Nabisco Fee". The New York Times, February 1, 1989.
^ "RJR Nabisco, An Epilogue". The New York Times, March 12, 1999.
^ "2 Buyout Firms Build New Funds". The New York Times, November 23, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Now RJR's Owner". Associated Press, April 29, 1989.
^ "History Of The RJR Nabisco Takeover". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "Is RJR Worth $25 Billion?" The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Completes Sale of Del Monte". The New York Times, January 11, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts Loan to RJR Renegotiated". The New York Times, June 27, 1990.
^ "RJR Move Helps Lift 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, July 17, 1990.
^ "RJR Offers Cash and Stock for 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, December 18, 1990.
^ Agrees to a Takeover. The New York Times, September 13, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg's Impetus in Borden Deal". The New York Times, September 14, 1994.
^ "Borden Signs Agreement for Sale to Kohlberg". The New York Times, September 24, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Says It Has Control of Borden". The New York Times, December 22, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans to Divest Remaining Stake in RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, March 16, 1995.
^ "Apollo Buys Borden Chemical for $649 million". The New York Times, July 7, 2004.
^ "Kohlberg Ends Bid for Macmillan". The New York Times, November 4, 1988.
^ K-III's New Name To Be 'Primedia'. The New York Times, November 1, 1997.
^ "Macmillan Book Club Unit And a Publisher Being Sold". The New York Times, May 23, 1989.
^ a b "As Primedia Falls, Preferred Stock Lives Up to Its Name". The New York Times, October 26, 2005.
^ Kravis Rouses Itself, The New York Times, April 29, 1991
^ "K-III Communications Files Plan For an Initial Offering of Stock". The New York Times, September 6, 1995.
^ Regulators Pick Buyer To Operate New England Bank. The New York Times, April 23, 1991.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis in Swap for 7.5% of Fleet". The New York Times, January 3, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis in Aetna Reinsurance Deal". The New York Times, June 9, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans Stake in TW". The New York Times, June 26, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg Unit to Buy Alden Press". The New York Times, January 19, 1993.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Acquire Bruno's Supermarket Chain". The New York Times, April 21, 1995.
^ "$5 Billion Fund By Kohlberg Seen". The New York Times, September 13, 1996.
^ "At K.K.R., the Glory Days Are Past". The New York Times, August 10, 1995.
^ "Kohlberg Plans Stake In Spalding And Evenflo". The New York Times, August 16, 1996.
^ "Newsquest Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Will Buy Kindercare for $467 Million". The New York Times, October 4, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Set to Offer $1.2 Billion for Cable Maker". The New York Times, January 24, 1997.
^ Roundup, An Interactive Edition News (1997-06-28). "KKR Completes Purchase Of Randalls for $225 Million". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2016-12-19. 
^ "Supermarkets Get a Brand New Bag". The New York Times, August 31, 1997.
^ "The Boyds Collection, Ltd. Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis And Welsh Carson Acquiring Medcath". The New York Times, March 14, 1998.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis-Led Group To Buy Big Insurance Broker". The New York Times, July 23, 1998.
^ "Wincor Nixdorf Holding Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ 2 Buyout Firms Make Deal To Acquire Regal Cinemas. The New York Times, January 21, 1998
^ Kohlberg Kravis In $660 Million Deal For Act III Cinemas. The New York Times, October 21, 1997.
^ "Amid Blame, United Artists Sale Collapses". The New York Times, February 23, 1998.
^ "Regal Cinemas Considers Filing For Bankruptcy". The New York Times, November 16, 2000.
^ a b Shoppers Drug Mart Sells Shares. Retail Merchandiser, March 17, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "BCE Sells Directory Unit". The New York Times, November 30, 2002.
^ "Yellow Pages Income Fund Announces, 43 Million Offering"[permanent dead link]. Yellow Pages Group press release, May 26, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Rozhon, Tracie. "Three Firms Are Said to Buy Toys 'R' Us for $6 Billion". New York Times, March 17, 2005.
^ What's Next for Toys 'R' Us?. The Wall Street Journal, March 18, 2005.
^ "Deal Mania: Shades of the '80s: The leveraged buyout is back in vogue" Archived 2008-11-01 at the Wayback Machine.. US News & World Report, April 10, 2005.
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal". The New York Times, March 29, 2005.
^ "Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?" The New York Times, April 3, 2005.
^ K.K.R., Texas Pacific Plan Record Buyout of TXU. The New York Times, February 23, 2007.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross. "HCA Buyout Highlights Era of Going Private". The New York Times, July 25, 2006.
^ Bloomberg News (August 4, 2006). "Technology; Royal Philips Sells Unit for $4.4 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ "Takeover firms will pay $15.3b to buy Danish phone giant TDC." Bloomberg, December 1, 2005
^ "TDC-One year on." Dow Jones Private Equity News, January 22, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Peters, Jeremy W. (March 13, 2007). "Buyout Firm Is Acquiring Dollar General Retail Chain". The New York Times. Retrieved January 4, 2009. 
^ Werdigier, Julia. "Equity Firm Wins Bidding for a Retailer, Alliance Boots". The New York Times, April 25, 2007.
^ "Terra Firma drops Boots bid plan". BBC. April 24, 2007. 
^ De la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer". New York Times, June 8, 2007
^ "KKR Offer of $26 Billion Is Accepted by First Data". Reuters, April 3, 2007
^ "Kohlberg Kravis to Buy First Data for $29 Billion". The New York Times, April 3, 2007.
^ Source: Thomson Financial
^ Lonkevich, Dan and Klump, Edward. KKR, Texas Pacific Will Acquire TXU for $45 Billion Bloomberg.com, February 26, 2007.
^ Skariachan, Dhanya (February 26, 2007). "KKR, Texas Pacific-led group to buy TXU Corp". Reuters. 
^ "Seven in $4bn asset sell-off" Archived 2007-11-14 at the Wayback Machine.. News.com.au, November 20, 2006
^ "Sun Microsystems Welcomes Endorsement and Investment From KKR". Sun Microsystems Press Release, January 23, 2007 Archived September 29, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Legg Mason Makes Deal With Equity Firm". Reuters, January 15, 2008
^ Harman International Industries to be Acquired by KKR and GS Capital Partners. Harman International press release, April 26, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived July 4, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Wary Buyers May Scuttle Two Deals". The New York Times, September 22, 2007.
^ Jenny Anderson and Michael J. de la Merced. "Kohlberg Kravis Plans to Go Public", The New York Times, July 4, 2007.
^ "KKR postpones $1.25 bn float as credit chaos deters buyers". The Times (UK), August 23, 2007.
^ After Delay, KKR Finds a Way to Go Public. The New York Times, July 28, 2008.
^ K.K.R. Calls Listing Delay ‘Process Related’. The New York Times, November 3, 2008.
^ Neha Dimri; Aman Shah (28 January 2014). "KKR to take control of Sedgwick Claims Management in $2.4 billion deal". Reuters. 
^ "Equity investor KKR picks stakes in Acciona Energia unit for 417mn euros". Spain News.Net. Retrieved 24 June 2014. 
^ "KKR to acquire China chicken developer for $400 mn". Business Sun. 26 August 2014. Retrieved 27 August 2014. 
^ KKR invests in smart home tech company Savant Systems. Reuters, 4 September 2014
^ "Deals of the day - Mergers and acquisitions". Reuters. Retrieved 2015-01-22. 
^ "KKR | KKR agrees to acquire majority stake in Selecta from ACP". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2015-10-12. 
^ "Epicor Announces Close of KKR Acquisition and Executive Leadership Appointments to Accelerate Growth Strategy". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2016-09-01. 
^ "Klaba Family OVH, Europe No. 1 Web Host, Raises €250M from $KKR, TowerBrook". exithub. Retrieved 14 January 2017. 
^ "Lonza Buys Capsugel for $5.5B Cash - GEN Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News - Biotech from Bench to Business - GEN". GEN. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ Germany, wysiwyg* Software Design GmbH, Düsseldorf,. "Acceleratio Capital N.V.". www.acceleratio-angebot.de. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/us-webmd-m-a-kkr-idUKKBN1A915Y
^ "Buyout Pioneer Quitting Fray". The New York Times, June 19, 1987.
^ Kohlberg In Dispute Over Firm. The New York Times, August 30, 1989.
^ "Kohlberg Suit Settlement". The New York Times, February 23, 1990.
^ Duracell International Inc. SEC Form SC 13G/A ("Statement of acquisition of beneficial ownership"); filed February 6, 1996.
^ Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
^ Scott Nuttall profile at Forbes
^ "A kinder, gentler KKR wants a piece of your 401K", Forbes, January 23, 2013.
^ Profile of Scott Nuttall at investing.businessweek.com, Businessweek.com, January 23, 2013.
^ a b "KKR Appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers". KKR Press Release. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Next Generation at K.K.R. Set as It Names Two Co-Presidents". New York Times. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ ""For Saul Fox, Bigger Isn’t Always Better in the World of Buyouts". foxpaine.com, May 15, 2000. Retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Anders, George. "Bitter End of a Partnership", Wall Street Journal, September 15, 2007.
^ Blue Harbour Group> About Blue Harbour Archived 2008-03-13 at the Wayback Machine. (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ a b c Barbarians at the Gate: Contrasting fortunes for those closest to the deal. eFinancial News, November 3, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Pelosi Found Guilty of Murder". CBS News. December 13, 2004. Retrieved May 17, 2007. 
^ "Murder in East Hampton", Vanity Fair, January 2002.
^ "Mystery of the Murdered Millionaire". Dateline NBC; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Paul M. Hazen profile as Wells Fargo & Co. Chairman and CEO Archived 2005-09-14 at the Wayback Machine.; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Mehlman profile at KKR website Archived 2013-07-30 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR names former CIA head Petraeus as chairman of new institute". 30 May 2013. Retrieved 5 June 2017 – via Reuters. 


References[edit]


FT.com / Industries / Basic industries – "KKR set to buy Masonite for C$3.1bn"
Gross, Daniel & David Sterling. "Has Henry Kravis gone soft?". Slate, August 5, 2007; retrieved August 7, 2007.
The KKR Way. Bloomberg Markets, August 2007
"The barbarians at the gate have been losing their Midas touch". timesonline.co.uk, August 6, 2005; retrieved February 16, 2009.


External links[edit]

Yahoo! – Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. company profile







v
t
e


Kohlberg Kravis Roberts



Founders



Jerome Kohlberg Jr.
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts





Selected current investments



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Aricent Group
Bharti Enterprises
Capsugel
CICC
Café Coffee Day
Colonial Pipeline
Del Monte Foods
Dollar General
Eastman Kodak
El Paso Corp.
Energy Future Holdings
First Data
Hospital Corporation of America
KION Group
Laureate Education
Legg Mason
Legrand
Magma Fincorp
Maxeda
Nielsen Holdings
Northgate Information Solutions
NXP Semiconductors
Oriental Brewery
Pets at Home
ProSiebenSat.1 Media
Sealy Corporation
Seven West Media
TDC A/S
Toys "R" Us
US Foods
Visma
Wild
Yageo
Zhone Technologies








 Category












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kohlberg_Kravis_Roberts&oldid=792147823"					
Categories: Kohlberg Kravis RobertsCompanies based in New York CityCompanies established in 1976Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeKohlberg Kravis Roberts companiesMezzanine capital investment firmsPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from January 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with a promotional tone from June 2017All articles with a promotional toneArticles needing cleanup from June 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from June 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from June 2017Wikipedia articles needing style editing from June 2017All articles needing style editingArticles with peacock terms from June 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles that may be too long from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from September 2013Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


CatalàDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 19:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 















Private Equity | KKR





































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 
















Toggle navigation





MENU












































×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






Private Equity






Private Equity


Toggle navigation





MORE

Private Equity













 Email
 LinkedIn
 Twitter
 Facebook








                            	Play Video >                            



KKR’s Approach: Private Equity in the EMEA Region
                            Johannes Huth, Member and Head of KKR EMEA, discusses KKR’s approach to private equity investing in Europe, the Middle East, and Africa. November 17, 2014.                        









 Email
 LinkedIn
 Twitter
 Facebook
















At KKR we are particularly proud of our global, integrated approach. We operate as one firm, leveraging all of our businesses and partnering across the firm on behalf of our fund investors and the companies in which we invest. KKR’s Private Equity platform invests in and partners with industry-leading franchises and companies poised for significant improvement or growth that attract high-quality management teams. Moreover, we are disciplined investors, focusing on long-term business fundamentals.
Working Together
We look to partner closely and cooperatively with management teams and entrepreneurs that have track records of success. We believe that the combination of our industry knowledge, investment experience, and operational expertise provides KKR with an edge in identifying and creating value in investment opportunities. Our strategy is not only to work as partners with the management of our portfolio companies, but also to assist in the operations of our businesses and leverage all of the resources of our global platform.
Ways We Invest
In addition to traditional management buyouts and build-ups, the business seeks to find opportunities to provide growth capital, as well as minority investments, and public toe hold investments where we can partner with public companies and leverage our industry expertise and operational capabilities.
Our Experience
Throughout our history, we have consistently been a leader in the private equity industry, having completed more than 280 private equity investments in portfolio companies with approximately $542 billion of total entreprise value as of March 31, 2017.
On March 6, 2017, we announced the closing of our latest Americas Private Equity fund, KKR Americas XII Fund, a $13.9 billion fund focused on opportunistic investments in private equity-related transactions primarily in the United States, Canada and Mexico. More information can be found here.


On June 1, 2017, we announced the closing of our latest Asia Private Equity fund, KKR Asian Fund III, a $9.3 billion fund focused on investments in private equity transactions across the Asia Pacific region. More information can be found here.



KKR’s Private Equity team sees investment opportunities across the following industries by region:


 

View KKR’s Support of the Walker Report PDF format (0.1mb).
View KKR’s Modern Slavery Transparency Statement PDF format (0.1mb).











  











Kohlberg Kravis Roberts - Wikipedia





















 







Kohlberg Kravis Roberts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"KKR" redirects here. For other uses, see KKR (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Too much unnecessary detail and puffery Please help improve this article if you can. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may have too many section headers dividing up its content. Please help improve the article by merging similar sections and removing unneeded subheaders. (June 2017)







This article may contain an excessive amount of intricate detail that may only interest a specific audience. Please help by spinning off or relocating any relevant information, and removing excessive detail that may be against Wikipedia's inclusion policy. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may be too long to read and navigate comfortably. Please consider splitting content into sub-articles, condensing it, or adding or removing subheadings. (June 2017)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



KKR & Co. L.P.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: KKR


Industry
Financial services:
private equity
(1976–present)
investment banking
(2004–present)


Founded
1976; 41 years ago (1976)


Founder
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts
Jerome Kohlberg, Jr.


Headquarters
9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York City, New York 10019
United States



Number of locations

13 offices in 9 countries[1]



Key people

Henry R. Kravis
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)
George R. Roberts
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)


Products
Management buyouts
Leveraged finance
Venture capital
Growth capital


Revenue
US$ 8.896 billion (2013)



Net income

US$ 691.2 million (2013)


AUM
US$ 98.0 billion (2012)


Total assets
US$ 39 billion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

1700 (2017)


Website
www.kkr.com


KKR & Co. L.P. (formerly known as Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.) is an American multinational private equity firm, specializing in leveraged buyouts, headquartered in New York City. The firm sponsors and manages private equity investment funds. The firm has completed over $400 billion of private equity transactions since its inception.[3][4]
The firm was founded in 1976 by Jerome Kohlberg, Jr., and cousins Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts, all of whom had previously worked together at Bear Stearns, where they completed some of the earliest leveraged buyout transactions. Since its founding, KKR has completed a number of transactions including the 1989 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco, which was the largest buyout in history to that point, as well as the 2007 buyout of TXU, which is currently the largest buyout completed to date.[5][6] KKR has completed investments in over 160 companies since 1977, completing at least one investment in every year except in 1982 and in 1990.[7]
KKR has 13 additional offices in the United States, Europe and Asia.[1] The firm is currently located in the Solow Building (9 W. 57th Street), but recently announced its intentions to occupy a newly constructed 30 Hudson Yards.[8]
In October 2009, KKR listed shares in the company through KKR & Co., an affiliate that holds 30% of the firm's ownership equity, with the remainder held by the firm's partners. In March 2010, KKR filed to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE),[9] with trading commencing four months later, on July 15, 2010.



Contents


1 The Firm KKR
2 Investment funds and other affiliates

2.1 Private equity funds
2.2 KKR Financial
2.3 KKR Private Equity Investors


3 History

3.1 Founding and early history
3.2 Buyout of RJR Nabisco
3.3 Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco
3.4 Early 1990s: Investments
3.5 1996–1999
3.6 2000–2005
3.7 Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom
3.8 Initial public offering
3.9 2010 to present day


4 Notable current and former employees
5 Works about KKR
6 See also
7 Notes
8 References
9 External links



The Firm KKR[edit]
KKR is operated by its managing partners Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts and a team of approximately 140 investment professionals and 400 total employees, organized into industry-focused groups.[3] KKR is headquartered in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street, Manhattan, New York, with U.S. offices in Menlo Park, San Francisco, Houston, and Washington, D.C., and offices in London, Paris, Hong Kong, Tokyo, Beijing, Mumbai, Dubai, Seoul, São Paulo and Sydney.[1]
KKR invests primarily through leveraged buyouts as well as growth capital investments (including "PIPE" investments in public companies). It has traditionally specialized in private equity investments, focusing on specific industry sectors where the firm has created nine dedicated investment groups. The industries in which KKR has developed a specialization include:[10]

Chemicals
Consumer products
Energy & natural resources
Financial services
Health care
Industrial
Media and communications
Retail
Technology

The professionals in each of KKR's industry-focused groups are expected to have developed a proficiency in their respective industries.[10] The firm has traditionally had strong ties with its investors.[11]
Investment funds and other affiliates[edit]
Private equity funds[edit]
KKR has historically relied primarily on private equity funds, pools of committed capital that are raised from a broad array of institutional investors (e.g., pension funds, insurance companies, investment banks, commercial banks, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds).[3][12] As of March 31, 2014, KKR had completed fund-raising for approximately 23 traditional investment funds in the US, Europe and Asia with total committed capital of approximately US$80 billion:


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($m)


KKR Fund 1976
1977
$31


KKR Fund 1980
1980
$357


KKR Fund 1982
1982
$328


KKR Fund 1984
1984
$1,000


KKR Fund 1986
1986
$672


KKR Fund 1987
1987
$6,130


KKR Fund 1993
1993
$1,946


KKR Fund 1996
1996
$6,012


KKR European Fund
1999
$3,085


KKR Millennium Fund
2002
$6,000


KKR European Fund II
2005
$5,751


KKR Fund 2006
2006
$17,642


KKR Asian Fund
2007
$4,000


KKR European Fund III
2008
$6,238


KKR E2 Investors (Annex Fund)
2009
$209


KKR China Growth Fund
2010
$1,010


KKR Natural Resources Fund
2010
$876


KKR Infrastructure Fund
2011
$1,043


KKR North America Fund XI
2012
$8,718


KKR Asian Fund II
2013
$5,825


KKR Real Estate Partners Americas
2013
$1,226


KKR Energy Income and Growth Fund
2013
$1,974


Source: SEC Filings[13]
KKR Financial[edit]






Type

Public company (NYSE: KFN)


Founded
2004


Website
www.kkrfinancial.com


KKR Financial (NYSE: KFN) is a real estate investment trust (REIT) and specialty finance company that invests in residential and commercial mortgage loans and mortgage-backed securities as well as corporate loans and debt securities, asset-backed securities and equity securities. KFN was founded in 2004 raising $795 million in a private placement and raised $849 million in a June 2005 initial public offering, increasing the size of the offering from an original $600 million target.[14] KKR had initially considered structuring KFN as a business development company like Apollo Management's Apollo Investment Corporation but chose to pursue the REIT structure to capitalize on the strength in REIT valuations at the time.[14]
KFN was an early casualty of the subprime mortgage crisis and in September 2007, Henry Kravis and George Roberts injected $270 million into the company. On February 20, 2008, KFN was once again forced to delay the repayment of billions of dollars of commercial paper, and began a new round of talks with creditors.[15] In April, KFN sold a controlling interest in a real estate subsidiary to an investment firm to raise cash and entered an agreement with the noteholders of certain secured commercial paper issued by two asset-backed entities. Following the transaction, KFN converted from a REIT to a LLC.[16]
KKR Private Equity Investors[edit]






Type

Public company (Euronext: KPE)


Founded
2006


Website
www.kkrpei.com


KKR Private Equity Investors (Euronext: KPE) is a publicly traded private equity fund that invests as a fund of funds in KKR private equity funds. KPE also co-invests in transactions alongside KKR's private equity funds. KPE was founded in 2006. In May 2006, KKR raised $5 billion in an initial public offering for a KPE to serve as a new permanent investment vehicle listing it on the Euronext exchange in Amsterdam. KKR raised three times more than it expected, as many of the investors in KPE were hedge funds seeking exposure to private equity but could not make long term commitments to private equity funds. As private equity had been booming in preceding years, investing in a KKR fund was attractive to investors.[17]
However, KPE's first-day performance was lackluster, trading down 1.7% and trading volume was limited.[18] Initially, a handful of other private equity firms and hedge funds had planned to follow KKR's lead but shelved those plans when KPE's performance continued to falter after its IPO. KPE's stock declined from an IPO price of €25 per share to €18.16 (a 27% decline) at the end of 2007 and a low of €11.45 (a 54.2% decline) per share in Q1 2008.[19]
KPE disclosed in May 2008 that it had completed approximately $300 million of secondary sales of selected limited partnership interests in, and undrawn commitments to, certain KKR-managed funds in order to generate liquidity and repay borrowings.[20]
In October 2009 KPE changed its name to KKR & Co. (Guernsey) L.P.,[21] which was delisted from Euronext Amsterdam in July 2010 while common units of KKR & Co. L.P. began trading on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “KKR”.[22]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
Running the corporate finance department for Bear Stearns in the 1960s and 1970s, Jerome Kohlberg and later with protégés Henry Kravis and George Roberts completed a series of what they described as "bootstrap" investments beginning in 1964–65. They targeted family-owned businesses, many of which had been founded in the years following World War II which by the 1960s and 1970s were facing succession issues. Many of these companies lacked a viable or attractive exit for their founders as they were too small to be taken public and the founders were reluctant to sell out to competitors and so a sale to a financial buyer could prove attractive.[4]




Henry Kravis speaking at the World Economic Forum in 2009


Their acquisition of Orkin Exterminating Company in 1964 is among the first significant leveraged buyout transactions. In the following years the three Bear Stearns bankers would complete a series of buyouts including Stern Metals (1965), Incom (a division of Rockwood International, 1971), Cobblers Industries (1971), and Boren Clay (1973), as well as Thompson Wire, Eagle Motors and Barrows through their investment in Stern Metals. Despite a number of highly successful investments, the $27 million investment in Cobblers ended in bankruptcy.[23]
By 1976, tensions [clarification needed] had built up between Bear Stearns and Kohlberg, Kravis and Roberts, which led to the formation of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in that year. Most notably, Bear Stearns executive Cy Lewis had rejected repeated proposals to form a dedicated investment fund within Bear Stearns and Lewis took exception to the amount of time spent on outside activities. In 1976, Kravis had been required to serve as interim CEO of a failing direct mail company named Advo.[citation needed]
The new KKR completed its first buyout, that of manufacturer A.J. Industries, in 1977. KKR raised capital from a small group of investors including the Hillman Company and First Chicago Bank. By 1978, with the revision of the ERISA regulations, the nascent KKR was successful in raising its first institutional fund with over $30 million of investor commitments.[24] In 1981, KKR expanded its investor base significantly when the Oregon State Treasury's public pension fund invested in KKR's acquisition of retailer Fred Meyer, Inc. Oregon State remains an active investor in KKR funds.[4]
KKR closed out the 1970s completing the public-to-private buyout of Houdaille Industries in 1979,[25] probably the largest take-private of a public company to that point. As the 1980s began, KKR was among the most prominent practitioner of leveraged buyouts and would prove the most prolific of the private equity investors in the 1980s.[4] Among the firm's most notable acquisitions during the 1980s buyout boom were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


Malone & Hyde
1984
KKR completed the first buyout of a public company by tender offer, by acquiring the food distributor and supermarket operator together with the company's chairman Joseph R. Hyde III.
[26]


Wometco Enterprises
1984
KKR completed the first billion-dollar buyout transaction to acquire the leisure-time company with interests in television, movie theaters and tourist attractions. The buyout comprised the acquisition of 100% of the outstanding shares for $842 million and the assumption of $170 million of the company's outstanding debt.
[27]


Beatrice Companies
1985
KKR sponsored the $6.1 billion management buyout of Beatrice, which owned Samsonite and Tropicana among other consumer brands. At the time of its closing in 1985, Beatrice was the largest buyout completed.
[28][29]


Safeway
1986
KKR completed a friendly $5.5 billion buyout of Safeway to help management avoid hostile overtures from Herbert and Robert Haft of Dart Drug. Safeway was taken public again in 1990.
[30]


Jim Walter Corp.
(later Walter Industries)
1987
KKR acquired the company for $3.3 billion in early 1988 but faced issues with the buyout almost immediately. Most notably, a subsidiary of Jim Walter Corp (Celotex) faced a large asbestos lawsuit and incurred liabilities that the courts ruled would need to be satisfied by the parent company. In 1989, the holding company which KKR used for the Jim Walter buyout filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
[31][32]


Buyout of RJR Nabisco[edit]
Main article: RJR Nabisco
After the 1987 resignation of Jerome Kohlberg at age 61 (he later founded his own private equity firm, Kohlberg & Co.), Henry Kravis succeeded him as senior partner. Under Kravis and Roberts, the firm was responsible for the 1988 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco. RJR Nabisco proved to be not only the largest buyout in history to that time, at $25 billion ($31.1 billion, including assumed debt) as well as a high-water mark and sign of the end of the 1980s buyout boom. RJR—Nabisco, which would remain the largest buyout for the next 17 years, was chronicled in Barbarians at the Gate: The Fall of RJR Nabisco, and later made into a television movie starring James Garner.[33]
In 1988, F. Ross Johnson was the President and CEO of RJR Nabisco, formed in 1985 by the merger of Nabisco Brands and R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company, a leading producer of food products (Shredded Wheat, Oreo cookies, Ritz crackers, Planters peanuts, Life Savers, Del Monte Fruit and Vegetables, and Snickers Chocolate) as well as Winston, Camel and Salem cigarettes. In October 1988, Johnson proposed a $17 billion ($75 per share) management buyout of the company with the financial backing of investment bank Shearson Lehman Hutton and its parent company, American Express.[34][35]
Several days later, Kravis, who had originally suggested the idea of the buyout to Johnson, presented a new bid for $20.3 billion ($90 per share) financed with an aggressive debt package.[36][37][38] KKR had the support of significant equity co-investments from leading pension funds and other institutional investors. Investors included Coca-Cola, Georgia-Pacific and United Technologies corporate pension funds, as well as endowments from MIT, Harvard and the New York State Common Retirement Fund[12] However, KKR faced criticism from existing investors over the firm's use of hostile tactics in the buyout of RJR.[39]
KKR proposed to provide a joint offer with Johnson and Shearson Lehman but was rebuffed and Johnson attempted to stonewall KKR's access to financial information from RJR.[40][41][42][43] Rival private equity firm, Forstmann Little & Co. was invited into the process by Shearson Lehman but attempted to provide a bid for RJR with a consortium of Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Procter & Gamble, Ralston Purina and Castle & Cooke.[44]
Ultimately the Forstmann consortium came apart and did not provide a final bid for RJR.[45] Many of the major banking players of the day, including Shearson Lehman Hutton, Drexel Burnham Lambert, Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Salomon Brothers and Merrill Lynch were actively involved in advising and financing the parties.




Oreo cookies, one of RJR Nabisco's products


In November 1988, RJR set guidelines for a final bid submission at the end of the month.[46] The management and Shearson group submitted a final bid of $112, a figure they felt certain would enable them to outflank any response by Kravis and KKR. KKR's final bid of $109, while a lower dollar figure, was ultimately accepted by the board of directors of RJR Nabisco.[47] KKR's offer was guaranteed, whereas the management offer lacked a "reset", meaning that the final share price might have been lower than their stated $112 per share.[48]
Additionally, many in RJR's board of directors had grown concerned at recent disclosures of Ross Johnson' unprecedented golden parachute deal.[49][50] Time Magazine featured Ross Johnson on the cover of their December 1988 issue along with the headline, "A Game of Greed: This man could pocket $100 million from the largest corporate takeover in history. Has the buyout craze gone too far?".[51] KKR's offer was welcomed by the board, and, to some observers, it appeared that their elevation of the reset issue as a deal-breaker in KKR's favor was little more than an excuse to reject Ross Johnson's higher payout of $112 per share. Johnson received $53 million from the buyout.[52] KKR collected a $75 million fee in the RJR takeover.[53] At $31.1 billion of transaction value (including assumed debt), RJR Nabisco was by far the largest leveraged buyout in history.[54]
In 2006 and 2007, a number of leveraged buyout transactions were completed which, for the first time, surpassed the RJR Nabisco leveraged buyout in terms of nominal purchase price. The deal was first surpassed in July 2006 by the $33 billion buyout of U.S. hospital operator Hospital Corporation of America, in which KKR participated, though the RJR deal was larger, adjusted for inflation. However, adjusted for inflation, none of the leveraged buyouts of the 2006–07 period would surpass RJR Nabisco. The RJR transaction benefited many of the parties involved. Investment bankers and lawyers who advised KKR walked away with over $1 billion in fees. Kravis and Roberts attracted an unprecedented amount of publicity that turned the cousins into instant celebrities. Size did not, however, guarantee success as the high purchase price and debt load would burden the performance of the investment, which KKR overcame, raising a new investment fund and continuing to invest throughout the 1990s.[55]
Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco[edit]




KKR's headquarters in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street in New York City


The buyout of RJR Nabisco was completed in April 1989 and KKR would spend the early 1990s repaying the RJR's enormous debt load through a series of asset sales and restructuring transactions.[56][57][58] After the RJR Nabisco deal, KKR did not complete a single investment in 1990, the first such year since 1982. They would not complete another major leveraged buyout transaction for more than three years, largely because of the shutdown of the high yield bond market and the collapse of Drexel Burnham Lambert which filed for bankruptcy in February 1990. KKR began to focus primarily on its existing portfolio companies acquired during the buyout boom of the late 1980s. Six of KKR's portfolio companies completed IPOs in 1991, including RJR Nabisco and Duracell.[4]
As the new decade began, KKR began restructuring RJR. In January 1990, it completed the sale of RJR's Del Monte Foods to a group led by Merrill Lynch. KKR had originally identified a group of divisions that it could sell to reduce debt.[59] Over the coming years, RJR would pursue a number of additional restructurings, equity injections and public offerings of stock to provide the company with added financial flexibility. KKR contributed $1.7 billion of new equity into RJR in July 1990 to complete a restructuring of the company's balance sheet that appeased unhappy bondholders. KKR's equity contribution as part of the original leveraged buyout of RJR had been only $1.5 billion.[60][61] In mid-December 1990, RJR announced an exchange offer that would swap debt in RJR for a new public stock in the company, effectively an unusual means of taking RJR public again and simultaneously reducing debt on the company.[62]
RJR issued additional stock to the public in March 1991 to further reduce debt, resulting in an upgrade of the credit rating of RJR's debt from junk to investment grade. KKR began to reduce its ownership in RJR in 1994, when its stock in RJR was used as part of the consideration for its leveraged buyout of Borden, Inc., a producer of food and beverage products, consumer products, and industrial products, in an unprecedented and complex transaction.[63][64] [65][66] The following year, in 1995, KKR would divest itself of its final stake in RJR Nabisco when Borden sold a $638 million block of stock.[67]
While KKR no longer had any ownership of RJR Nabisco by 1995, its original investment would not be fully realized until KKR exited its last investment in 2004. After sixteen years of efforts, including contributing new equity, taking RJR public, asset sales and exchanging shares of RJR for the ownership of Borden, Inc., KKR finally sold the last remnants of its 1989 investment. In July 2004, KKR agreed to sell its stock in Borden Chemical to Apollo Management for $1.2 billion.[68]
Early 1990s: Investments[edit]
In the early 1990s, the absence of an active high yield market prompted KKR to change its tactics, avoiding large leveraged buyouts in favor of industry consolidations through what were described as leveraged buildups or rollups. One of KKR's largest investments in the 1990s was the leveraged buildup of Primedia in partnership with former executives of Macmillan Publishing, which KKR had failed to acquire in 1988.[69] KKR created Primedia's predecessor, K-III Communications,[70] a platform to buy media properties, initially completing the $310 million divisional buyout of the book club division of Macmillan along with the assets of Intertec Publishing Corporation in May 1989.[71][72]
During the early 1990s, K-III continued acquiring publishing assets, including a $650 million acquisition from News Corporation in 1991.[73] K-III went public, however instead of cashing out, KKR continued to make new investments in the company in 1998, 2000 and 2001 to support acquisition activity.[74] In 2005, Primedia redeemed KKR's preferred stock in the company but KKR was estimated to have lost hundreds of millions of dollars on its common stock holdings as the price of the company's stock collapsed.[72]
In 1991, KKR partnered with Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in the 1991 acquisition of the Bank of New England, from the US Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.[75] In January 1996, KKR would exchange its investment for a 7.5% interest in Fleet Bank.[76] KKR completed the 1992 buyout of American Re Corporation from Aetna[77] as well as a 47% interest in TW Corporation, later known as The Flagstar Companies and owner of Denny's in 1992.[78] Among the other notable investments KKR completed in the early 1990s included World Color Press (1993–95),[79] RELTEC Corporation (1995) and Bruno's (1995).[80]
1996–1999[edit]
By the mid-1990s, the debt markets were improving and KKR had moved on from the RJR Nabisco buyout. In 1996, KKR was able to complete the bulk of fundraising for what was then a record $6 billion private equity fund, the KKR 1996 Fund.[81] However, KKR was still burdened by the performance of the RJR investment and repeated obituaries in the media.[82] KKR was required by its investors to reduce the fees it charged and to calculate its carried interest based on the total profit of the fund (i.e., offsetting losses from failed deals against the profits from successful deals).[4]




KKR acquired Regal Cinemas in 1998, only to see the company in bankruptcy by 2000


KKR's activity level would accelerate over the second half of the 1990s making a series of notable investments including Spalding Holdings Corporation and Evenflo (1996),[83] Newsquest (1996),[84] KinderCare Learning Centers (1997),[85] Amphenol Corporation (1997),[86] Randalls Food Markets (1997),[87][88] The Boyds Collection (1998),[89] MedCath Corporation (1998),[90] Willis Group Holdings (1998),[91] Smiths Group (1999), and Wincor Nixdorf (1999).[92]
KKR's largest investment of the 1990s would be one of its least successful. In January 1998, KKR and Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst agreed to the $1.5 billion buyout of Regal Entertainment Group.[93] KKR and Hicks Muse had initially intended to combine Regal with Act III Cinemas, which KKR had acquired in 1997 for $706 million[94] and United Artists Theaters, which Hicks Muse had agreed to acquire for $840 million in November 1997. Shortly after agreeing to the Regal takeover, the deal with United Artists fell apart, destroying the strategy to eliminate costs by building a larger combined company.[95] Two years later, in 2000, Regal encountered significant financial issues and was forced to file for bankruptcy protection; the company passed to billionaire investor Philip Anschutz.[96]
2000–2005[edit]




Shoppers Drug Mart, the Canadian pharmacy was one of several successful buyouts in the early 2000s[97]


At the start of the 21st century, the landscape of large leveraged buyout firms was changing. Several large and storied firms, including Hicks Muse Tate & Furst and Forstmann Little & Company were dragged down by heavy losses in the bursting of the telecom bubble. Although, KKR's track record since RJR Nabisco was mixed, losses on such investments as Regal Entertainment Group, Spalding, Flagstar and Primedia (previously K-III Communications) were offset by successes in Willis Group, Wise Foods, Inc., Wincor Nixdorf and MTU Aero Engines, among others.[4]
Additionally, KKR was one of the few firms that was able to complete large leveraged buyout transactions in the years immediately following the collapse of the Internet bubble, including Shoppers Drug Mart and Bell Canada Yellow Pages.[4][98] KKR was able to realize its investment in Shoppers Drug Mart through a 2002 IPO and subsequent public stock offerings.[97] The directories business would be taken public in 2004 as Yellow Pages Income Fund, a Canadian income trust.[99]




KKR led a consortium in the buyout of Toys "R" Us in 2004


In 2004 a consortium comprising KKR, Bain Capital and real estate development company Vornado Realty Trust announced the $6.6 billion acquisition of Toys "R" Us, the toy retailer. A month earlier, Cerberus Capital Management, made a $5.5 billion offer for both the toy and baby supplies businesses.[100] The Toys 'R' Us buyout was one of the largest in several years.[101] Following this transaction, by the end of 2004 and in 2005, major buyouts were once again becoming common and market observers were stunned by the leverage levels and financing terms obtained by financial sponsors in their buyouts.[102]
In 2005, KKR was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. KKR's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Blackstone Group, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1988. SunGard was the largest buyout of a technology company until the Blackstone-led buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction was notable given the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point. The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[103][104]
Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom[edit]
In 2006, KKR raised a new $17.6 billion fund the KKR 2006 Fund, with which the firm began executing a series of some of the largest buyouts in history. KKR's $44 billion takeover of Texas-based power utility, TXU, in 2007, proved to be the largest leveraged buyout of the mid-2000s buyout boom and the largest buyout completed to date.[105] Among the most notable companies acquired by KKR in 2006 and 2007 were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


HCA
2006
KKR and Bain Capital, together with Merrill Lynch and the Frist family (which had founded the company) completed a $31.6 billion acquisition of the hospital company, 17 years after it was taken private for the first time in a management buyout. At the time of its announcement, the HCA buyout would be the first of several to set new records for the largest buyout, eclipsing the 1989 buyout of RJR Nabisco. It would later be surpassed by the buyouts of Equity Office Properties, and TXU.
[106]


NXP Semiconductors
2006
In August 2006, a consortium of KKR, Silver Lake Partners and AlpInvest Partners acquired a controlling 80.1% share of semiconductors unit of Philips for €6.4 billion. The new company, based in the Netherlands, was renamed NXP Semiconductors.
[107]


TDC A/S
2006
The Danish phone company was acquired by KKR, Apax Partners, Providence Equity Partners and Permira for €12.2 billion ($15.3 billion), which at the time made it the second largest European buyout in history.
[108][109]


Dollar General
2007
KKR completed a buyout of the chain of discount stores operating in the U.S.
[110]


Alliance Boots
2007
KKR and Stefano Pessina, the company’s deputy chairman and largest shareholder, acquired the UK drug store retailer for £12.4 billion ($24.8 billion) including assumed debt, after increasing their bid more than 40% amidst intense competition from Terra Firma Capital Partners and Wellcome Trust. The buyout came only a year after the merger of Boots Group plc (Boots the Chemist), and Alliance UniChem plc.
[111][112]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone Group, KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[113]


First Data
2007
KKR and TPG Capital completed the $29 billion buyout of the credit and debit card payment processor and former parent of Western Union. Michael Capellas, previously the CEO of MCI Communications and Compaq was named CEO of the privately held company.
[114][115]


TXU (Energy Future Holdings)
2007
An investor group led by KKR and TPG Capital and together with Goldman Sachs completed the $44.37 billion[116] buyout of the regulated utility and power producer. The investor group had to work closely with ERCOT regulators to gain approval of the transaction but had significant experience with the regulators from their earlier buyout of Texas Genco. TXU is the largest buyout in history, and retained this distinction when the announced buyout of BCE failed to close in December 2008. The deal was notable for a drastic change in environmental policy for the energy giant, in terms of its carbon emissions from coal power plants and funding alternative energy.
[117][118]


Other non-buyout investments completed by KKR during this period included Legg Mason, Sun Microsystems, Tarkett, Longview Power Plant and Seven Network. In October 2006, KKR acquired a 50% stake in Tarkett, a France-based distributor of flooring products, in a deal valued at about €1.4 billion ($1.8 billion). On November 20, 2006, KKR announced it would form a A$4 billion partnership with the Seven Network of Australia.[119] On January 23, 2007, KKR announced it would invest $700 million through a PIPE investment in Sun Microsystems.[120] In January 2008, KKR announced it had made a $1.25 billion PIPE investment in Legg Mason through a convertible preferred stock offering.[121]
In addition to its successful buyout transactions, KKR was involved in the failed buyout of Harman International Industries (NYSE: HAR), an upscale audio equipment maker. On April 26, 2007, Harman announced it had entered an agreement to be acquired by KKR and Goldman Sachs.[122] As the financing markets became more adverse [clarification needed] in the summer of 2007, the buyout was on tenuous ground. In September 2007, KKR and Goldman backed out of the $8 billion buyout of Harman. By the end of the day, Harman's shares had plummeted by more than 24% upon the news.[123]


Selected Kohlberg Kravis Roberts 2006–2008 Investments













Hospital Corporation of America 













NXP Semiconductors 













Dollar General 













Alliance Boots 













TXU 













Sun Microsystems 













Legg Mason 






Initial public offering[edit]
In 2007, KKR filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission[3] to raise $1.25 billion by selling an ownership interest in its management company.[124] The filing came less than two weeks after the initial public offering of rival private equity firm Blackstone Group. KKR had previously listed its KPE vehicle in 2006, but for the first time, KKR would offer investors an ownership interest in the management company itself. The onset of the credit crunch and the shutdown of the IPO market dampened the prospects of obtaining a valuation attractive to KKR. The flotation was repeatedly postponed, and called off by the end of August.[125]
The following year, in July 2008, KKR announced a new plan to list its shares. The plan called for KKR to complete a reverse takeover of its listed affiliate KKR Private Equity Investors in exchange for a 21% interest in the firm.[126] In November 2008, KKR announced a delay of this transaction until 2009. Shares of KPE had declined significantly in the second half of 2008 with the onset of the credit crunch. KKR has announced that it expects to close the transaction in 2009.[127] In October 2009, KKR listed shares in KKR & Co. on the Euronext exchange, replacing KPE and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange in 2010. The public entity represents a 30% interest in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts. In October 2010, KKR acquired about nine members of Goldman Sachs Group proprietary trading team after entertaining offers from investment firms such as Perella Weinberg and Blackrock. With Goldman shutting down its proprietary trading operations, its executives, led by Bob Howard, will help KKR expand beyond leveraged buyouts into areas such as hedge funds.
2010 to present day[edit]
In January 2014, KKR acquired Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc for $2.4 billion from two private equity companies - Stone Point, and Hellman & Friedman.[128]
In June 2014, KKR announced it was taking a one-third stake in a Spanish energy business of Acciona Energy, at a cost of €417 million ($567 million). The international renewable energy generation business operates renewable assets, largely wind farms, across 14 countries including the United States, Italy and South Africa.[129]
In August 2014, KKR announced it was investing $400 million to acquire Fujian Sunner Development, China's largest chicken farmer, which breeds, processes and supplies frozen and fresh chickens to consumers and corporate clients, such as KFC and McDonald's, across China.[130]
In September 2014, the firm invested $90 million in a lighting and electrics firm Savant Systems.[131]
In January 2015, KKR confirmed its purchase of British rail ticket website thetrainline.com, previously owned by Exponent. The purchase sum is unknown.[132]
On October 12, 2015, KKR announced that it has entered into definitive agreement with Allianz Capital Partners to acquire their majority stake in Selecta Group, a European vending services operator.[133]
On September 1, 2016, KKR announced that it had acquired Epicor Software Corporation, an American software company.[134]
In October 2016, it was reported that KKR invested $250 million in OVH to be used for further international expansion.[135] This funding round valued OVH at over $1 billion, making it a unicorn.
In December 2016, the Lonza Group announced it would acquire Capsugel for $5.5 billion from Kohlberg Kravis Roberts.[136]
In February 2017 KKR were reported to be trying to take over the international market research company ARI GfK SE.[137] In July of the same year KKR acquired WebMD Health Corp for $2.8 billion.[138]
Notable current and former employees[edit]
Over the years, KKR has seen the departure of many of its original partners, the most notable being original co-founder Jerome Kohlberg. After a leave of absence due to an illness in 1985, Kohlberg returned to find increasing differences in strategy with his partners Kravis and Roberts.[139] In 1987, Kohlberg left KKR to found a new private equity firm Kohlberg & Company. Kohlberg & Company returned to the investment style that Kohlberg had originally practiced at Bear Stearns and in KKR's earlier years, acquiring smaller, middle-market companies.[4][140][141]
Since 1996, general partners of KKR have included Henry Kravis, George R. Roberts, Paul Raether, Robert MacDonnell, Jose Gandarillas, Michael Michelson, Saul Fox, James Greene, Michael Tokarz, Clifton Robbins, Scott Stuart, Perry Golkin and Edward Gilhuly.[142] Among those who left were Saul Fox, Ted Ammon, Ned Gilhuly, Mike Tokarz and Scott Stuart who had been instrumental in establishing KKR's reputation and track record in the 1980s.[143] KKR remains tightly controlled by Kravis and Roberts. The issue of succession has remained an important consideration for KKR's future as an ongoing institutionalized firm.

Scott C. Nuttall (born 1972), heads KKR's fastest-growing department, the Global Capital and Asset Management Group, which includes Asset Management, Capital Markets and Client and Partner Group. He joined KKR in November 1996 after leaving the Blackstone Group. His group, the firm's fastest-growing division, has $25 billion under management. With the support of co-founder George Roberts, Nuttall has largely spearheaded the campaign to expand KKR beyond its institutional investors (legacy and otherwise) into credit investment, and alternative investments, pointing out that there are billions "in revenues up for grabs".[144][145][146] He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Joseph Bae on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. He will concentrate on KKR's corporate and real estate credit, capital markets, hedge fund and capital raising businesses together with the firm's corporate development, balance sheet and strategic growth initiatives.[147] New York Times called him and Joseph Bae as potential successors.[148] He graduated from University of Pennsylvania with a Bachelor of Science degree.
Joseph Bae (born circa 1972) joined KKR from Goldman Sachs in 1996. Most recently, he was the Managing Partner of KKR Asia and the Global Head of KKR's Infrastructure and Energy Real Asset businesses. Mr. Bae has been the architect of KKR's Asian expansion since 2005. He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Scott Nuttall on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. Mr. Bae will focus on KKR's global private equity businesses as well as the Firm's real asset platforms across energy, infrastructure and real estate private equity.[147] He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree from Harvard College.
Saul A. Fox left KKR in 1997 to found Fox Paine & Company, a middle market private equity firm with over $1.5 billion of capital under management[149][150]
Clifton S. Robbins left KKR to join competitor General Atlantic Partners in 2000 and later founded Blue Harbour Group,[151] a private investment firm based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[152]
Edward A. Gilhuly and Scott Stuart left KKR in 2004 to launch Sageview Capital. Prior to this, Gilhuly was the managing partner of KKR's European operations, based in London; Stuart managed KKR's energy and consumer products industry groups.[152]
Ted Ammon, started several new ventures including Big Flower Press, which printed newspaper circulars, and Chancery Lane Capital, a boutique private equity firm, before being murdered in his Long Island home October 2001. The lover of his estranged, now deceased wife, Generosa, was later convicted.[152][153][154][155]
Paul Hazen, served as chairman and CEO of Wells Fargo (1995–2001).[156] Hazen later returned to KKR to serve as chairman of Accel-KKR, a joint venture with Accel Partners and later as chairman of KKR's publicly listed affiliate, KFN.
Clive Hollick, Baron Hollick, CEO of United News and Media (1996–2005)
Ken Mehlman joined KKR in 2008 as Global Head of Public Affairs.[157]
David Petraeus, selected to serve as chairman of the newly formed KKR Global Institute (2013—present)[158]
Joseph Grundfest, Professor at Stanford Law School and youngest SEC Commissioner

Works about KKR[edit]


Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
Anders, George (1992). Merchants of Debt: KKR and the Mortgaging of American Business. New York: BasicBooks. ISBN 978-0-465-04522-8. 
Bartlett, Sarah (1991). The Money Machine: How KKR Manufactured Power & Profits. New York: Warner Books. ISBN 978-0-446-51608-2. 
Burrough, Bryan (1990). Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-016172-8. 


See also[edit]

Jerome Kohlberg
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts

Notes[edit]


^ a b c KKR locations (company Web site); retrieved March 8, 2010. Archived January 18, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ http://ir.kkr.com/common/download/download.cfm?companyid=KKR&fileid=930140&filekey=C070EEBD-B0D9-49A9-8346-B3E15E803AA6&filename=SEC-KKR-1404912-17-5.pdf
^ a b c d KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ a b c d e f g h i Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Company History. Funding Universe; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "What's An Aging 'Barbarian' To Do?" The New York Times, August 26, 2001.
^ What Does Henry Kravis Want?. The New York Times, September 6, 2008
^ KKR Investment History (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR to Relocate Corporate Headquarters to Manhattan’s Transformative New Neighborhood on the West Side | Business Wire". www.businesswire.com. Retrieved 2015-12-31. 
^ "KKR Files for NYSE Listing", March 17, 2010.
^ a b 2007 KKR Annual Review[dead link]; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Canada Pension Plan Unit to Join K.K.R. Merchant Banking Venture", New York Times (Dealbook Section), January 17, 2013.
^ a b "Several Giant Pension Funds Investing in Offer for Nabisco". The New York Times, October 31, 1988.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form 10-Q, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 31, 2014
^ a b "KKR Financial REIT IPO debuts: Kohlberg Kravis Roberts manages trust", Marketwatch.com, June 24, 2005.
^ KKR arm in talks after fresh repayment delays. Reuters, February 20, 2008.
^ "Kohlberg Affiliate Sells Stake in Unit", Reuters, April 1, 2008.
^ "Opening Private Equity's Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors". The New York Times, May 4, 2006.
^ Timmons, Heather. "Private Equity Goes Public for $5 Billion. Its Investors Ask, ‘What's Next?’". The New York Times, November 10, 2006
^ Anderson, Jenny. "Where Private Equity Goes, Hedge Funds May Follow", New York Times, June 23, 2006.
^ KKR Private Equity Investors Reports Results for Quarter Ended March 31, 2008 Archived March 20, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.. KKR Private Equity Investors Press Release, May 7, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ see pdf-document, retrieved in January 2015
^ statement on KKR-leaflet, retrieved in January 2015
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row, 1990; pp. 133-136.
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate (New York: Harper & Row, 1990), pp. 136-140.
^ Holland, Max (1989), When the Machine Stopped: A Cautionary Tale from Industrial America, Boston: Harvard Business School Press, ISBN 978-0-87584-208-0, OCLC 246343673. , pp. 149–169.
^ Malone & Hyde Accepts Bid The New York Times, June 12, 1984.
^ Wayne, Leslie. "Wometco Agrees To Buyout", The New York Times. September 22, 1983.
^ Dodson, Steve. "Beatrice Deal Is Biggest Buyout Yet". The New York Times, November 17, 1985.
^ Sterngold, James. "Drexel's Role in Beatrice Deal Examined". The New York Times, April 28, 1988.
^ Fisher, Lawrence M. Safeway Buyout: A Success Story. The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ Feder, Barnaby. "Asbestos: The Saga Drags On". The New York Times, April 2, 1989.
^ "Chapter 11 For Kohlberg, Kravis Unit". The New York Times, December 28, 1989.
^ "The Granddaddy Of All Takeovers", The New York Times Book Review, January 21, 1990.
^ "Nabisco Executives Offer $17 Billion for Company". The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ "Shearson Risks, Rewards on RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 22, 1988.
^ "Nabisco Bid Seen by Kohlberg". The New York Times, October 24, 1988.
^ "Buyout Specialist Bids $20.3 Billion For RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 25, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bid Gives New Respectability To Giant Deals Financed With Huge Debt". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "Concern Over Kohlberg, Kravis Strategy". The New York Times, November 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bidders Said to Talk". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "The Nabisco Battle's Key Moment". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ Joint Deal For Nabisco Is Rejected. The New York Times, October 27, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Will Give Kohlberg, Kravis Data. The New York Times, October 27, 1988
^ Forstmann Declines to Bid on RJR Nabisco. The New York Times, November 17, 1988.
^ "Suitors Quarrel Over RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, November 8, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Discloses Guidelines for Its Buyout. The New York Times, November 9, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Suitor Claims $24.88 Billion Victory". The New York Times, December 1, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Explains Its Choice". The New York Times, December 8, 1988
^ "Nabisco Executives to Take Huge Gains in Their Buyout". The New York Times, November 5, 1988.
^ "A Growing Backlash Against Greed". The New York Times, November 13, 1988
^ "Game of Greed", Time Magazine (1988)
^ "Losers Get Some Spoils In Fight for RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, December 2, 1988
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Collect $75 Million RJR Nabisco Fee". The New York Times, February 1, 1989.
^ "RJR Nabisco, An Epilogue". The New York Times, March 12, 1999.
^ "2 Buyout Firms Build New Funds". The New York Times, November 23, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Now RJR's Owner". Associated Press, April 29, 1989.
^ "History Of The RJR Nabisco Takeover". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "Is RJR Worth $25 Billion?" The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Completes Sale of Del Monte". The New York Times, January 11, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts Loan to RJR Renegotiated". The New York Times, June 27, 1990.
^ "RJR Move Helps Lift 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, July 17, 1990.
^ "RJR Offers Cash and Stock for 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, December 18, 1990.
^ Agrees to a Takeover. The New York Times, September 13, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg's Impetus in Borden Deal". The New York Times, September 14, 1994.
^ "Borden Signs Agreement for Sale to Kohlberg". The New York Times, September 24, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Says It Has Control of Borden". The New York Times, December 22, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans to Divest Remaining Stake in RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, March 16, 1995.
^ "Apollo Buys Borden Chemical for $649 million". The New York Times, July 7, 2004.
^ "Kohlberg Ends Bid for Macmillan". The New York Times, November 4, 1988.
^ K-III's New Name To Be 'Primedia'. The New York Times, November 1, 1997.
^ "Macmillan Book Club Unit And a Publisher Being Sold". The New York Times, May 23, 1989.
^ a b "As Primedia Falls, Preferred Stock Lives Up to Its Name". The New York Times, October 26, 2005.
^ Kravis Rouses Itself, The New York Times, April 29, 1991
^ "K-III Communications Files Plan For an Initial Offering of Stock". The New York Times, September 6, 1995.
^ Regulators Pick Buyer To Operate New England Bank. The New York Times, April 23, 1991.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis in Swap for 7.5% of Fleet". The New York Times, January 3, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis in Aetna Reinsurance Deal". The New York Times, June 9, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans Stake in TW". The New York Times, June 26, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg Unit to Buy Alden Press". The New York Times, January 19, 1993.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Acquire Bruno's Supermarket Chain". The New York Times, April 21, 1995.
^ "$5 Billion Fund By Kohlberg Seen". The New York Times, September 13, 1996.
^ "At K.K.R., the Glory Days Are Past". The New York Times, August 10, 1995.
^ "Kohlberg Plans Stake In Spalding And Evenflo". The New York Times, August 16, 1996.
^ "Newsquest Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Will Buy Kindercare for $467 Million". The New York Times, October 4, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Set to Offer $1.2 Billion for Cable Maker". The New York Times, January 24, 1997.
^ Roundup, An Interactive Edition News (1997-06-28). "KKR Completes Purchase Of Randalls for $225 Million". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2016-12-19. 
^ "Supermarkets Get a Brand New Bag". The New York Times, August 31, 1997.
^ "The Boyds Collection, Ltd. Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis And Welsh Carson Acquiring Medcath". The New York Times, March 14, 1998.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis-Led Group To Buy Big Insurance Broker". The New York Times, July 23, 1998.
^ "Wincor Nixdorf Holding Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ 2 Buyout Firms Make Deal To Acquire Regal Cinemas. The New York Times, January 21, 1998
^ Kohlberg Kravis In $660 Million Deal For Act III Cinemas. The New York Times, October 21, 1997.
^ "Amid Blame, United Artists Sale Collapses". The New York Times, February 23, 1998.
^ "Regal Cinemas Considers Filing For Bankruptcy". The New York Times, November 16, 2000.
^ a b Shoppers Drug Mart Sells Shares. Retail Merchandiser, March 17, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "BCE Sells Directory Unit". The New York Times, November 30, 2002.
^ "Yellow Pages Income Fund Announces, 43 Million Offering"[permanent dead link]. Yellow Pages Group press release, May 26, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Rozhon, Tracie. "Three Firms Are Said to Buy Toys 'R' Us for $6 Billion". New York Times, March 17, 2005.
^ What's Next for Toys 'R' Us?. The Wall Street Journal, March 18, 2005.
^ "Deal Mania: Shades of the '80s: The leveraged buyout is back in vogue" Archived 2008-11-01 at the Wayback Machine.. US News & World Report, April 10, 2005.
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal". The New York Times, March 29, 2005.
^ "Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?" The New York Times, April 3, 2005.
^ K.K.R., Texas Pacific Plan Record Buyout of TXU. The New York Times, February 23, 2007.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross. "HCA Buyout Highlights Era of Going Private". The New York Times, July 25, 2006.
^ Bloomberg News (August 4, 2006). "Technology; Royal Philips Sells Unit for $4.4 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ "Takeover firms will pay $15.3b to buy Danish phone giant TDC." Bloomberg, December 1, 2005
^ "TDC-One year on." Dow Jones Private Equity News, January 22, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Peters, Jeremy W. (March 13, 2007). "Buyout Firm Is Acquiring Dollar General Retail Chain". The New York Times. Retrieved January 4, 2009. 
^ Werdigier, Julia. "Equity Firm Wins Bidding for a Retailer, Alliance Boots". The New York Times, April 25, 2007.
^ "Terra Firma drops Boots bid plan". BBC. April 24, 2007. 
^ De la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer". New York Times, June 8, 2007
^ "KKR Offer of $26 Billion Is Accepted by First Data". Reuters, April 3, 2007
^ "Kohlberg Kravis to Buy First Data for $29 Billion". The New York Times, April 3, 2007.
^ Source: Thomson Financial
^ Lonkevich, Dan and Klump, Edward. KKR, Texas Pacific Will Acquire TXU for $45 Billion Bloomberg.com, February 26, 2007.
^ Skariachan, Dhanya (February 26, 2007). "KKR, Texas Pacific-led group to buy TXU Corp". Reuters. 
^ "Seven in $4bn asset sell-off" Archived 2007-11-14 at the Wayback Machine.. News.com.au, November 20, 2006
^ "Sun Microsystems Welcomes Endorsement and Investment From KKR". Sun Microsystems Press Release, January 23, 2007 Archived September 29, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Legg Mason Makes Deal With Equity Firm". Reuters, January 15, 2008
^ Harman International Industries to be Acquired by KKR and GS Capital Partners. Harman International press release, April 26, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived July 4, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Wary Buyers May Scuttle Two Deals". The New York Times, September 22, 2007.
^ Jenny Anderson and Michael J. de la Merced. "Kohlberg Kravis Plans to Go Public", The New York Times, July 4, 2007.
^ "KKR postpones $1.25 bn float as credit chaos deters buyers". The Times (UK), August 23, 2007.
^ After Delay, KKR Finds a Way to Go Public. The New York Times, July 28, 2008.
^ K.K.R. Calls Listing Delay ‘Process Related’. The New York Times, November 3, 2008.
^ Neha Dimri; Aman Shah (28 January 2014). "KKR to take control of Sedgwick Claims Management in $2.4 billion deal". Reuters. 
^ "Equity investor KKR picks stakes in Acciona Energia unit for 417mn euros". Spain News.Net. Retrieved 24 June 2014. 
^ "KKR to acquire China chicken developer for $400 mn". Business Sun. 26 August 2014. Retrieved 27 August 2014. 
^ KKR invests in smart home tech company Savant Systems. Reuters, 4 September 2014
^ "Deals of the day - Mergers and acquisitions". Reuters. Retrieved 2015-01-22. 
^ "KKR | KKR agrees to acquire majority stake in Selecta from ACP". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2015-10-12. 
^ "Epicor Announces Close of KKR Acquisition and Executive Leadership Appointments to Accelerate Growth Strategy". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2016-09-01. 
^ "Klaba Family OVH, Europe No. 1 Web Host, Raises €250M from $KKR, TowerBrook". exithub. Retrieved 14 January 2017. 
^ "Lonza Buys Capsugel for $5.5B Cash - GEN Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News - Biotech from Bench to Business - GEN". GEN. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ Germany, wysiwyg* Software Design GmbH, Düsseldorf,. "Acceleratio Capital N.V.". www.acceleratio-angebot.de. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/us-webmd-m-a-kkr-idUKKBN1A915Y
^ "Buyout Pioneer Quitting Fray". The New York Times, June 19, 1987.
^ Kohlberg In Dispute Over Firm. The New York Times, August 30, 1989.
^ "Kohlberg Suit Settlement". The New York Times, February 23, 1990.
^ Duracell International Inc. SEC Form SC 13G/A ("Statement of acquisition of beneficial ownership"); filed February 6, 1996.
^ Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
^ Scott Nuttall profile at Forbes
^ "A kinder, gentler KKR wants a piece of your 401K", Forbes, January 23, 2013.
^ Profile of Scott Nuttall at investing.businessweek.com, Businessweek.com, January 23, 2013.
^ a b "KKR Appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers". KKR Press Release. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Next Generation at K.K.R. Set as It Names Two Co-Presidents". New York Times. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ ""For Saul Fox, Bigger Isn’t Always Better in the World of Buyouts". foxpaine.com, May 15, 2000. Retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Anders, George. "Bitter End of a Partnership", Wall Street Journal, September 15, 2007.
^ Blue Harbour Group> About Blue Harbour Archived 2008-03-13 at the Wayback Machine. (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ a b c Barbarians at the Gate: Contrasting fortunes for those closest to the deal. eFinancial News, November 3, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Pelosi Found Guilty of Murder". CBS News. December 13, 2004. Retrieved May 17, 2007. 
^ "Murder in East Hampton", Vanity Fair, January 2002.
^ "Mystery of the Murdered Millionaire". Dateline NBC; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Paul M. Hazen profile as Wells Fargo & Co. Chairman and CEO Archived 2005-09-14 at the Wayback Machine.; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Mehlman profile at KKR website Archived 2013-07-30 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR names former CIA head Petraeus as chairman of new institute". 30 May 2013. Retrieved 5 June 2017 – via Reuters. 


References[edit]


FT.com / Industries / Basic industries – "KKR set to buy Masonite for C$3.1bn"
Gross, Daniel & David Sterling. "Has Henry Kravis gone soft?". Slate, August 5, 2007; retrieved August 7, 2007.
The KKR Way. Bloomberg Markets, August 2007
"The barbarians at the gate have been losing their Midas touch". timesonline.co.uk, August 6, 2005; retrieved February 16, 2009.


External links[edit]

Yahoo! – Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. company profile







v
t
e


Kohlberg Kravis Roberts



Founders



Jerome Kohlberg Jr.
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts





Selected current investments



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Aricent Group
Bharti Enterprises
Capsugel
CICC
Café Coffee Day
Colonial Pipeline
Del Monte Foods
Dollar General
Eastman Kodak
El Paso Corp.
Energy Future Holdings
First Data
Hospital Corporation of America
KION Group
Laureate Education
Legg Mason
Legrand
Magma Fincorp
Maxeda
Nielsen Holdings
Northgate Information Solutions
NXP Semiconductors
Oriental Brewery
Pets at Home
ProSiebenSat.1 Media
Sealy Corporation
Seven West Media
TDC A/S
Toys "R" Us
US Foods
Visma
Wild
Yageo
Zhone Technologies








 Category












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kohlberg_Kravis_Roberts&oldid=792147823"					
Categories: Kohlberg Kravis RobertsCompanies based in New York CityCompanies established in 1976Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeKohlberg Kravis Roberts companiesMezzanine capital investment firmsPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from January 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with a promotional tone from June 2017All articles with a promotional toneArticles needing cleanup from June 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from June 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from June 2017Wikipedia articles needing style editing from June 2017All articles needing style editingArticles with peacock terms from June 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles that may be too long from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from September 2013Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


CatalàDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 19:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Kohlberg Kravis Roberts - Wikipedia





















 







Kohlberg Kravis Roberts

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"KKR" redirects here. For other uses, see KKR (disambiguation).






This article has multiple issues. Please help improve it or discuss these issues on the talk page. (Learn how and when to remove these template messages)






This article contains content that is written like an advertisement. Please help improve it by removing promotional content and inappropriate external links, and by adding encyclopedic content written from a neutral point of view. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may require cleanup to meet Wikipedia's quality standards. The specific problem is: Too much unnecessary detail and puffery Please help improve this article if you can. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may have too many section headers dividing up its content. Please help improve the article by merging similar sections and removing unneeded subheaders. (June 2017)







This article may contain an excessive amount of intricate detail that may only interest a specific audience. Please help by spinning off or relocating any relevant information, and removing excessive detail that may be against Wikipedia's inclusion policy. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article contains wording that promotes the subject in a subjective manner without imparting real information. Please remove or replace such wording and instead of making proclamations about a subject's importance, use facts and attribution to demonstrate that importance. (June 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)







This article may be too long to read and navigate comfortably. Please consider splitting content into sub-articles, condensing it, or adding or removing subheadings. (June 2017)




(Learn how and when to remove this template message)



KKR & Co. L.P.





Type

Public


Traded as
NYSE: KKR


Industry
Financial services:
private equity
(1976–present)
investment banking
(2004–present)


Founded
1976; 41 years ago (1976)


Founder
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts
Jerome Kohlberg, Jr.


Headquarters
9 West 57th Street
Suite 4200
New York City, New York 10019
United States



Number of locations

13 offices in 9 countries[1]



Key people

Henry R. Kravis
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)
George R. Roberts
(Co-Chairman/Co-CEO)


Products
Management buyouts
Leveraged finance
Venture capital
Growth capital


Revenue
US$ 8.896 billion (2013)



Net income

US$ 691.2 million (2013)


AUM
US$ 98.0 billion (2012)


Total assets
US$ 39 billion (2016)[2]



Number of employees

1700 (2017)


Website
www.kkr.com


KKR & Co. L.P. (formerly known as Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.) is an American multinational private equity firm, specializing in leveraged buyouts, headquartered in New York City. The firm sponsors and manages private equity investment funds. The firm has completed over $400 billion of private equity transactions since its inception.[3][4]
The firm was founded in 1976 by Jerome Kohlberg, Jr., and cousins Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts, all of whom had previously worked together at Bear Stearns, where they completed some of the earliest leveraged buyout transactions. Since its founding, KKR has completed a number of transactions including the 1989 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco, which was the largest buyout in history to that point, as well as the 2007 buyout of TXU, which is currently the largest buyout completed to date.[5][6] KKR has completed investments in over 160 companies since 1977, completing at least one investment in every year except in 1982 and in 1990.[7]
KKR has 13 additional offices in the United States, Europe and Asia.[1] The firm is currently located in the Solow Building (9 W. 57th Street), but recently announced its intentions to occupy a newly constructed 30 Hudson Yards.[8]
In October 2009, KKR listed shares in the company through KKR & Co., an affiliate that holds 30% of the firm's ownership equity, with the remainder held by the firm's partners. In March 2010, KKR filed to list its shares on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE),[9] with trading commencing four months later, on July 15, 2010.



Contents


1 The Firm KKR
2 Investment funds and other affiliates

2.1 Private equity funds
2.2 KKR Financial
2.3 KKR Private Equity Investors


3 History

3.1 Founding and early history
3.2 Buyout of RJR Nabisco
3.3 Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco
3.4 Early 1990s: Investments
3.5 1996–1999
3.6 2000–2005
3.7 Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom
3.8 Initial public offering
3.9 2010 to present day


4 Notable current and former employees
5 Works about KKR
6 See also
7 Notes
8 References
9 External links



The Firm KKR[edit]
KKR is operated by its managing partners Henry Kravis and George R. Roberts and a team of approximately 140 investment professionals and 400 total employees, organized into industry-focused groups.[3] KKR is headquartered in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street, Manhattan, New York, with U.S. offices in Menlo Park, San Francisco, Houston, and Washington, D.C., and offices in London, Paris, Hong Kong, Tokyo, Beijing, Mumbai, Dubai, Seoul, São Paulo and Sydney.[1]
KKR invests primarily through leveraged buyouts as well as growth capital investments (including "PIPE" investments in public companies). It has traditionally specialized in private equity investments, focusing on specific industry sectors where the firm has created nine dedicated investment groups. The industries in which KKR has developed a specialization include:[10]

Chemicals
Consumer products
Energy & natural resources
Financial services
Health care
Industrial
Media and communications
Retail
Technology

The professionals in each of KKR's industry-focused groups are expected to have developed a proficiency in their respective industries.[10] The firm has traditionally had strong ties with its investors.[11]
Investment funds and other affiliates[edit]
Private equity funds[edit]
KKR has historically relied primarily on private equity funds, pools of committed capital that are raised from a broad array of institutional investors (e.g., pension funds, insurance companies, investment banks, commercial banks, endowments, fund of funds, high-net-worth individuals, sovereign wealth funds).[3][12] As of March 31, 2014, KKR had completed fund-raising for approximately 23 traditional investment funds in the US, Europe and Asia with total committed capital of approximately US$80 billion:


Fund
Vintage
Year
Committed
Capital ($m)


KKR Fund 1976
1977
$31


KKR Fund 1980
1980
$357


KKR Fund 1982
1982
$328


KKR Fund 1984
1984
$1,000


KKR Fund 1986
1986
$672


KKR Fund 1987
1987
$6,130


KKR Fund 1993
1993
$1,946


KKR Fund 1996
1996
$6,012


KKR European Fund
1999
$3,085


KKR Millennium Fund
2002
$6,000


KKR European Fund II
2005
$5,751


KKR Fund 2006
2006
$17,642


KKR Asian Fund
2007
$4,000


KKR European Fund III
2008
$6,238


KKR E2 Investors (Annex Fund)
2009
$209


KKR China Growth Fund
2010
$1,010


KKR Natural Resources Fund
2010
$876


KKR Infrastructure Fund
2011
$1,043


KKR North America Fund XI
2012
$8,718


KKR Asian Fund II
2013
$5,825


KKR Real Estate Partners Americas
2013
$1,226


KKR Energy Income and Growth Fund
2013
$1,974


Source: SEC Filings[13]
KKR Financial[edit]






Type

Public company (NYSE: KFN)


Founded
2004


Website
www.kkrfinancial.com


KKR Financial (NYSE: KFN) is a real estate investment trust (REIT) and specialty finance company that invests in residential and commercial mortgage loans and mortgage-backed securities as well as corporate loans and debt securities, asset-backed securities and equity securities. KFN was founded in 2004 raising $795 million in a private placement and raised $849 million in a June 2005 initial public offering, increasing the size of the offering from an original $600 million target.[14] KKR had initially considered structuring KFN as a business development company like Apollo Management's Apollo Investment Corporation but chose to pursue the REIT structure to capitalize on the strength in REIT valuations at the time.[14]
KFN was an early casualty of the subprime mortgage crisis and in September 2007, Henry Kravis and George Roberts injected $270 million into the company. On February 20, 2008, KFN was once again forced to delay the repayment of billions of dollars of commercial paper, and began a new round of talks with creditors.[15] In April, KFN sold a controlling interest in a real estate subsidiary to an investment firm to raise cash and entered an agreement with the noteholders of certain secured commercial paper issued by two asset-backed entities. Following the transaction, KFN converted from a REIT to a LLC.[16]
KKR Private Equity Investors[edit]






Type

Public company (Euronext: KPE)


Founded
2006


Website
www.kkrpei.com


KKR Private Equity Investors (Euronext: KPE) is a publicly traded private equity fund that invests as a fund of funds in KKR private equity funds. KPE also co-invests in transactions alongside KKR's private equity funds. KPE was founded in 2006. In May 2006, KKR raised $5 billion in an initial public offering for a KPE to serve as a new permanent investment vehicle listing it on the Euronext exchange in Amsterdam. KKR raised three times more than it expected, as many of the investors in KPE were hedge funds seeking exposure to private equity but could not make long term commitments to private equity funds. As private equity had been booming in preceding years, investing in a KKR fund was attractive to investors.[17]
However, KPE's first-day performance was lackluster, trading down 1.7% and trading volume was limited.[18] Initially, a handful of other private equity firms and hedge funds had planned to follow KKR's lead but shelved those plans when KPE's performance continued to falter after its IPO. KPE's stock declined from an IPO price of €25 per share to €18.16 (a 27% decline) at the end of 2007 and a low of €11.45 (a 54.2% decline) per share in Q1 2008.[19]
KPE disclosed in May 2008 that it had completed approximately $300 million of secondary sales of selected limited partnership interests in, and undrawn commitments to, certain KKR-managed funds in order to generate liquidity and repay borrowings.[20]
In October 2009 KPE changed its name to KKR & Co. (Guernsey) L.P.,[21] which was delisted from Euronext Amsterdam in July 2010 while common units of KKR & Co. L.P. began trading on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “KKR”.[22]
History[edit]


History of private equity
and venture capital


Early history


(Origins of modern private equity)


The 1980s


(Leveraged buyout boom)


The 1990s


(Leveraged buyout and the venture capital bubble)


The 2000s


(Dot-com bubble to the credit crunch)





v
t
e





Founding and early history[edit]
Running the corporate finance department for Bear Stearns in the 1960s and 1970s, Jerome Kohlberg and later with protégés Henry Kravis and George Roberts completed a series of what they described as "bootstrap" investments beginning in 1964–65. They targeted family-owned businesses, many of which had been founded in the years following World War II which by the 1960s and 1970s were facing succession issues. Many of these companies lacked a viable or attractive exit for their founders as they were too small to be taken public and the founders were reluctant to sell out to competitors and so a sale to a financial buyer could prove attractive.[4]




Henry Kravis speaking at the World Economic Forum in 2009


Their acquisition of Orkin Exterminating Company in 1964 is among the first significant leveraged buyout transactions. In the following years the three Bear Stearns bankers would complete a series of buyouts including Stern Metals (1965), Incom (a division of Rockwood International, 1971), Cobblers Industries (1971), and Boren Clay (1973), as well as Thompson Wire, Eagle Motors and Barrows through their investment in Stern Metals. Despite a number of highly successful investments, the $27 million investment in Cobblers ended in bankruptcy.[23]
By 1976, tensions [clarification needed] had built up between Bear Stearns and Kohlberg, Kravis and Roberts, which led to the formation of Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in that year. Most notably, Bear Stearns executive Cy Lewis had rejected repeated proposals to form a dedicated investment fund within Bear Stearns and Lewis took exception to the amount of time spent on outside activities. In 1976, Kravis had been required to serve as interim CEO of a failing direct mail company named Advo.[citation needed]
The new KKR completed its first buyout, that of manufacturer A.J. Industries, in 1977. KKR raised capital from a small group of investors including the Hillman Company and First Chicago Bank. By 1978, with the revision of the ERISA regulations, the nascent KKR was successful in raising its first institutional fund with over $30 million of investor commitments.[24] In 1981, KKR expanded its investor base significantly when the Oregon State Treasury's public pension fund invested in KKR's acquisition of retailer Fred Meyer, Inc. Oregon State remains an active investor in KKR funds.[4]
KKR closed out the 1970s completing the public-to-private buyout of Houdaille Industries in 1979,[25] probably the largest take-private of a public company to that point. As the 1980s began, KKR was among the most prominent practitioner of leveraged buyouts and would prove the most prolific of the private equity investors in the 1980s.[4] Among the firm's most notable acquisitions during the 1980s buyout boom were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


Malone & Hyde
1984
KKR completed the first buyout of a public company by tender offer, by acquiring the food distributor and supermarket operator together with the company's chairman Joseph R. Hyde III.
[26]


Wometco Enterprises
1984
KKR completed the first billion-dollar buyout transaction to acquire the leisure-time company with interests in television, movie theaters and tourist attractions. The buyout comprised the acquisition of 100% of the outstanding shares for $842 million and the assumption of $170 million of the company's outstanding debt.
[27]


Beatrice Companies
1985
KKR sponsored the $6.1 billion management buyout of Beatrice, which owned Samsonite and Tropicana among other consumer brands. At the time of its closing in 1985, Beatrice was the largest buyout completed.
[28][29]


Safeway
1986
KKR completed a friendly $5.5 billion buyout of Safeway to help management avoid hostile overtures from Herbert and Robert Haft of Dart Drug. Safeway was taken public again in 1990.
[30]


Jim Walter Corp.
(later Walter Industries)
1987
KKR acquired the company for $3.3 billion in early 1988 but faced issues with the buyout almost immediately. Most notably, a subsidiary of Jim Walter Corp (Celotex) faced a large asbestos lawsuit and incurred liabilities that the courts ruled would need to be satisfied by the parent company. In 1989, the holding company which KKR used for the Jim Walter buyout filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.
[31][32]


Buyout of RJR Nabisco[edit]
Main article: RJR Nabisco
After the 1987 resignation of Jerome Kohlberg at age 61 (he later founded his own private equity firm, Kohlberg & Co.), Henry Kravis succeeded him as senior partner. Under Kravis and Roberts, the firm was responsible for the 1988 leveraged buyout of RJR Nabisco. RJR Nabisco proved to be not only the largest buyout in history to that time, at $25 billion ($31.1 billion, including assumed debt) as well as a high-water mark and sign of the end of the 1980s buyout boom. RJR—Nabisco, which would remain the largest buyout for the next 17 years, was chronicled in Barbarians at the Gate: The Fall of RJR Nabisco, and later made into a television movie starring James Garner.[33]
In 1988, F. Ross Johnson was the President and CEO of RJR Nabisco, formed in 1985 by the merger of Nabisco Brands and R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Company, a leading producer of food products (Shredded Wheat, Oreo cookies, Ritz crackers, Planters peanuts, Life Savers, Del Monte Fruit and Vegetables, and Snickers Chocolate) as well as Winston, Camel and Salem cigarettes. In October 1988, Johnson proposed a $17 billion ($75 per share) management buyout of the company with the financial backing of investment bank Shearson Lehman Hutton and its parent company, American Express.[34][35]
Several days later, Kravis, who had originally suggested the idea of the buyout to Johnson, presented a new bid for $20.3 billion ($90 per share) financed with an aggressive debt package.[36][37][38] KKR had the support of significant equity co-investments from leading pension funds and other institutional investors. Investors included Coca-Cola, Georgia-Pacific and United Technologies corporate pension funds, as well as endowments from MIT, Harvard and the New York State Common Retirement Fund[12] However, KKR faced criticism from existing investors over the firm's use of hostile tactics in the buyout of RJR.[39]
KKR proposed to provide a joint offer with Johnson and Shearson Lehman but was rebuffed and Johnson attempted to stonewall KKR's access to financial information from RJR.[40][41][42][43] Rival private equity firm, Forstmann Little & Co. was invited into the process by Shearson Lehman but attempted to provide a bid for RJR with a consortium of Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Procter & Gamble, Ralston Purina and Castle & Cooke.[44]
Ultimately the Forstmann consortium came apart and did not provide a final bid for RJR.[45] Many of the major banking players of the day, including Shearson Lehman Hutton, Drexel Burnham Lambert, Morgan Stanley, Goldman Sachs, Salomon Brothers and Merrill Lynch were actively involved in advising and financing the parties.




Oreo cookies, one of RJR Nabisco's products


In November 1988, RJR set guidelines for a final bid submission at the end of the month.[46] The management and Shearson group submitted a final bid of $112, a figure they felt certain would enable them to outflank any response by Kravis and KKR. KKR's final bid of $109, while a lower dollar figure, was ultimately accepted by the board of directors of RJR Nabisco.[47] KKR's offer was guaranteed, whereas the management offer lacked a "reset", meaning that the final share price might have been lower than their stated $112 per share.[48]
Additionally, many in RJR's board of directors had grown concerned at recent disclosures of Ross Johnson' unprecedented golden parachute deal.[49][50] Time Magazine featured Ross Johnson on the cover of their December 1988 issue along with the headline, "A Game of Greed: This man could pocket $100 million from the largest corporate takeover in history. Has the buyout craze gone too far?".[51] KKR's offer was welcomed by the board, and, to some observers, it appeared that their elevation of the reset issue as a deal-breaker in KKR's favor was little more than an excuse to reject Ross Johnson's higher payout of $112 per share. Johnson received $53 million from the buyout.[52] KKR collected a $75 million fee in the RJR takeover.[53] At $31.1 billion of transaction value (including assumed debt), RJR Nabisco was by far the largest leveraged buyout in history.[54]
In 2006 and 2007, a number of leveraged buyout transactions were completed which, for the first time, surpassed the RJR Nabisco leveraged buyout in terms of nominal purchase price. The deal was first surpassed in July 2006 by the $33 billion buyout of U.S. hospital operator Hospital Corporation of America, in which KKR participated, though the RJR deal was larger, adjusted for inflation. However, adjusted for inflation, none of the leveraged buyouts of the 2006–07 period would surpass RJR Nabisco. The RJR transaction benefited many of the parties involved. Investment bankers and lawyers who advised KKR walked away with over $1 billion in fees. Kravis and Roberts attracted an unprecedented amount of publicity that turned the cousins into instant celebrities. Size did not, however, guarantee success as the high purchase price and debt load would burden the performance of the investment, which KKR overcame, raising a new investment fund and continuing to invest throughout the 1990s.[55]
Early 1990s: The aftermath of RJR Nabisco[edit]




KKR's headquarters in the Solow Building at 9 West 57th Street in New York City


The buyout of RJR Nabisco was completed in April 1989 and KKR would spend the early 1990s repaying the RJR's enormous debt load through a series of asset sales and restructuring transactions.[56][57][58] After the RJR Nabisco deal, KKR did not complete a single investment in 1990, the first such year since 1982. They would not complete another major leveraged buyout transaction for more than three years, largely because of the shutdown of the high yield bond market and the collapse of Drexel Burnham Lambert which filed for bankruptcy in February 1990. KKR began to focus primarily on its existing portfolio companies acquired during the buyout boom of the late 1980s. Six of KKR's portfolio companies completed IPOs in 1991, including RJR Nabisco and Duracell.[4]
As the new decade began, KKR began restructuring RJR. In January 1990, it completed the sale of RJR's Del Monte Foods to a group led by Merrill Lynch. KKR had originally identified a group of divisions that it could sell to reduce debt.[59] Over the coming years, RJR would pursue a number of additional restructurings, equity injections and public offerings of stock to provide the company with added financial flexibility. KKR contributed $1.7 billion of new equity into RJR in July 1990 to complete a restructuring of the company's balance sheet that appeased unhappy bondholders. KKR's equity contribution as part of the original leveraged buyout of RJR had been only $1.5 billion.[60][61] In mid-December 1990, RJR announced an exchange offer that would swap debt in RJR for a new public stock in the company, effectively an unusual means of taking RJR public again and simultaneously reducing debt on the company.[62]
RJR issued additional stock to the public in March 1991 to further reduce debt, resulting in an upgrade of the credit rating of RJR's debt from junk to investment grade. KKR began to reduce its ownership in RJR in 1994, when its stock in RJR was used as part of the consideration for its leveraged buyout of Borden, Inc., a producer of food and beverage products, consumer products, and industrial products, in an unprecedented and complex transaction.[63][64] [65][66] The following year, in 1995, KKR would divest itself of its final stake in RJR Nabisco when Borden sold a $638 million block of stock.[67]
While KKR no longer had any ownership of RJR Nabisco by 1995, its original investment would not be fully realized until KKR exited its last investment in 2004. After sixteen years of efforts, including contributing new equity, taking RJR public, asset sales and exchanging shares of RJR for the ownership of Borden, Inc., KKR finally sold the last remnants of its 1989 investment. In July 2004, KKR agreed to sell its stock in Borden Chemical to Apollo Management for $1.2 billion.[68]
Early 1990s: Investments[edit]
In the early 1990s, the absence of an active high yield market prompted KKR to change its tactics, avoiding large leveraged buyouts in favor of industry consolidations through what were described as leveraged buildups or rollups. One of KKR's largest investments in the 1990s was the leveraged buildup of Primedia in partnership with former executives of Macmillan Publishing, which KKR had failed to acquire in 1988.[69] KKR created Primedia's predecessor, K-III Communications,[70] a platform to buy media properties, initially completing the $310 million divisional buyout of the book club division of Macmillan along with the assets of Intertec Publishing Corporation in May 1989.[71][72]
During the early 1990s, K-III continued acquiring publishing assets, including a $650 million acquisition from News Corporation in 1991.[73] K-III went public, however instead of cashing out, KKR continued to make new investments in the company in 1998, 2000 and 2001 to support acquisition activity.[74] In 2005, Primedia redeemed KKR's preferred stock in the company but KKR was estimated to have lost hundreds of millions of dollars on its common stock holdings as the price of the company's stock collapsed.[72]
In 1991, KKR partnered with Fleet/Norstar Financial Group in the 1991 acquisition of the Bank of New England, from the US Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.[75] In January 1996, KKR would exchange its investment for a 7.5% interest in Fleet Bank.[76] KKR completed the 1992 buyout of American Re Corporation from Aetna[77] as well as a 47% interest in TW Corporation, later known as The Flagstar Companies and owner of Denny's in 1992.[78] Among the other notable investments KKR completed in the early 1990s included World Color Press (1993–95),[79] RELTEC Corporation (1995) and Bruno's (1995).[80]
1996–1999[edit]
By the mid-1990s, the debt markets were improving and KKR had moved on from the RJR Nabisco buyout. In 1996, KKR was able to complete the bulk of fundraising for what was then a record $6 billion private equity fund, the KKR 1996 Fund.[81] However, KKR was still burdened by the performance of the RJR investment and repeated obituaries in the media.[82] KKR was required by its investors to reduce the fees it charged and to calculate its carried interest based on the total profit of the fund (i.e., offsetting losses from failed deals against the profits from successful deals).[4]




KKR acquired Regal Cinemas in 1998, only to see the company in bankruptcy by 2000


KKR's activity level would accelerate over the second half of the 1990s making a series of notable investments including Spalding Holdings Corporation and Evenflo (1996),[83] Newsquest (1996),[84] KinderCare Learning Centers (1997),[85] Amphenol Corporation (1997),[86] Randalls Food Markets (1997),[87][88] The Boyds Collection (1998),[89] MedCath Corporation (1998),[90] Willis Group Holdings (1998),[91] Smiths Group (1999), and Wincor Nixdorf (1999).[92]
KKR's largest investment of the 1990s would be one of its least successful. In January 1998, KKR and Hicks, Muse, Tate & Furst agreed to the $1.5 billion buyout of Regal Entertainment Group.[93] KKR and Hicks Muse had initially intended to combine Regal with Act III Cinemas, which KKR had acquired in 1997 for $706 million[94] and United Artists Theaters, which Hicks Muse had agreed to acquire for $840 million in November 1997. Shortly after agreeing to the Regal takeover, the deal with United Artists fell apart, destroying the strategy to eliminate costs by building a larger combined company.[95] Two years later, in 2000, Regal encountered significant financial issues and was forced to file for bankruptcy protection; the company passed to billionaire investor Philip Anschutz.[96]
2000–2005[edit]




Shoppers Drug Mart, the Canadian pharmacy was one of several successful buyouts in the early 2000s[97]


At the start of the 21st century, the landscape of large leveraged buyout firms was changing. Several large and storied firms, including Hicks Muse Tate & Furst and Forstmann Little & Company were dragged down by heavy losses in the bursting of the telecom bubble. Although, KKR's track record since RJR Nabisco was mixed, losses on such investments as Regal Entertainment Group, Spalding, Flagstar and Primedia (previously K-III Communications) were offset by successes in Willis Group, Wise Foods, Inc., Wincor Nixdorf and MTU Aero Engines, among others.[4]
Additionally, KKR was one of the few firms that was able to complete large leveraged buyout transactions in the years immediately following the collapse of the Internet bubble, including Shoppers Drug Mart and Bell Canada Yellow Pages.[4][98] KKR was able to realize its investment in Shoppers Drug Mart through a 2002 IPO and subsequent public stock offerings.[97] The directories business would be taken public in 2004 as Yellow Pages Income Fund, a Canadian income trust.[99]




KKR led a consortium in the buyout of Toys "R" Us in 2004


In 2004 a consortium comprising KKR, Bain Capital and real estate development company Vornado Realty Trust announced the $6.6 billion acquisition of Toys "R" Us, the toy retailer. A month earlier, Cerberus Capital Management, made a $5.5 billion offer for both the toy and baby supplies businesses.[100] The Toys 'R' Us buyout was one of the largest in several years.[101] Following this transaction, by the end of 2004 and in 2005, major buyouts were once again becoming common and market observers were stunned by the leverage levels and financing terms obtained by financial sponsors in their buyouts.[102]
In 2005, KKR was one of seven private equity firms involved in the buyout of SunGard in a transaction valued at $11.3 billion. KKR's partners in the acquisition were Silver Lake Partners, Bain Capital, Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Blackstone Group, Providence Equity Partners, and TPG Capital. This represented the largest leveraged buyout completed since the takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1988. SunGard was the largest buyout of a technology company until the Blackstone-led buyout of Freescale Semiconductor. The SunGard transaction was notable given the number of firms involved in the transaction, the largest club deal completed to that point. The involvement of seven firms in the consortium was criticized by investors in private equity who considered cross-holdings among firms to be generally unattractive.[103][104]
Since 2005 and the Buyout Boom[edit]
In 2006, KKR raised a new $17.6 billion fund the KKR 2006 Fund, with which the firm began executing a series of some of the largest buyouts in history. KKR's $44 billion takeover of Texas-based power utility, TXU, in 2007, proved to be the largest leveraged buyout of the mid-2000s buyout boom and the largest buyout completed to date.[105] Among the most notable companies acquired by KKR in 2006 and 2007 were the following:


Investment
Year
Company Description
Ref.


HCA
2006
KKR and Bain Capital, together with Merrill Lynch and the Frist family (which had founded the company) completed a $31.6 billion acquisition of the hospital company, 17 years after it was taken private for the first time in a management buyout. At the time of its announcement, the HCA buyout would be the first of several to set new records for the largest buyout, eclipsing the 1989 buyout of RJR Nabisco. It would later be surpassed by the buyouts of Equity Office Properties, and TXU.
[106]


NXP Semiconductors
2006
In August 2006, a consortium of KKR, Silver Lake Partners and AlpInvest Partners acquired a controlling 80.1% share of semiconductors unit of Philips for €6.4 billion. The new company, based in the Netherlands, was renamed NXP Semiconductors.
[107]


TDC A/S
2006
The Danish phone company was acquired by KKR, Apax Partners, Providence Equity Partners and Permira for €12.2 billion ($15.3 billion), which at the time made it the second largest European buyout in history.
[108][109]


Dollar General
2007
KKR completed a buyout of the chain of discount stores operating in the U.S.
[110]


Alliance Boots
2007
KKR and Stefano Pessina, the company’s deputy chairman and largest shareholder, acquired the UK drug store retailer for £12.4 billion ($24.8 billion) including assumed debt, after increasing their bid more than 40% amidst intense competition from Terra Firma Capital Partners and Wellcome Trust. The buyout came only a year after the merger of Boots Group plc (Boots the Chemist), and Alliance UniChem plc.
[111][112]


Biomet
2007
Blackstone Group, KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs acquired the medical devices company for $11.6 billion.
[113]


First Data
2007
KKR and TPG Capital completed the $29 billion buyout of the credit and debit card payment processor and former parent of Western Union. Michael Capellas, previously the CEO of MCI Communications and Compaq was named CEO of the privately held company.
[114][115]


TXU (Energy Future Holdings)
2007
An investor group led by KKR and TPG Capital and together with Goldman Sachs completed the $44.37 billion[116] buyout of the regulated utility and power producer. The investor group had to work closely with ERCOT regulators to gain approval of the transaction but had significant experience with the regulators from their earlier buyout of Texas Genco. TXU is the largest buyout in history, and retained this distinction when the announced buyout of BCE failed to close in December 2008. The deal was notable for a drastic change in environmental policy for the energy giant, in terms of its carbon emissions from coal power plants and funding alternative energy.
[117][118]


Other non-buyout investments completed by KKR during this period included Legg Mason, Sun Microsystems, Tarkett, Longview Power Plant and Seven Network. In October 2006, KKR acquired a 50% stake in Tarkett, a France-based distributor of flooring products, in a deal valued at about €1.4 billion ($1.8 billion). On November 20, 2006, KKR announced it would form a A$4 billion partnership with the Seven Network of Australia.[119] On January 23, 2007, KKR announced it would invest $700 million through a PIPE investment in Sun Microsystems.[120] In January 2008, KKR announced it had made a $1.25 billion PIPE investment in Legg Mason through a convertible preferred stock offering.[121]
In addition to its successful buyout transactions, KKR was involved in the failed buyout of Harman International Industries (NYSE: HAR), an upscale audio equipment maker. On April 26, 2007, Harman announced it had entered an agreement to be acquired by KKR and Goldman Sachs.[122] As the financing markets became more adverse [clarification needed] in the summer of 2007, the buyout was on tenuous ground. In September 2007, KKR and Goldman backed out of the $8 billion buyout of Harman. By the end of the day, Harman's shares had plummeted by more than 24% upon the news.[123]


Selected Kohlberg Kravis Roberts 2006–2008 Investments













Hospital Corporation of America 













NXP Semiconductors 













Dollar General 













Alliance Boots 













TXU 













Sun Microsystems 













Legg Mason 






Initial public offering[edit]
In 2007, KKR filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission[3] to raise $1.25 billion by selling an ownership interest in its management company.[124] The filing came less than two weeks after the initial public offering of rival private equity firm Blackstone Group. KKR had previously listed its KPE vehicle in 2006, but for the first time, KKR would offer investors an ownership interest in the management company itself. The onset of the credit crunch and the shutdown of the IPO market dampened the prospects of obtaining a valuation attractive to KKR. The flotation was repeatedly postponed, and called off by the end of August.[125]
The following year, in July 2008, KKR announced a new plan to list its shares. The plan called for KKR to complete a reverse takeover of its listed affiliate KKR Private Equity Investors in exchange for a 21% interest in the firm.[126] In November 2008, KKR announced a delay of this transaction until 2009. Shares of KPE had declined significantly in the second half of 2008 with the onset of the credit crunch. KKR has announced that it expects to close the transaction in 2009.[127] In October 2009, KKR listed shares in KKR & Co. on the Euronext exchange, replacing KPE and anticipates a listing on the New York Stock Exchange in 2010. The public entity represents a 30% interest in Kohlberg Kravis Roberts. In October 2010, KKR acquired about nine members of Goldman Sachs Group proprietary trading team after entertaining offers from investment firms such as Perella Weinberg and Blackrock. With Goldman shutting down its proprietary trading operations, its executives, led by Bob Howard, will help KKR expand beyond leveraged buyouts into areas such as hedge funds.
2010 to present day[edit]
In January 2014, KKR acquired Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc for $2.4 billion from two private equity companies - Stone Point, and Hellman & Friedman.[128]
In June 2014, KKR announced it was taking a one-third stake in a Spanish energy business of Acciona Energy, at a cost of €417 million ($567 million). The international renewable energy generation business operates renewable assets, largely wind farms, across 14 countries including the United States, Italy and South Africa.[129]
In August 2014, KKR announced it was investing $400 million to acquire Fujian Sunner Development, China's largest chicken farmer, which breeds, processes and supplies frozen and fresh chickens to consumers and corporate clients, such as KFC and McDonald's, across China.[130]
In September 2014, the firm invested $90 million in a lighting and electrics firm Savant Systems.[131]
In January 2015, KKR confirmed its purchase of British rail ticket website thetrainline.com, previously owned by Exponent. The purchase sum is unknown.[132]
On October 12, 2015, KKR announced that it has entered into definitive agreement with Allianz Capital Partners to acquire their majority stake in Selecta Group, a European vending services operator.[133]
On September 1, 2016, KKR announced that it had acquired Epicor Software Corporation, an American software company.[134]
In October 2016, it was reported that KKR invested $250 million in OVH to be used for further international expansion.[135] This funding round valued OVH at over $1 billion, making it a unicorn.
In December 2016, the Lonza Group announced it would acquire Capsugel for $5.5 billion from Kohlberg Kravis Roberts.[136]
In February 2017 KKR were reported to be trying to take over the international market research company ARI GfK SE.[137] In July of the same year KKR acquired WebMD Health Corp for $2.8 billion.[138]
Notable current and former employees[edit]
Over the years, KKR has seen the departure of many of its original partners, the most notable being original co-founder Jerome Kohlberg. After a leave of absence due to an illness in 1985, Kohlberg returned to find increasing differences in strategy with his partners Kravis and Roberts.[139] In 1987, Kohlberg left KKR to found a new private equity firm Kohlberg & Company. Kohlberg & Company returned to the investment style that Kohlberg had originally practiced at Bear Stearns and in KKR's earlier years, acquiring smaller, middle-market companies.[4][140][141]
Since 1996, general partners of KKR have included Henry Kravis, George R. Roberts, Paul Raether, Robert MacDonnell, Jose Gandarillas, Michael Michelson, Saul Fox, James Greene, Michael Tokarz, Clifton Robbins, Scott Stuart, Perry Golkin and Edward Gilhuly.[142] Among those who left were Saul Fox, Ted Ammon, Ned Gilhuly, Mike Tokarz and Scott Stuart who had been instrumental in establishing KKR's reputation and track record in the 1980s.[143] KKR remains tightly controlled by Kravis and Roberts. The issue of succession has remained an important consideration for KKR's future as an ongoing institutionalized firm.

Scott C. Nuttall (born 1972), heads KKR's fastest-growing department, the Global Capital and Asset Management Group, which includes Asset Management, Capital Markets and Client and Partner Group. He joined KKR in November 1996 after leaving the Blackstone Group. His group, the firm's fastest-growing division, has $25 billion under management. With the support of co-founder George Roberts, Nuttall has largely spearheaded the campaign to expand KKR beyond its institutional investors (legacy and otherwise) into credit investment, and alternative investments, pointing out that there are billions "in revenues up for grabs".[144][145][146] He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Joseph Bae on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. He will concentrate on KKR's corporate and real estate credit, capital markets, hedge fund and capital raising businesses together with the firm's corporate development, balance sheet and strategic growth initiatives.[147] New York Times called him and Joseph Bae as potential successors.[148] He graduated from University of Pennsylvania with a Bachelor of Science degree.
Joseph Bae (born circa 1972) joined KKR from Goldman Sachs in 1996. Most recently, he was the Managing Partner of KKR Asia and the Global Head of KKR's Infrastructure and Energy Real Asset businesses. Mr. Bae has been the architect of KKR's Asian expansion since 2005. He has been named Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers with Scott Nuttall on July 17, 2017 to be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the firm. Mr. Bae will focus on KKR's global private equity businesses as well as the Firm's real asset platforms across energy, infrastructure and real estate private equity.[147] He graduated with a Bachelor of Arts degree from Harvard College.
Saul A. Fox left KKR in 1997 to found Fox Paine & Company, a middle market private equity firm with over $1.5 billion of capital under management[149][150]
Clifton S. Robbins left KKR to join competitor General Atlantic Partners in 2000 and later founded Blue Harbour Group,[151] a private investment firm based in Greenwich, Connecticut.[152]
Edward A. Gilhuly and Scott Stuart left KKR in 2004 to launch Sageview Capital. Prior to this, Gilhuly was the managing partner of KKR's European operations, based in London; Stuart managed KKR's energy and consumer products industry groups.[152]
Ted Ammon, started several new ventures including Big Flower Press, which printed newspaper circulars, and Chancery Lane Capital, a boutique private equity firm, before being murdered in his Long Island home October 2001. The lover of his estranged, now deceased wife, Generosa, was later convicted.[152][153][154][155]
Paul Hazen, served as chairman and CEO of Wells Fargo (1995–2001).[156] Hazen later returned to KKR to serve as chairman of Accel-KKR, a joint venture with Accel Partners and later as chairman of KKR's publicly listed affiliate, KFN.
Clive Hollick, Baron Hollick, CEO of United News and Media (1996–2005)
Ken Mehlman joined KKR in 2008 as Global Head of Public Affairs.[157]
David Petraeus, selected to serve as chairman of the newly formed KKR Global Institute (2013—present)[158]
Joseph Grundfest, Professor at Stanford Law School and youngest SEC Commissioner

Works about KKR[edit]


Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
Anders, George (1992). Merchants of Debt: KKR and the Mortgaging of American Business. New York: BasicBooks. ISBN 978-0-465-04522-8. 
Bartlett, Sarah (1991). The Money Machine: How KKR Manufactured Power & Profits. New York: Warner Books. ISBN 978-0-446-51608-2. 
Burrough, Bryan (1990). Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row. ISBN 0-06-016172-8. 


See also[edit]

Jerome Kohlberg
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts

Notes[edit]


^ a b c KKR locations (company Web site); retrieved March 8, 2010. Archived January 18, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ http://ir.kkr.com/common/download/download.cfm?companyid=KKR&fileid=930140&filekey=C070EEBD-B0D9-49A9-8346-B3E15E803AA6&filename=SEC-KKR-1404912-17-5.pdf
^ a b c d KKR & Co. L.P., Form S-1, Securities And Exchange Commission, July 3, 2007
^ a b c d e f g h i Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. Company History. Funding Universe; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "What's An Aging 'Barbarian' To Do?" The New York Times, August 26, 2001.
^ What Does Henry Kravis Want?. The New York Times, September 6, 2008
^ KKR Investment History (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived December 18, 2008, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR to Relocate Corporate Headquarters to Manhattan’s Transformative New Neighborhood on the West Side | Business Wire". www.businesswire.com. Retrieved 2015-12-31. 
^ "KKR Files for NYSE Listing", March 17, 2010.
^ a b 2007 KKR Annual Review[dead link]; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Canada Pension Plan Unit to Join K.K.R. Merchant Banking Venture", New York Times (Dealbook Section), January 17, 2013.
^ a b "Several Giant Pension Funds Investing in Offer for Nabisco". The New York Times, October 31, 1988.
^ KKR & Co. L.P., Form 10-Q, Securities And Exchange Commission, March 31, 2014
^ a b "KKR Financial REIT IPO debuts: Kohlberg Kravis Roberts manages trust", Marketwatch.com, June 24, 2005.
^ KKR arm in talks after fresh repayment delays. Reuters, February 20, 2008.
^ "Kohlberg Affiliate Sells Stake in Unit", Reuters, April 1, 2008.
^ "Opening Private Equity's Door, at Least a Crack, to Public Investors". The New York Times, May 4, 2006.
^ Timmons, Heather. "Private Equity Goes Public for $5 Billion. Its Investors Ask, ‘What's Next?’". The New York Times, November 10, 2006
^ Anderson, Jenny. "Where Private Equity Goes, Hedge Funds May Follow", New York Times, June 23, 2006.
^ KKR Private Equity Investors Reports Results for Quarter Ended March 31, 2008 Archived March 20, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.. KKR Private Equity Investors Press Release, May 7, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ see pdf-document, retrieved in January 2015
^ statement on KKR-leaflet, retrieved in January 2015
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate. New York: Harper & Row, 1990; pp. 133-136.
^ Burrough, Bryan. Barbarians at the Gate (New York: Harper & Row, 1990), pp. 136-140.
^ Holland, Max (1989), When the Machine Stopped: A Cautionary Tale from Industrial America, Boston: Harvard Business School Press, ISBN 978-0-87584-208-0, OCLC 246343673. , pp. 149–169.
^ Malone & Hyde Accepts Bid The New York Times, June 12, 1984.
^ Wayne, Leslie. "Wometco Agrees To Buyout", The New York Times. September 22, 1983.
^ Dodson, Steve. "Beatrice Deal Is Biggest Buyout Yet". The New York Times, November 17, 1985.
^ Sterngold, James. "Drexel's Role in Beatrice Deal Examined". The New York Times, April 28, 1988.
^ Fisher, Lawrence M. Safeway Buyout: A Success Story. The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ Feder, Barnaby. "Asbestos: The Saga Drags On". The New York Times, April 2, 1989.
^ "Chapter 11 For Kohlberg, Kravis Unit". The New York Times, December 28, 1989.
^ "The Granddaddy Of All Takeovers", The New York Times Book Review, January 21, 1990.
^ "Nabisco Executives Offer $17 Billion for Company". The New York Times, October 21, 1988.
^ "Shearson Risks, Rewards on RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 22, 1988.
^ "Nabisco Bid Seen by Kohlberg". The New York Times, October 24, 1988.
^ "Buyout Specialist Bids $20.3 Billion For RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, October 25, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bid Gives New Respectability To Giant Deals Financed With Huge Debt". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "Concern Over Kohlberg, Kravis Strategy". The New York Times, November 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Bidders Said to Talk". The New York Times, October 26, 1988.
^ "The Nabisco Battle's Key Moment". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ Joint Deal For Nabisco Is Rejected. The New York Times, October 27, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Will Give Kohlberg, Kravis Data. The New York Times, October 27, 1988
^ Forstmann Declines to Bid on RJR Nabisco. The New York Times, November 17, 1988.
^ "Suitors Quarrel Over RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, November 8, 1988.
^ RJR Nabisco Discloses Guidelines for Its Buyout. The New York Times, November 9, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Suitor Claims $24.88 Billion Victory". The New York Times, December 1, 1988.
^ "RJR Nabisco Explains Its Choice". The New York Times, December 8, 1988
^ "Nabisco Executives to Take Huge Gains in Their Buyout". The New York Times, November 5, 1988.
^ "A Growing Backlash Against Greed". The New York Times, November 13, 1988
^ "Game of Greed", Time Magazine (1988)
^ "Losers Get Some Spoils In Fight for RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, December 2, 1988
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Collect $75 Million RJR Nabisco Fee". The New York Times, February 1, 1989.
^ "RJR Nabisco, An Epilogue". The New York Times, March 12, 1999.
^ "2 Buyout Firms Build New Funds". The New York Times, November 23, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Now RJR's Owner". Associated Press, April 29, 1989.
^ "History Of The RJR Nabisco Takeover". The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "Is RJR Worth $25 Billion?" The New York Times, December 2, 1988.
^ "RJR Completes Sale of Del Monte". The New York Times, January 11, 1990.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis, Roberts Loan to RJR Renegotiated". The New York Times, June 27, 1990.
^ "RJR Move Helps Lift 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, July 17, 1990.
^ "RJR Offers Cash and Stock for 'Junk Bonds'". The New York Times, December 18, 1990.
^ Agrees to a Takeover. The New York Times, September 13, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg's Impetus in Borden Deal". The New York Times, September 14, 1994.
^ "Borden Signs Agreement for Sale to Kohlberg". The New York Times, September 24, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Says It Has Control of Borden". The New York Times, December 22, 1994.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans to Divest Remaining Stake in RJR Nabisco". The New York Times, March 16, 1995.
^ "Apollo Buys Borden Chemical for $649 million". The New York Times, July 7, 2004.
^ "Kohlberg Ends Bid for Macmillan". The New York Times, November 4, 1988.
^ K-III's New Name To Be 'Primedia'. The New York Times, November 1, 1997.
^ "Macmillan Book Club Unit And a Publisher Being Sold". The New York Times, May 23, 1989.
^ a b "As Primedia Falls, Preferred Stock Lives Up to Its Name". The New York Times, October 26, 2005.
^ Kravis Rouses Itself, The New York Times, April 29, 1991
^ "K-III Communications Files Plan For an Initial Offering of Stock". The New York Times, September 6, 1995.
^ Regulators Pick Buyer To Operate New England Bank. The New York Times, April 23, 1991.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis in Swap for 7.5% of Fleet". The New York Times, January 3, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis in Aetna Reinsurance Deal". The New York Times, June 9, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis Plans Stake in TW". The New York Times, June 26, 1992.
^ "Kohlberg Unit to Buy Alden Press". The New York Times, January 19, 1993.
^ "Kohlberg, Kravis to Acquire Bruno's Supermarket Chain". The New York Times, April 21, 1995.
^ "$5 Billion Fund By Kohlberg Seen". The New York Times, September 13, 1996.
^ "At K.K.R., the Glory Days Are Past". The New York Times, August 10, 1995.
^ "Kohlberg Plans Stake In Spalding And Evenflo". The New York Times, August 16, 1996.
^ "Newsquest Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Will Buy Kindercare for $467 Million". The New York Times, October 4, 1996.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis Set to Offer $1.2 Billion for Cable Maker". The New York Times, January 24, 1997.
^ Roundup, An Interactive Edition News (1997-06-28). "KKR Completes Purchase Of Randalls for $225 Million". Wall Street Journal. ISSN 0099-9660. Retrieved 2016-12-19. 
^ "Supermarkets Get a Brand New Bag". The New York Times, August 31, 1997.
^ "The Boyds Collection, Ltd. Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis And Welsh Carson Acquiring Medcath". The New York Times, March 14, 1998.
^ "Kohlberg Kravis-Led Group To Buy Big Insurance Broker". The New York Times, July 23, 1998.
^ "Wincor Nixdorf Holding Company History". FundingUniverse.com; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ 2 Buyout Firms Make Deal To Acquire Regal Cinemas. The New York Times, January 21, 1998
^ Kohlberg Kravis In $660 Million Deal For Act III Cinemas. The New York Times, October 21, 1997.
^ "Amid Blame, United Artists Sale Collapses". The New York Times, February 23, 1998.
^ "Regal Cinemas Considers Filing For Bankruptcy". The New York Times, November 16, 2000.
^ a b Shoppers Drug Mart Sells Shares. Retail Merchandiser, March 17, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived January 17, 2009, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "BCE Sells Directory Unit". The New York Times, November 30, 2002.
^ "Yellow Pages Income Fund Announces, 43 Million Offering"[permanent dead link]. Yellow Pages Group press release, May 26, 2004; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross and Rozhon, Tracie. "Three Firms Are Said to Buy Toys 'R' Us for $6 Billion". New York Times, March 17, 2005.
^ What's Next for Toys 'R' Us?. The Wall Street Journal, March 18, 2005.
^ "Deal Mania: Shades of the '80s: The leveraged buyout is back in vogue" Archived 2008-11-01 at the Wayback Machine.. US News & World Report, April 10, 2005.
^ "Capital Firms Agree to Buy SunGard Data in Cash Deal". The New York Times, March 29, 2005.
^ "Do Too Many Cooks Spoil the Takeover Deal?" The New York Times, April 3, 2005.
^ K.K.R., Texas Pacific Plan Record Buyout of TXU. The New York Times, February 23, 2007.
^ Sorkin, Andrew Ross. "HCA Buyout Highlights Era of Going Private". The New York Times, July 25, 2006.
^ Bloomberg News (August 4, 2006). "Technology; Royal Philips Sells Unit for $4.4 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved April 27, 2008. 
^ "Takeover firms will pay $15.3b to buy Danish phone giant TDC." Bloomberg, December 1, 2005
^ "TDC-One year on." Dow Jones Private Equity News, January 22, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Peters, Jeremy W. (March 13, 2007). "Buyout Firm Is Acquiring Dollar General Retail Chain". The New York Times. Retrieved January 4, 2009. 
^ Werdigier, Julia. "Equity Firm Wins Bidding for a Retailer, Alliance Boots". The New York Times, April 25, 2007.
^ "Terra Firma drops Boots bid plan". BBC. April 24, 2007. 
^ De la Merced, Michael J. "Biomet Accepts Sweetened Takeover Offer". New York Times, June 8, 2007
^ "KKR Offer of $26 Billion Is Accepted by First Data". Reuters, April 3, 2007
^ "Kohlberg Kravis to Buy First Data for $29 Billion". The New York Times, April 3, 2007.
^ Source: Thomson Financial
^ Lonkevich, Dan and Klump, Edward. KKR, Texas Pacific Will Acquire TXU for $45 Billion Bloomberg.com, February 26, 2007.
^ Skariachan, Dhanya (February 26, 2007). "KKR, Texas Pacific-led group to buy TXU Corp". Reuters. 
^ "Seven in $4bn asset sell-off" Archived 2007-11-14 at the Wayback Machine.. News.com.au, November 20, 2006
^ "Sun Microsystems Welcomes Endorsement and Investment From KKR". Sun Microsystems Press Release, January 23, 2007 Archived September 29, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Legg Mason Makes Deal With Equity Firm". Reuters, January 15, 2008
^ Harman International Industries to be Acquired by KKR and GS Capital Partners. Harman International press release, April 26, 2007; retrieved February 16, 2009. Archived July 4, 2007, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Wary Buyers May Scuttle Two Deals". The New York Times, September 22, 2007.
^ Jenny Anderson and Michael J. de la Merced. "Kohlberg Kravis Plans to Go Public", The New York Times, July 4, 2007.
^ "KKR postpones $1.25 bn float as credit chaos deters buyers". The Times (UK), August 23, 2007.
^ After Delay, KKR Finds a Way to Go Public. The New York Times, July 28, 2008.
^ K.K.R. Calls Listing Delay ‘Process Related’. The New York Times, November 3, 2008.
^ Neha Dimri; Aman Shah (28 January 2014). "KKR to take control of Sedgwick Claims Management in $2.4 billion deal". Reuters. 
^ "Equity investor KKR picks stakes in Acciona Energia unit for 417mn euros". Spain News.Net. Retrieved 24 June 2014. 
^ "KKR to acquire China chicken developer for $400 mn". Business Sun. 26 August 2014. Retrieved 27 August 2014. 
^ KKR invests in smart home tech company Savant Systems. Reuters, 4 September 2014
^ "Deals of the day - Mergers and acquisitions". Reuters. Retrieved 2015-01-22. 
^ "KKR | KKR agrees to acquire majority stake in Selecta from ACP". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2015-10-12. 
^ "Epicor Announces Close of KKR Acquisition and Executive Leadership Appointments to Accelerate Growth Strategy". media.kkr.com. Retrieved 2016-09-01. 
^ "Klaba Family OVH, Europe No. 1 Web Host, Raises €250M from $KKR, TowerBrook". exithub. Retrieved 14 January 2017. 
^ "Lonza Buys Capsugel for $5.5B Cash - GEN Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News - Biotech from Bench to Business - GEN". GEN. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ Germany, wysiwyg* Software Design GmbH, Düsseldorf,. "Acceleratio Capital N.V.". www.acceleratio-angebot.de. Retrieved 5 June 2017. 
^ http://uk.reuters.com/article/us-webmd-m-a-kkr-idUKKBN1A915Y
^ "Buyout Pioneer Quitting Fray". The New York Times, June 19, 1987.
^ Kohlberg In Dispute Over Firm. The New York Times, August 30, 1989.
^ "Kohlberg Suit Settlement". The New York Times, February 23, 1990.
^ Duracell International Inc. SEC Form SC 13G/A ("Statement of acquisition of beneficial ownership"); filed February 6, 1996.
^ Baker, George; Smith, George (1998). The New Financial Capitalists: KKR and the Creation of Corporate Value. New York: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-64260-6. 
^ Scott Nuttall profile at Forbes
^ "A kinder, gentler KKR wants a piece of your 401K", Forbes, January 23, 2013.
^ Profile of Scott Nuttall at investing.businessweek.com, Businessweek.com, January 23, 2013.
^ a b "KKR Appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers". KKR Press Release. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ de la Merced, Michael J. "Next Generation at K.K.R. Set as It Names Two Co-Presidents". New York Times. Retrieved 17 July 2017. 
^ ""For Saul Fox, Bigger Isn’t Always Better in the World of Buyouts". foxpaine.com, May 15, 2000. Retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Anders, George. "Bitter End of a Partnership", Wall Street Journal, September 15, 2007.
^ Blue Harbour Group> About Blue Harbour Archived 2008-03-13 at the Wayback Machine. (company website); retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ a b c Barbarians at the Gate: Contrasting fortunes for those closest to the deal. eFinancial News, November 3, 2008; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ "Pelosi Found Guilty of Murder". CBS News. December 13, 2004. Retrieved May 17, 2007. 
^ "Murder in East Hampton", Vanity Fair, January 2002.
^ "Mystery of the Murdered Millionaire". Dateline NBC; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Paul M. Hazen profile as Wells Fargo & Co. Chairman and CEO Archived 2005-09-14 at the Wayback Machine.; retrieved February 16, 2009.
^ Mehlman profile at KKR website Archived 2013-07-30 at the Wayback Machine.
^ "KKR names former CIA head Petraeus as chairman of new institute". 30 May 2013. Retrieved 5 June 2017 – via Reuters. 


References[edit]


FT.com / Industries / Basic industries – "KKR set to buy Masonite for C$3.1bn"
Gross, Daniel & David Sterling. "Has Henry Kravis gone soft?". Slate, August 5, 2007; retrieved August 7, 2007.
The KKR Way. Bloomberg Markets, August 2007
"The barbarians at the gate have been losing their Midas touch". timesonline.co.uk, August 6, 2005; retrieved February 16, 2009.


External links[edit]

Yahoo! – Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. company profile







v
t
e


Kohlberg Kravis Roberts



Founders



Jerome Kohlberg Jr.
Henry Kravis
George R. Roberts





Selected current investments



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Aricent Group
Bharti Enterprises
Capsugel
CICC
Café Coffee Day
Colonial Pipeline
Del Monte Foods
Dollar General
Eastman Kodak
El Paso Corp.
Energy Future Holdings
First Data
Hospital Corporation of America
KION Group
Laureate Education
Legg Mason
Legrand
Magma Fincorp
Maxeda
Nielsen Holdings
Northgate Information Solutions
NXP Semiconductors
Oriental Brewery
Pets at Home
ProSiebenSat.1 Media
Sealy Corporation
Seven West Media
TDC A/S
Toys "R" Us
US Foods
Visma
Wild
Yageo
Zhone Technologies








 Category












v
t
e


Largest private equity investment firms






3i Group
AAC Capital Partners
Advent International
AlpInvest Partners
American Capital
Apax Partners
Apollo Global Management
Ares Management
Bain Capital
BC Partners
Berkshire Partners
The Blackstone Group
Bridgepoint Capital
The Carlyle Group
CCMP Capital
Cerberus Capital Management
Charterhouse Capital Partners
Cinven
Clayton, Dubilier & Rice
CVC Capital Partners
Doughty Hanson & Co
EnCap Investments
EQT Partners
First Reserve Corporation
Fortress Investment Group
General Atlantic
Goldman Sachs Capital Partners
GTCR
Hellman & Friedman
H.I.G. Capital
JRK Property Holdings
KKR
Trilantic Capital Partners
Leonard Green & Partners
Madison Dearborn Partners
Nordic Capital
Oak Investment Partners
Oaktree Capital Management
Onex
Teachers' Private Capital
Pacific Equity Partners
PAI Partners
Permira
Providence Equity Partners
Sentinel Capital Partners
Silver Lake Partners
Summit Partners
Sun Capital Partners
TA Associates
Terra Firma Capital Partners
Thomas H. Lee Partners
TPG Capital
Warburg Pincus
Welsh, Carson, Anderson & Stowe











Private equity
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Portfolio companies












v
t
e


Private equity and venture capital



Basic investment types



Buyout
Venture
Mezzanine
Growth
Secondaries
Equity co-investment








History



History of private equity and venture capital
Early history of private equity
Private equity in the 1980s
Private equity in the 1990s
Private equity in the 2000s





Terms and concepts





Buyout




Financial sponsor
Management buyout
Divisional buyout
Buy–sell agreement
Leveraged recapitalization
Dividend recapitalization






Venture




Angel investor
Business incubator
Post-money valuation
Pre-money valuation
Seed money
Startup company
Venture capital financing
Venture debt
Venture round






Structure




Private equity firms and funds
Limited partnership
Limited liability company
Carried interest
Management fee
Publicly traded private equity

Business Development Company
Venture capital trust


Private investment in public equity (PIPE)
Pledge fund








Investors



Corporations
Institutional investors
Pension funds
Insurance companies
Fund of funds
Endowments
Foundations
Investment banks
Merchant banks
Commercial banks
High-net-worth individuals
Family offices
Sovereign wealth funds
Crowdfunding





Related financial terms



AUM
Cap table
Capital call
Capital commitment
Capital structure
Distribution waterfall
EBITDA
Envy ratio
High-yield debt
IPO
IRR
Leverage
Liquidation preference
M&A
PME
Taxation of private equity and hedge funds
Undercapitalization
Vintage year








Private equity and venture capital investors
Private equity firms
Venture capital firms
Angel investors
Portfolio companies










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kohlberg_Kravis_Roberts&oldid=792147823"					
Categories: Kohlberg Kravis RobertsCompanies based in New York CityCompanies established in 1976Companies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeKohlberg Kravis Roberts companiesMezzanine capital investment firmsPrivate equity firms of the United StatesHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from January 2014Articles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksArticles with a promotional tone from June 2017All articles with a promotional toneArticles needing cleanup from June 2017All pages needing cleanupCleanup tagged articles with a reason field from June 2017Wikipedia pages needing cleanup from June 2017Wikipedia articles needing style editing from June 2017All articles needing style editingArticles with peacock terms from June 2017All articles with peacock termsArticles that may be too long from June 2017Pages using deprecated image syntaxWikipedia articles needing clarification from January 2014All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from September 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from September 2013Good articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


CatalàDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisItalianoLietuviųNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийСрпски / srpskiSvenska中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 19:22.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 















KKR Portfolio | KKR





































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 
















Toggle navigation





MENU












































×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK









KKR Portfolio











 Email
 LinkedIn
 Twitter
 Facebook
















 


SORT


ALPHABETICAL

YEAR



Direction 



ASC                                    



DESC                                    







FILTER

Asset Class 



ALL

ALL
Credit
Energy
Infrastructure
Oil and Gas
Private Equity
Real Estate
Special Situations
TMT Growth




Sub Group 


All Sub Groups

All Sub Groups
Private Equity
Real Assets



Industry 



ALL

ALL

                                        Agriculture

                                        Building Materials

                                        Business Services

                                        Chemicals

                                        Consumer Products

                                        Education

                                        Energy

                                        Financial Services

                                        Forestry

                                        Health Care

                                        Hotels/Leisure

                                        Industrial

                                        Infrastructure

                                        Media/Communications

                                        Oil & Gas

                                        Paper Industry

                                        Power

                                        Real Estate

                                        Retail

                                        Steel

                                        Technology




Geography 




										ALL									


ALL

Americas


Asia-Pacific


Europe, the Middle East and Africa







										ALL									


ALL
Brazil
Canada
United States
Mexico
Australia
China
India
Indonesia
Japan
Korea
Malaysia
Singapore
Taiwan
Vietnam
Denmark
France
Germany
Ireland
Israel
The Netherlands
Norway
Serbia
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland
Turkey
United Kingdom
United Arab Emirates






Clear ALL








Loading Portfolio Data..











Associated Partners

																				HQ: 
											   Philadelphia, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Associated Partners
Associated Partners

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Philadelphia, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.associatedpartnerslp.com

Associated Partners is a portfolio of wireless communications infrastructure companies. 


Close










Academy Sports + Outdoors

																				HQ: 
											   Katy, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Academy Sports + Outdoors

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Katy, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.academy.com/

Academy Sports + Outdoors is a leading value-oriented, lifestyle and sporting goods retailer with over 140 stores located throughout 11 states in the Southeastern U.S. 


Close










ACCO Material Handling Solutions

																				HQ: 
											   York, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



ACCO Material Handling Solutions
ACCO Material Handling Solutions

											 
																						HQ: 
											   York, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.accomhs.com/

ACCO Material Handling Solutions manufactures a full line of specialty material handling equipment including hoists, monorails, cranes, carts, and trailers. ACCO is part of one portfolio investment along with The Crosby Group. 


Close










Aceco TI

																				HQ: 
											   Sao Paulo, Brazil											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Aceco TI
Aceco TI

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Sao Paulo, Brazil											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://acecoti.com.br

Aceco TI is a leading provider of customized data center design, implementation, and maintenance solutions in Brazil and Latin America.  


Close










Acteon

																				HQ: 
											   Norwich, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Acteon
Acteon

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Norwich, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.acteon.com/

Acteon is a leading UK-based global oilfield services provider focusing on the provision of subsea services and products 


Close










Afriflora

																				HQ: 
											   Aalsmeer, The Netherlands											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Afriflora
Afriflora

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Aalsmeer, The Netherlands											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://afriflora.nl/en/sher-foundation

Afriflora cultivates, produces, and sells sustainably-grown roses. 


Close










Alliant Insurance Services

																				HQ: 
											   Newport Beach, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Alliant Insurance Services
Alliant Insurance Services

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Newport Beach, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.alliantinsurance.com/

Alliant Insurance Services, Inc. is one of the largest insurance brokerage firms in the United States, providing property and casualty, workers' compensation, employee benefits, surety, and financial products and services to some 20,000 clients nationwide, including public entities, tribal nations, healthcare, energy, law firms, real estate, construction, and other industry groups. 


Close










Aricent

																				HQ: 
											   Redwood City, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2006



+ Read more



Aricent
Aricent

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Redwood City, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2006

http://www.aricent.com/

Aricent is the world’s #1 pure-play product engineering services firm. They have 25+ years’ experience co-creating ambitious products with the leading networking, telecom, software, semiconductor, Internet and industrial companies.
 
The company helps clients accelerate R&D delivery across three core dimensions: Speed. Quality. Cost. Their 12,000+ designers and engineers focus exclusively on software-powered innovation for the connected world – and their work is distinguished by deep client partnerships, proven engineering discipline and flexible engagement models. 


Close










Bis Industries Limited

																				HQ: 
											   North Sydney, Australia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2006



+ Read more



Bis Industries Limited
Bis Industries Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   North Sydney, Australia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2006

http://www.bislimited.com/

Bis Industries is the leading provider of specialist logistics solutions to the resources sector in Australia. 


Close










China International Capital Corporation Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



China International Capital Corporation Limited
China International Capital Corporation Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.cicc.com.cn/CICC/english/index.htm

China International Capital Corporation Limited is a leading investment bank in China, providing a wide range of investment banking services to Chinese and multinational clients, including equity and debt underwriting, M&A advisory, brokerage, asset management, and proprietary trading. 


Close










China Outfitters Holdings Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Shanghai, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



China Outfitters Holdings Limited
China Outfitters Holdings Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Shanghai, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.cohl.hk/

China Outfitters Holdings Limited is a leading menswear-focused apparel design, manufacturing and sales company with an extensive sales network comprising over 1,000 stores across China. 


Close










COFCO Meat

																				HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



COFCO Meat
COFCO Meat

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://cofco-joycome.com

COFCO Meat is a leading modern industrialized and integrated food company engaged in hog production, processing, distribution, and meat imports and exports. 


Close










Coffee Day Resorts

																				HQ: 
											   Bangalore, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Coffee Day Resorts
Coffee Day Resorts

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Bangalore, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.cafecoffeeday.com/

Coffee Day Resorts is a privately held company with ownership in various operating subsidiaries, including a substantial majority stake in Amalgamated Bean Coffee Trading Company ("ABC"), which is India's largest food and beverage retailer through its nationwide chain of coffee shops operating under the brand CCD (Caf&eacute; Coffee Day). CCD is one of India's fastest-growing chains of coffee shops with more than 1,275 cafes in over 125 cities across India. 


Close










Cognita Schools

																				HQ: 
											   Milton Keynes, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Cognita Schools
Cognita Schools

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Milton Keynes, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.cognitaschools.com/

Cognita Schools is an international independent schools group offering K-12 private education across the globe. 


Close










The Crosby Group

																				HQ: 
											   Tulsa, OK, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



The Crosby Group
Crosby Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tulsa, OK, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.thecrosbygroup.com/

The Crosby Group is a leading, global provider of lifting and rigging equipment including shackles, blocks, sheaves, hooks, and other engineered solutions. 


Close










Energy Future Holdings Corp.

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



Energy Future Holdings Corp.
Energy Future Holdings Corp.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.energyfutureholdings.com/

Energy Future Holdings Corp. manages a portfolio of competitive and regulated energy subsidiaries consisting of TXU Energy, a competitive electricity retailer, Luminant, a competitive power generation business, including mining, wholesale marketing and trading, and construction, and Oncor, a regulated electric distribution and transmission business. 


Close










First Data Corporation

																				HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



First Data Corporation
First Data Corporation

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.firstdata.com/

First Data Corporation is the global leader of payment technology and services solutions for merchants, financial institutions and card issuers globally, with operations in 35 countries, serving over 6 million merchant locations and over 3,500 financial institutions.
 


Close










Gardner Denver

																				HQ: 
											   Milwaukee, WI, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Gardner Denver
Gardner Denver

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Milwaukee, WI, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.gardnerdenver.com/

Gardner Denver is a leading global manufacturer of highly engineered industrial flow control machinery including compressors, blowers, pumps, and fluid transfer systems. 


Close










Go Daddy

																				HQ: 
											   Scottsdale, AZ, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Go Daddy
Go Daddy

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Scottsdale, AZ, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.godaddy.com/

Go Daddy is a leading provider of domain name registration, web-hosting, and other cloud-based services and software primarily to small-and-medium-sized businesses. 


Close










Internet Brands

																				HQ: 
											   El Segundo, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Internet Brands
Internet Brands

											 
																						HQ: 
											   El Segundo, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.internetbrands.com

Internet Brands brings together a diversified portfolio of software, data services, hosting and marketing services, and websites in the auto, health, legal, and home/travel categories.  


Close










Lake Region Medical

																				HQ: 
											   Wilmington, MA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2005



+ Read more



Lake Region Medical
Lake Region Medical

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wilmington, MA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2005

http://www.lakeregionmedical.com/

Lake Region Medical is the largest provider of fully integrated outsourced manufacturing and engineering services to the medical device industry. 


Close










Laureate International Universities

																				HQ: 
											   Baltimore, MD, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



Laureate International Universities
Laureate International Universities

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Baltimore, MD, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.laureate.net/

Laureate International Universities is a trusted global leader in providing access to high-quality, innovative higher education institutions, including more than 72 accredited campus-based and online universities around the world. Today, Laureate universities have over 780,000 students globally working towards undergraduate, master's and doctoral degree programs in architecture, art, business, culinary arts, design, education, engineering, health sciences, hospitality management, information technology, law and medicine. 


Close










Magma Fincorp

																				HQ: 
											   Kolkata, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Magma Fincorp
Magma Fincorp

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kolkata, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.magma.co.in/

Magma Fincorp is a non-banking finance company (NBFC") focused on the rural / semi-urban market that provides financing for autos (cars, UVs and CVs), construction equipment, used CVs, tractors and SME loans through a pan-India network of branches. 


Close










Maxeda B.V.

																				HQ: 
											   Amsterdam, The Netherlands											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2004



+ Read more



Maxeda B.V.
Maxeda B.V.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Amsterdam, The Netherlands											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2004

http://www.maxeda.com/

Maxeda B.V. is the leading DIY retailer in the Benelux with over 350 stores and 1.1 million square meters of retail space. 


Close










Mitchell International

																				HQ: 
											   San Diego, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Mitchell International
Mitchell International

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Diego, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.mitchell.com

Mitchell International is a leading technology and related services vendor in the auto property and casualty claims and workers' compensation insurance sectors. 


Close










MMI Holdings Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



MMI Holdings Limited
MMI Holdings Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.mmi.com.sg/

MMI Holdings is an engaged in the manufacture of precision machining and assembly components for customers in various industries, such as data storage, photonics, communications, semiconductor equipment, automotive and industrial automation. 


Close










Northgate Information Solutions Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Hemel Hempstead, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2008



+ Read more



Northgate Information Solutions Limited
Northgate Information Solutions Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hemel Hempstead, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2008

http://www.northgate-is.com/

Northgate Information Solutions is a leading global provider of specialist software and outsourcing solutions to the human resources and public service sectors. 


Close










Novo Holdco Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Novo Holdco Limited
Novo Holdco Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.novoconcept.com.cn/

Novo Holdco is a fast growing fashion apparel retailer focused on the 18-30 age demographic in China. 


Close










Panasonic Healthcare

																				HQ: 
											   Tokyo, Japan											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Panasonic Healthcare
Panasonic Healthcare

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tokyo, Japan											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.panasonic-healthcare.com/

Panasonic Healthcare is a  leading provider of diabetes monitoring systems, specialized laboratory equipment, and clinical healthcare IT systems in Japan and worldwide. 


Close










Pets at Home

																				HQ: 
											   Handforth, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Pets at Home
Pets at Home

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Handforth, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.petsathome.com/

Pets at Home is a leading U.K.-based specialty retailer of pet food and accessories and provider of pet-related services including grooming and veterinary services. 


Close










PortAventura

																				HQ: 
											   Tarragona, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



PortAventura
PortAventura

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tarragona, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.portaventura.co.uk/

PortAventura is a leading family-oriented theme park, water park and destination resort in Southern Europe, near Barcelona. 


Close










RigNet

																				HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



RigNet
RigNet

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.rig.net/

RigNet is a global provider of managed remote communications solutions, systems integration, and collaborative applications to the global upstream energy sector across the life of the field. 


Close










Rundong Automobile Group

																				HQ: 
											   Jiangsu Province, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Rundong Automobile Group
Rundong Automobile Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Jiangsu Province, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.rndong-auto.com.cn

Rundong Automobile Group is a leading car dealership company in eastern China with a diversified portfolio of renowned luxury car brands. 


Close










Santanol

																				HQ: 
											   Perth, Australia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Santanol
Santanol

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Perth, Australia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Santanol is a sandalwood plantation manager, managing approximately 2,100 hectares of Indian sandalwood in northern West Australia (Kununurra). Sandalwood, and its oil, is used  in perfumes, carvings, incense, toiletries, and medicine amongst other products. 


Close










Sedgwick

																				HQ: 
											   Memphis, TN, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Sedgwick
Sedgwick

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Memphis, TN, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.sedgwick.com/

Sedgwick is a leading provider of customized, fully-integrated claims management solutions to U.S. corporations, public entities and insurance carriers. 


Close










SMCP

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



SMCP
SMCP

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



SMCP is a leading ready-to-wear affordable luxury apparel retailing group operating across 4 distinct brands: Sandro, Maje, Claudie Pierlot and Sandro Men. 


Close










Sonos

																				HQ: 
											   Santa Barbara, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Sonos
Sonos

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Santa Barbara, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.sonos.com/

Sonos is a leading provider of wireless audio and home theater products for the connected home. The Company's unique multi-room wireless technology and proprietary software allow users to easily play and stream audio and video content throughout the home. 


Close










Engility

																				HQ: 
											   Chantilly, VA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2009



+ Read more



Engility
Engility

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Chantilly, VA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2009

http://www.engilitycorp.com/

Engility (fka TASC) is a premier provider of advanced systems engineering and integration services across the Intelligence Community, Department of Defense and civilian agencies of the federal government. 


Close










Toys"R" Us, Inc.

																				HQ: 
											   Wayne, NJ, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2005



+ Read more



Toys"R" Us, Inc.
Toys"R" Us, Inc.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wayne, NJ, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2005

http://www.toysrus.com/

Toys "R" Us is one of the world's leading specialty toy and juvenile products retailers, selling merchandise globally through more than 1,600 stores in over 34 countries, and through the company's websites. 


Close










US Foods

																				HQ: 
											   Chicago, IL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



US Foods
US Foods

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Chicago, IL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.usfoods.com/

US Foods is the second-largest broadline foodservice distributor in the U.S., providing food and related products to independent restaurants, healthcare and hospitality customers, educational institutions and prominent multi-unit restaurant companies. 


Close










Van Gansewinkel Groep bv

																				HQ: 
											   Eindhoven, The Netherlands											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2006



+ Read more



Van Gansewinkel Groep bv
Van Gansewinkel Groep bv

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Eindhoven, The Netherlands											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2006

http://www.vangansewinkelgroep.com/

Van Gansewinkel Groep is the largest waste management and processing company in the Benelux, engaging in the collection and processing waste into high quality raw materials. The company serves a diverse range of industries and specializes in recycling waste such as electronics, wood, plastics, glass, paper, hazardous waste and construction and demolition materials. The company has significant operations throughout Europe. 


Close










VATS Liquor Chain Store Management Co, Ltd.

																				HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



VATS Liquor Chain Store Management Co, Ltd.
VATS Liquor Chain Store Management Co, Ltd.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.vatsliquor.com/en/

VATS Liquor Store is the largest nationwide liquor store chain operator in China. The company operates more than 270 liquor stores covering all provinces in mainland China and offers high quality liquor products through an extensive nationwide retail network. In addition, the company owns sole distribution rights to a diversified portfolio of leading Chinese liquor brands and distributes a number of local and international premium products. 


Close










Visant Corporation

																				HQ: 
											   Armonk, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2004



+ Read more



Visant Corporation
Visant Corporation

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Armonk, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2004

http://www.visant.net/

Visant is a leading marketing and publishing services enterprise servicing the school affinity, direct marketing, fragrance and cosmetics sampling, and educational and trade publishing segments. 


Close










Visma

																				HQ: 
											   Oslo, Norway											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Visma
Visma

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Oslo, Norway											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.visma.com/

Visma is a leading Norwegian-based technology company that delivers ERP software and services such as accounting, tax and payroll applications, to over 300,000 SME customers in the Nordic region. 


Close







                                		 Weld North Holdings LLC                                		





Weld North Holdings LLC

																				HQ: 
											   Greenwich, CT, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Weld North Holdings LLC
Weld North Holdings LLC

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Greenwich, CT, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.weldnorth.com/

Weld North Holdings LLC is a partnership with Jonathan Grayer, former Chairman & CEO of Kaplan, Inc., concentrating on education, health and wellness, consumer services and marketing businesses. 


Close










Weststar Aviation Services

																				HQ: 
											   Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Weststar Aviation Services
Weststar Aviation Services

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.weststar-aviation.aero

Weststar Aviation Services is one of the largest providers of offshore helicopter transportation services to oil and gas companies in the South East Asia region. 


Close







                                		 Broadway Mall                                		





Broadway Mall

																				HQ: 
											   Nassau County, Long Island, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Broadway Mall
Broadway Mall

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Nassau County, Long Island, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



1.1 million square foot regional mall in Hicksville, New York (Nassau County, Long Island). 


Close







                                		 Colonie Center                                		





Colonie Center

																				HQ: 
											   Albany, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Colonie Center
Colonie Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Albany, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



1.3 mm square foot super-regional mall located in Albany, NY 


Close







                                		 Castel French Shopping Centers                                		





Castel French Shopping Centers

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Castel French Shopping Centers
Castel French Shopping Centers

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



Joint-venture with Seefar, a portfolio of four shopping centres (Les Quais d'Ivry in Ivry-sur-Seine, La Grande Porte in Montreuil, L'espace du Palais in Rouen and La Mayenne in Laval) from Corio 


Close







                                		 Del Monte Center                                		





Del Monte Center

																				HQ: 
											   Pittsburgh, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Del Monte Center
Del Monte Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Pittsburgh, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



270,000 square foot office building with lead tenant and KKR Portfolio Company Del Monte Foods on the North Shore of Pittsburgh, PA 


Close







                                		 Harvest Hills                                		





Harvest Hills

																				HQ: 
											   Williston, ND, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Harvest Hills
Harvest Hills

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Williston, ND, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



164-acre residential development site authorized for 810 apartments and 727 residential lots in Williston, ND. 


Close







                                		 Legends Outlet Center                                		





Legends Outlet Center

																				HQ: 
											   Kansas City, KS, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Legends Outlet Center
Legends Outlet Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kansas City, KS, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



~1.1 mm square foot hybrid outlet and entertainment center in Kansas City, KS. 


Close







                                		 Pinto Business Park                                		





Pinto Business Park

																				HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Pinto Business Park
Pinto Business Park

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



Strategic partnership (or joint venture) with global real estate company Hines, to pursue industrial build-to-suit projects on 970-acre site in Houston, TX 


Close







                                		 Queens Moat Hotels                                		





Queens Moat Hotels

																				HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Queens Moat Hotels
Queens Moat Hotels

											 
																						HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



Owner and operator of 57 limited service / 3-4 star hotels across the UK, 47, and the Netherlands with 3,250 employees 


Close







                                		 River Plaza Paris                                		





River Plaza Paris

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



River Plaza Paris
River Plaza Paris

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



27k sqm high quality office building by the River Seine, located in Asni?es-sur-Seine, Paris. 


Close







                                		 Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.                                		





Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.

																				HQ: 
											   FL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.
Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   FL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



~$280 million healthcare real estate portfolio with an existing base of 20 diversified assets. 


Close







                                		 UK Retail Park Property Portfolio                                		





UK Retail Park Property Portfolio

																				HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013/2014



+ Read more



UK Retail Park Property Portfolio
UK Retail Park Property Portfolio

											 
																						HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013/2014



Retail Park Portfolio made up of multi-let retail warehouse space in Oxford, Glasgow, Sunderland, and Birmingham with a combination of food, shopping, retail outlets and bulky goods consent. 


Close







                                		 Yorktown Center                                		





Yorktown Center

																				HQ: 
											   Lombard, IL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Yorktown Center
Yorktown Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Lombard, IL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



1.5 mm square foot super-regional mall in Lombard, IL. 


Close







                                		 KKR Natural Resources                                		





KKR Natural Resources

																		Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



KKR Natural Resources
KKR Natural Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy – Real Assets
											 
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010



Portfolio of mature oil and gas assets 


Close










Accelerated Oil Technologies

																				HQ: 
											   New York, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Accelerated Oil Technologies
Accelerated Oil Technologies

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   New York, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.acceleratedoil.com/

Joint venture focused on acquiring oilfields in North America with the objective of enhancing production through the application of Enhanced Oil Recovery Technologies 


Close







                                		 Quicksilver Resources                                		





Quicksilver Resources

																		Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Quicksilver Resources
Quicksilver Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy – Real Assets
											 
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011



Structured midstream partnership with an oil and gas producer focused on unconventional natural gas exploration, production, and development. 


Close







                                		 Comstock Resources                                		





Comstock Resources

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Comstock Resources
Comstock Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy – Real Assets
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



Partnership with Comstock Resources, a Texas-based oil and gas producer, to develop oil and gas assets in the Eagle Ford Shale 


Close










Westbrick Energy

																				HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Westbrick Energy
Westbrick Energy

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.westbrick.ca/

Westbrick is an oil and gas company with operations in the greater Pembina area of Alberta with over 70,000 net acres of oil and gas rights. 


Close







                                		 Cinco Resources                                		





Cinco Resources

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Cinco Resources
Cinco Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Real Assets
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Partnership with Cinco Resources, a Texas-based oil and gas producer, to develop oil and gas assets in the Eagle Ford Shale 


Close







                                		 EXCO Resources                                		





EXCO Resources

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



EXCO Resources
EXCO Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Real Assets
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Joint acquisition and drilling partnership on a portion of Chesapeake Energy's undeveloped acreage in the oil window of the Eagle Ford Shale in south Texas 


Close







                                		 FlowStream Commodities                                		





FlowStream Commodities

																				HQ: 
											   Zug, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



FlowStream Commodities
FlowStream Commodities

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Zug, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Switzerland-headquartered company focused on acquiring existing oil & gas gross overriding royalties (GOR) and net profit interests (NPIs) as well as creating streams 


Close







                                		 Torq                                		





Torq

																				HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Torq
Torq

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Calgary-based private company focused on the transportation of crude oil from Western Canada 


Close










Colonial Pipeline Company

																				HQ: 
											   Alpharetta, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Colonial Pipeline Company
Colonial Pipeline Company

																						   Investment Type: Energy and Infrastructure - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Alpharetta, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.colpipe.com/

Largest refined product pipeline in North America 


Close










European Locomotive Leasing (ELL)

																				HQ: 
											   Munich, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



European Locomotive Leasing (ELL)
European Locomotive Leasing (ELL)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Munich, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.ell.co.at

European Locomotive Leasing provides full-service locomotive leasing solutions to the European railway industry. 


Close










Saba Infraestructuras

																				HQ: 
											   Barcelona, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Saba Infraestructuras
Saba Infraestructuras

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Barcelona, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.saba.es

A leading European parking assets operator.  


Close










South Staffordshire plc

																				HQ: 
											   Walsall, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



South Staffordshire plc
South Staffordshire plc

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Walsall, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.south-staffordshire.com/

A UK water company that owns/operates two regulated water concessions solely responsible for the integrated water supply chain in the West Midlands and Cambridge areas in the UK, as well as a smaller non-regulated business that provides specialist services to other UK water companies and utilities under medium-long term contracts. 


Close










SunTap Energy I

																				HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



SunTap Energy I
SunTap Energy I

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.recurrentenergy.com/

A joint venture with Recurrent Energy to invest in solar photovoltaic (PV) facilities, including a portfolio of facilities serving the Sacramento Municipal Utility District. 


Close










SunTap Energy II

																				HQ: 
											   United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



SunTap Energy II
SunTap Energy II

											 
																						HQ: 
											   United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.recurrentenergy.com/

Acquired additional solar photovoltaic electric generating facilities from joint venture with Recurrent Energy. 


Close










T-Solar Global Operating Assets

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



T-Solar Global Operating Assets
T-Solar Global Operating Assets

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.tsolar.com/en/portal.do

T-Solar Global Operating Assets is one of the largest solar photovoltaic operating platform in Europe with 168 MW of installed capacity across Spain and Italy. 


Close










Vanke Wuhan Optics Valley

																				HQ: 
											   Wuhan City, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Vanke Wuhan Optics Valley
Vanke Wuhan Optics Valley

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wuhan City, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://wh.vanke.com/wkjc/ 

Wuhan Optics is a 2.2mm square foot gross floor area development project, comprised primarily of high-rise residential, with complementary offices and podium retail. 


Close










Qingdao Haier

																				HQ: 
											   Qingdao, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Qingdao Haier
Qingdao Haier

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Qingdao, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.haier.net/en/

Qingdao Haier is a leading white goods brand in China that designs, manufactures, and sells consumer electronics and home appliances. 


Close










Trainline

																				HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Trainline
Trainline

											 
																						HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.thetrainline.com/

Trainline is a leading digital distribution platform for train tickets in the UK. 


Close










Pioneer DJ Corporation

																				HQ: 
											   Kawasaki, Japan											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Pioneer DJ Corporation
Pioneer DJ Corporation

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kawasaki, Japan											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://pioneerdj.com/

Pioneer DJ develops and markets equipment for disc jockeys, including DJ players, mixers, controllers, headphones, and speakers 


Close










Arbor Pharmaceuticals

																				HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Arbor Pharmaceuticals
Arbor Pharmaceuticals 

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://arborpharma.com/

Arbor Pharmaceuticals is a specialty pharmaceutical company with a diversified portfolio of branded products across multiple therapeutic areas for the cardiovascular, pediatric, and hospital markets as well as generic products through its Wilshire division. 


Close










Scout24 Schweiz

																				HQ: 
											   Flamatt, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Scout24 Schweiz
Scout24 Schweiz

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Flamatt, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.scout24.ch/

Scout24 Schweiz is the leading online classifieds platform in Switzerland. We are also invested in its sister company Omnimedia, a leading digital marketing agency in Switzerland. Scout24 Schweiz and Omnimedia are two subsidiaries of Ringier, Switzerland’s largest media company and a 180 year-old family owned business. 


Close










Goodpack

																				HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Goodpack
Goodpack

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.goodpack.com/

Goodpack is the largest provider of multi-modal and re-usable intermediate bulk containers (“IBC”) globally with a fleet of 3.2 million IBCs and over 5,000 delivery and collection points. 


Close










BrightView

																				HQ: 
											   Rockville, MD, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



BrightView
BrightView

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Rockville, MD, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

https://www.brightview.com/

BrightView is a leading provider of commercial landscape maintenance and snow removal services in the U.S. 


Close










Savant Systems

																				HQ: 
											   Hyannis, MA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Savant Systems
Savant Systems

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hyannis, MA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

https://www.savant.com/

Savant is a leading provider of automation and control solutions for the connected home, enabling consumers to integrate music, video, lighting, temperature, security, communications and other functionalities into a unified home automation solution. 


Close










Sundrop Farms

																				HQ: 
											   Adelaide, Australia and London, England, Asia-Pacific											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Sundrop Farms
Sundrop Farms

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Adelaide, Australia and London, England, Asia-Pacific											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.sundropfarms.com

Sundrop Farms is a specialized developer and operator of greenhouse installations designed for semi-arid regions which have traditionally been unsuitable for agriculture. The system developed by Sundrop uses solar energy to cool, heat, and power high-tech greenhouse facilities and desalinated seawater for irrigation. 


Close







                                		 World Trade Centre                                		





World Trade Centre

																				HQ: 
											   Melbourne, Australia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



World Trade Centre
World Trade Centre

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Melbourne, Australia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



Towers 2, 3 and 4 of the World Trade Center is a 530,000 square-foot office complex on the edge of the Melbourne central business district, jointly acquired by KKR and Abacus, a listed REIT in Australia. 


Close







                                		 Nevis Shopping Centers                                		





Nevis Shopping Centers

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Nevis Shopping Centers
Nevis Shopping Centers

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



Two retail and leisure parks in Madrid and Zamora 


Close







                                		 K Twin Towers                                		





K Twin Towers

																				HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



K Twin Towers
K Twin Towers

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



K Twin Towers is a premium-grade commercial property located in the Gwanghwamun precinct within the Seoul central business district.  


Close










National Vision

																				HQ: 
											   Lawrenceville, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



National Vision
National Vision

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Lawrenceville, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.nationalvision.com/

National Vision is the largest optical retailer in the U.S. focused exclusively on the fast-growing value segment with over 700 retail locations. 


Close










Gland Pharma Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Hyderabad, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Gland Pharma Limited
Gland Pharma Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hyderabad, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.glandpharma.com

Gland Pharma Limited is a leading pure-play developer and manufacturer of generic injectables formulations across a wide spectrum of therapeutic areas and markets its products through partnerships with leading global pharmaceutical companies. 


Close










SBB/Telemach Group

																				HQ: 
											   Belgrade, Serbia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



SBB/Telemach Group
SBB/Telemach Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Belgrade, Serbia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.the-united-group.com/

SBB/Telemach Group is a leading Pay-TV, telephony and broadband operator in South East Europe. 


Close










Ambea AB

																				HQ: 
											   Stockholm, Sweden											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Ambea AB
Ambea AB

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Stockholm, Sweden											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.ambea.com/

Ambea AB is one of the largest healthcare and care providers in the Nordic region, with strong positions in both Sweden and Finland. 


Close










PRA Health Sciences

																				HQ: 
											   Raleigh, NC, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



PRA Health Sciences
PRA Health Sciences

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Raleigh, NC, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.prainternational.com

PRA International is a leading contract research organization that performs clinical trials combining therapeutic and operational expertise with local knowledge to serve clients across all phases of drug development. 


Close










Acciona Energia Internacional

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Acciona Energia Internacional
Acciona Energia Internacional

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.acciona-energia.com/

Joint Venture between Acciona S.A. and KKR comprised of 2.3 gigawatts of renewable generating assets spread across 12 countries. 


Close










Channel Control Merchants

																				HQ: 
											   Hattiesburg, MS, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Channel Control Merchants
Channel Control Merchants

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hattiesburg, MS, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.channelcontrolmerchants.com/

Channel Control Merchants is a deep value retailer and wholesaler of opportunistic secondary market inventories, with particular expertise in the purchase and resale of store level inventories. 


Close










Sunner Development

																				HQ: 
											   Nanping, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Sunner Development
Sunner Development

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Nanping, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.sunnercn.com/index.aspx

Sunner Development is China’s leading vertically integrated chicken meat producer. 


Close










Ticket Monster Inc.

																				HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Ticket Monster Inc.
Ticket Monster Inc.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.ticketmonster.co.kr/home

Ticket Monster (TMON) is a leading mobile-first, e-commerce platform that provides a premium online and mobile shopping experience to customers across South Korea. TMON offers a curated selection of discounted items across the categories of Goods, Local Services, and Travel. 


Close










Uxin

																				HQ: 
											   Wangjing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Uxin
Uxin

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wangjing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.uxin.com/

Professional online transaction service provider for used cars. 


Close










Yuehai Feed Group Co. Ltd.

																				HQ: 
											   Zhanjiang, Guangdong, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Yuehai Feed Group Co. Ltd.
Yuehai Feed Group Co. Ltd.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Zhanjiang, Guangdong, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.yuehaifeed.com/

Aquatic feed company in China focused on providing feed and nutrition solutions for shrimp and seawater fish farming. 


Close










C.H.I. Overhead Doors

																				HQ: 
											   Arthur, IL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



C.H.I. Overhead Doors
C.H.I. Overhead Doors

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Arthur, IL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://chiohd.com/

CHI is a leading manufacturer of built-to-order overhead sectional and rolling steel garage doors. 


Close










Sungard Availability Services

																				HQ: 
											   Wayne, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Sungard Availability Services
Sungard Availability Services

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wayne, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.sungardas.com

Sungard Availability Services spun-out of Sungard Data Systems in 2014. The company provides a variety of managed IT services, including enterprise cloud, application management, IT consulting, disaster recovery services, and more. 


Close










Japfa Comfeed Tbk

																				HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Japfa Comfeed Tbk
Japfa Comfeed Tbk

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

https://www.japfacomfeed.co.id/en

Poultry feed, day-old chick and processed chicken company in Indonesia. 


Close










Joulon

																				HQ: 
											   Dubai, United Arab Emirates											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Joulon
Joulon

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dubai, United Arab Emirates											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.joulon.com/

Joulon is an integrated platform providing asset management services to the oil and gas industry globally. 


Close










Emerald Media

																				HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Emerald Media
Emerald Media

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://emeraldmedia.asia/index.html

Emerald Media is a Pan-Asian platform that provides growth capital to media, entertainment and digital media companies and looks to acquire control or significant minority positions in growing public and private media companies. 


Close










Avendus Capital

																				HQ: 
											    Mumbai, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Avendus Capital
Avendus Capital

											 
																						HQ: 
											    Mumbai, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.avendus.com/india

A leading investment banking franchise in India. 


Close










X-ELIO (fka Gestamp Asetym Solar)

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



X-ELIO (fka Gestamp Asetym Solar)
X-ELIO (fka Gestamp Asetym Solar)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.x-elio.com/

Global developer and operator of solar photovoltaic plants. 


Close










Veresen Midstream LP

																				HQ: 
											   Calgary, Alberta, Canada											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Veresen Midstream LP
Veresen Midstream LP

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Calgary, Alberta, Canada											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://veresenmidstream.com/

Veresen Midstream is a leading independent natural gas gathering and processing business in Western Canada. 


Close










Deutsche Glasfaser

																				HQ: 
											   Borken, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Deutsche Glasfaser
Deutsche Glasfaser

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Borken, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

https://www.deutsche-glasfaser.de/privatkunden/

German based provider of fiber-to-the-home network. 


Close










Renvico Renewable Energy (fka Sorgenia) 

																				HQ: 
											   Maisons-Laffitte, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Renvico Renewable Energy (fka Sorgenia) 
Renvico Renewable Energy (fka Sorgenia)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Maisons-Laffitte, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.renvicoenergy.com/

Renvico Renewable Energy is a leading wind farm owner/operator in France with an operating assets portfolio of 152.6 MW (spread across 15 wind farms) and an authorized assets portfolio of 94.9 MW (spread across nine wind farms). 


Close










Webhelp

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Webhelp
Webhelp

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.webhelp.com/

A leading European player in the Customer Relationship Management Business Process Outsourcing sector. 


Close










Mills Fleet Farm

																				HQ: 
											    Appleton, WI, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Mills Fleet Farm
Mills Fleet Farm

											 
																						HQ: 
											    Appleton, WI, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.fleetfarm.com/

Midwestern, value-based retailer of lifestyle merchandise serving DIY, outdoor, and active families. 


Close










LGC

																				HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



LGC
LGC

											 
																						HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.lgcgroup.com/

Global measurement and testing company for life sciences and other applied end-markets. 


Close










Välinge

																				HQ: 
											    Viken, Sweden											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Välinge
Välinge

											 
																						HQ: 
											    Viken, Sweden											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

https://www.valinge.se/

Swedish R&D company focused on developing innovative solutions for the global wood flooring and furniture industries. 


Close










Mandala Energy

																				HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Mandala Energy
Mandala Energy

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://mandalaenergy.com/

Mandala Energy is a Southeast Asia-focused oil and gas exploration and production company, founded in March 2015. It focuses on assets across diverse fiscal regimes within established plays in Southeast Asia spanning the full cycle of exploration, development and production. 


Close










Air Medical Group Holdings

																				HQ: 
											   Lewisville, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Air Medical Group Holdings
Air Medical Group Holdings

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Lewisville, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015



Air Medical Group Holdings is a leading provider of emergency air medical transportation services to individuals with critical health issues or injuries. 


Close










Go-Jek

																				HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Go-Jek
Go-Jek

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

https://www.go-jek.com/

Mobile application-based platform in Indonesia that provides a range of services such as ride hailing, food delivery, lifestyle services, and mobile payments. 


Close










Ultimate Fighting Championship

																				HQ: 
											   Las Vegas, Nevada, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Ultimate Fighting Championship
Ultimate Fighting Championship

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Las Vegas, Nevada, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.ufc.com/

The Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC) is the premier mixed martial arts sports brand and the largest pay-per-view event provider in the world. 


Close










PEMEX

																				HQ: 
											   Mexico City, Mexico											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



PEMEX
PEMEX

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Mexico City, Mexico											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.pemex.com/en/Paginas/default.aspx

Strategic oil and gas infrastructure assets. 


Close










Cylance

																				HQ: 
											   Irvine, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Cylance
Cylance

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Irvine, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

https://www.cylance.com/

Next-generation endpoint security platform based on artificial intelligence 


Close










DoubleDutch

																				HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



DoubleDutch
DoubleDutch

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://doubledutch.me

Live engagement marketing solutions for the global events industry 


Close










FanDuel

																				HQ: 
											   New York, NY / Edinburgh, UK, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



FanDuel
FanDuel

											 
																						HQ: 
											   New York, NY / Edinburgh, UK, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

https://www.fanduel.com/

Leading daily fantasy sports company, offering one-day contests across a variety of sports.  


Close










Jitterbit

																				HQ: 
											   2016, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Jitterbit
Jitterbit

											 
																						HQ: 
											   2016, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.jitterbit.com/

Cloud-based data integration platform-as-a-service 


Close










Magic Leap

																				HQ: 
											   Dania, FL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Magic Leap
Magic Leap

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dania, FL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.magicleap.com

Developer of augmented reality devices and ecosystem 


Close










Starry

																				HQ: 
											   Boston, MA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Starry
Starry

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Boston, MA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.starry.com

Produces Wi-Fi routers and offers wireless Internet service delivered via high-frequency millimeter wave technology 


Close










Texture

																				HQ: 
											   Menlo Park, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Texture
Texture

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Menlo Park, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.texture.com 

Mobile application that provides unlimited access to premium magazine content 


Close










Transphorm

																				HQ: 
											   Goleta, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Transphorm
Transphorm

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Goleta, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.transphormusa.com

Global semiconductor company that develops gallium nitride (GaN) FETs for high-voltage power conversion applications.  


Close










Clicktale

																				HQ: 
											   Tel Aviv, Israel											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Clicktale
Clicktale

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tel Aviv, Israel											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.clicktale.com

Customer experience analytics software to optimize a user's online journey. 


Close










Arago

																				HQ: 
											   Frankfurt, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Arago
Arago

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Frankfurt, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.arago.co

IT automation solutions based on artificial intelligence and machine learning capabilities. 


Close










Optimal+

																				HQ: 
											   Holon, Israel											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Optimal+
Optimal+

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Holon, Israel											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.optimalplus.com

Big data-enabled business intelligence software for the semi & electronics industries. 


Close










GetYourGuide

																				HQ: 
											   Berlin, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



GetYourGuide
GetYourGuide

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Berlin, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.getyourguide.com

Online marketplace for discovering and booking travel tours and activities. 


Close










Darktrace

																				HQ: 
											   Cambridge, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Darktrace
Darktrace

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Cambridge, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.darktrace.com

Machine learning enabled cyber-security solutions for network security and advanced threat detection. 


Close










SoftwareONE

																				HQ: 
											   Zurich, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



SoftwareONE
SoftwareONE

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Zurich, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.softwareone.com

SoftwareONE is a leading provider of Software Portfolio Management (SPM) including software licensing, software asset management, technology consulting and cloud services to more than 12,000 corporate customers in 115 countries. 


Close










Selecta

																				HQ: 
											   Cham, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Selecta
Selecta

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Cham, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.selecta.com/

Selecta is a leading European vending machine operator and office coffee service provider. The company has over 4,000 employees, serving 5 million consumers every day through 150,000 point-of-sales. 


Close










Ursa

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Ursa
Ursa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.ursa.com/

URSA is a leading provider of insulation solutions in Europe, with activity focused on mineral wool and extruded polystyrene (XPS). The company operates 13 production facilities in 8 countries, and has a commercial presence in over 40 markets. 


Close










Hilding Anders

																				HQ: 
											   Malmo, Sweden											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Hilding Anders
Hilding Anders

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Malmo, Sweden											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.hildinganders.com/

Hilding Anders is Europe’s, Russia’s and Asia’s leading provider of beds and mattresses. The company is based in Malmö, Sweden and offers a broad branded portfolio as well as producing private label for retailers. The Group operates close to 1,200 retail outlets in Russia, China and Croatia. 


Close










Winoa

																				HQ: 
											   Le Cheylas, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Winoa
Winoa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Le Cheylas, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

https://www.winoagroup.com/

Winoa is the global leader in the steel abrasives industry. The company operates 11 factories and services over 10,000 customers worldwide. 


Close










Cementos Balboa

																				HQ: 
											   Alconera, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Cementos Balboa
Cementos Balboa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Alconera, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.grupoag.es/cementosbalboa

Cementos Balboa is the only cement plant located in the Extremadura region in Spain with a state-of-the-art facility finalised in 2005. 


Close










Papresa

																				HQ: 
											   Errenteria, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Papresa
Papresa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Errenteria, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.papresa.es/

Papresa is a 100% recycled newsprint business. It operates one plant in Errenteria (Spain) with a production capacity of 375,000 tonnes per year through 3 paper machines. 


Close










Energas

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Energas
Energas

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://pontsursambre-power.com/en/

Energas is comprised of two combined cycle power plants in France, Pont sur Sambre Power & Toul Power. It operates 825 MW of combined capacity, equivalent to the consumption of 800,000 households. 


Close










Cherwell Software

																				HQ: 
											   Colorado Springs, CO, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Cherwell Software
Cherwell Software

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Colorado Springs, CO, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.cherwell.com/

Service management platform which enables customers to track, manage, and automate a variety of service requests. 


Close










Hensoldt (fka Airbus Defence Electronics)

																				HQ: 
											   Taufkirchen, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Hensoldt (fka Airbus Defence Electronics)
Hensoldt (fka Airbus Defence Electronics)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Taufkirchen, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.hensoldt.net/

Global provider of mission-critical sensors, integrated systems and services for defence and security applications 


Close










Optiv

																				HQ: 
											   Denver, CO, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Optiv
Optiv

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Denver, CO, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.optiv.com/

Optiv is a market-leading provider of end-to-end cyber security solutions. 


Close










Calabrio

																				HQ: 
											   Minneapolis, MN, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Calabrio
Calabrio

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Minneapolis, MN, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://calabrio.com/

Calabrio provides a leading, extensible workforce optimization software platform to over 4,000 customers worldwide. 


Close










Epicor

																				HQ: 
											   Austin, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Epicor
Epicor

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Austin, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.epicor.com

Epicor software provides enterprise resource planning (ERP) software and retail solutions to 20,000 customers in over 150 countries. 


Close










Lyft

																				HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Lyft
Lyft

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.lyft.com/

Lyft is a leading ride-sharing platform in the U.S. Lyft enables peer-to-peer transportation by matching passengers with nearby drivers through on-demand or pre-scheduled rides. 


Close










Ivalua

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Ivalua
Ivalua

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.ivalua.com/

Enterprise spend management software focused on strategic sourcing, contract management, procure-to-pay and supplier relationship management 


Close










Masan Nutri-Science

																				HQ: 
											   Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Masan Nutri-Science
Masan Nutri-Science

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.masangroup.com/

Vietnamese animal feed producer which also holds a minority interest in a leading branded pork meat company. The business is focused on building out a fully integrated pork value chain across feed, farm and consumer meat. 


Close










Apple Leisure Group

																				HQ: 
											   Newtown Square, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Apple Leisure Group
Apple Leisure Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Newtown Square, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.appleleisuregroup.com

Apple Leisure Group is a vertically-integrated travel and hospitality company focused on packaged travel and resort/brand management in Mexico and the Caribbean. 


Close










Calvin Capital

																				HQ: 
											   Manchester, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Calvin Capital
Calvin Capital

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Manchester, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.calvincapital.com/

Calvin Capital is a leading provider of gas and electricity meters to energy suppliers in the UK. 


Close










Travelopia

																				HQ: 
											   Crawley, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Travelopia
Travelopia

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Crawley, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.travelopia.com/

Travelopia is a leading specialist travel group focused on providing customers with unforgettable travel-related experiences. 


Close




                        Nothing Found Matching Your Criteria...                    


The portfolio companies shown represent substantially all of KKR’s private equity, TMT growth, infrastructure and energy portfolio companies as of March 31, 2017. Certain portfolio companies have been excluded as private market transactions or investments in which KKR only holds residual interests. In addition, the portfolio companies shown include special situations portfolio companies, where funds and vehicles of KKR hold at least 50% of the portfolio company’s equity or KKR has majority representation on the portfolio company’s board. The specific portfolio companies identified are not representative of all of the portfolio companies purchased, sold, or recommended for KKR Funds and it should not be assumed that the investment in the portfolio companies identified was or will be profitable. Actual holdings will vary for each KKR Fund and there is no guarantee that a particular KKR Fund will hold any or all of the portfolio companies listed. For a full list of KKR’s private market investments, please click here 




  


















KKR Portfolio | KKR





































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 
















Toggle navigation





MENU












































×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK









KKR Portfolio











 Email
 LinkedIn
 Twitter
 Facebook
















 


SORT


ALPHABETICAL

YEAR



Direction 



ASC                                    



DESC                                    







FILTER

Asset Class 



ALL

ALL
Credit
Energy
Infrastructure
Oil and Gas
Private Equity
Real Estate
Special Situations
TMT Growth




Sub Group 


All Sub Groups

All Sub Groups
Private Equity
Real Assets



Industry 



ALL

ALL

                                        Agriculture

                                        Building Materials

                                        Business Services

                                        Chemicals

                                        Consumer Products

                                        Education

                                        Energy

                                        Financial Services

                                        Forestry

                                        Health Care

                                        Hotels/Leisure

                                        Industrial

                                        Infrastructure

                                        Media/Communications

                                        Oil & Gas

                                        Paper Industry

                                        Power

                                        Real Estate

                                        Retail

                                        Steel

                                        Technology




Geography 




										ALL									


ALL

Americas


Asia-Pacific


Europe, the Middle East and Africa







										ALL									


ALL
Brazil
Canada
United States
Mexico
Australia
China
India
Indonesia
Japan
Korea
Malaysia
Singapore
Taiwan
Vietnam
Denmark
France
Germany
Ireland
Israel
The Netherlands
Norway
Serbia
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland
Turkey
United Kingdom
United Arab Emirates






Clear ALL








Loading Portfolio Data..











Associated Partners

																				HQ: 
											   Philadelphia, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Associated Partners
Associated Partners

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Philadelphia, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.associatedpartnerslp.com

Associated Partners is a portfolio of wireless communications infrastructure companies. 


Close










Academy Sports + Outdoors

																				HQ: 
											   Katy, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Academy Sports + Outdoors
Academy Sports + Outdoors

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Katy, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.academy.com/

Academy Sports + Outdoors is a leading value-oriented, lifestyle and sporting goods retailer with over 140 stores located throughout 11 states in the Southeastern U.S. 


Close










ACCO Material Handling Solutions

																				HQ: 
											   York, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



ACCO Material Handling Solutions
ACCO Material Handling Solutions

											 
																						HQ: 
											   York, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.accomhs.com/

ACCO Material Handling Solutions manufactures a full line of specialty material handling equipment including hoists, monorails, cranes, carts, and trailers. ACCO is part of one portfolio investment along with The Crosby Group. 


Close










Aceco TI

																				HQ: 
											   Sao Paulo, Brazil											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Aceco TI
Aceco TI

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Sao Paulo, Brazil											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://acecoti.com.br

Aceco TI is a leading provider of customized data center design, implementation, and maintenance solutions in Brazil and Latin America.  


Close










Acteon

																				HQ: 
											   Norwich, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Acteon
Acteon

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Norwich, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.acteon.com/

Acteon is a leading UK-based global oilfield services provider focusing on the provision of subsea services and products 


Close










Afriflora

																				HQ: 
											   Aalsmeer, The Netherlands											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Afriflora
Afriflora

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Aalsmeer, The Netherlands											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://afriflora.nl/en/sher-foundation

Afriflora cultivates, produces, and sells sustainably-grown roses. 


Close










Alliant Insurance Services

																				HQ: 
											   Newport Beach, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Alliant Insurance Services
Alliant Insurance Services

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Newport Beach, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.alliantinsurance.com/

Alliant Insurance Services, Inc. is one of the largest insurance brokerage firms in the United States, providing property and casualty, workers' compensation, employee benefits, surety, and financial products and services to some 20,000 clients nationwide, including public entities, tribal nations, healthcare, energy, law firms, real estate, construction, and other industry groups. 


Close










Aricent

																				HQ: 
											   Redwood City, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2006



+ Read more



Aricent
Aricent

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Redwood City, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2006

http://www.aricent.com/

Aricent is the world’s #1 pure-play product engineering services firm. They have 25+ years’ experience co-creating ambitious products with the leading networking, telecom, software, semiconductor, Internet and industrial companies.
 
The company helps clients accelerate R&D delivery across three core dimensions: Speed. Quality. Cost. Their 12,000+ designers and engineers focus exclusively on software-powered innovation for the connected world – and their work is distinguished by deep client partnerships, proven engineering discipline and flexible engagement models. 


Close










Bis Industries Limited

																				HQ: 
											   North Sydney, Australia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2006



+ Read more



Bis Industries Limited
Bis Industries Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   North Sydney, Australia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2006

http://www.bislimited.com/

Bis Industries is the leading provider of specialist logistics solutions to the resources sector in Australia. 


Close










China International Capital Corporation Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



China International Capital Corporation Limited
China International Capital Corporation Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.cicc.com.cn/CICC/english/index.htm

China International Capital Corporation Limited is a leading investment bank in China, providing a wide range of investment banking services to Chinese and multinational clients, including equity and debt underwriting, M&A advisory, brokerage, asset management, and proprietary trading. 


Close










China Outfitters Holdings Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Shanghai, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



China Outfitters Holdings Limited
China Outfitters Holdings Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Shanghai, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.cohl.hk/

China Outfitters Holdings Limited is a leading menswear-focused apparel design, manufacturing and sales company with an extensive sales network comprising over 1,000 stores across China. 


Close










COFCO Meat

																				HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



COFCO Meat
COFCO Meat

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://cofco-joycome.com

COFCO Meat is a leading modern industrialized and integrated food company engaged in hog production, processing, distribution, and meat imports and exports. 


Close










Coffee Day Resorts

																				HQ: 
											   Bangalore, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Coffee Day Resorts
Coffee Day Resorts

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Bangalore, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.cafecoffeeday.com/

Coffee Day Resorts is a privately held company with ownership in various operating subsidiaries, including a substantial majority stake in Amalgamated Bean Coffee Trading Company ("ABC"), which is India's largest food and beverage retailer through its nationwide chain of coffee shops operating under the brand CCD (Caf&eacute; Coffee Day). CCD is one of India's fastest-growing chains of coffee shops with more than 1,275 cafes in over 125 cities across India. 


Close










Cognita Schools

																				HQ: 
											   Milton Keynes, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Cognita Schools
Cognita Schools

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Milton Keynes, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.cognitaschools.com/

Cognita Schools is an international independent schools group offering K-12 private education across the globe. 


Close










The Crosby Group

																				HQ: 
											   Tulsa, OK, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



The Crosby Group
Crosby Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tulsa, OK, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.thecrosbygroup.com/

The Crosby Group is a leading, global provider of lifting and rigging equipment including shackles, blocks, sheaves, hooks, and other engineered solutions. 


Close










Energy Future Holdings Corp.

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



Energy Future Holdings Corp.
Energy Future Holdings Corp.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.energyfutureholdings.com/

Energy Future Holdings Corp. manages a portfolio of competitive and regulated energy subsidiaries consisting of TXU Energy, a competitive electricity retailer, Luminant, a competitive power generation business, including mining, wholesale marketing and trading, and construction, and Oncor, a regulated electric distribution and transmission business. 


Close










First Data Corporation

																				HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



First Data Corporation
First Data Corporation

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.firstdata.com/

First Data Corporation is the global leader of payment technology and services solutions for merchants, financial institutions and card issuers globally, with operations in 35 countries, serving over 6 million merchant locations and over 3,500 financial institutions.
 


Close










Gardner Denver

																				HQ: 
											   Milwaukee, WI, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Gardner Denver
Gardner Denver

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Milwaukee, WI, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.gardnerdenver.com/

Gardner Denver is a leading global manufacturer of highly engineered industrial flow control machinery including compressors, blowers, pumps, and fluid transfer systems. 


Close










Go Daddy

																				HQ: 
											   Scottsdale, AZ, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Go Daddy
Go Daddy

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Scottsdale, AZ, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.godaddy.com/

Go Daddy is a leading provider of domain name registration, web-hosting, and other cloud-based services and software primarily to small-and-medium-sized businesses. 


Close










Internet Brands

																				HQ: 
											   El Segundo, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Internet Brands
Internet Brands

											 
																						HQ: 
											   El Segundo, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.internetbrands.com

Internet Brands brings together a diversified portfolio of software, data services, hosting and marketing services, and websites in the auto, health, legal, and home/travel categories.  


Close










Lake Region Medical

																				HQ: 
											   Wilmington, MA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2005



+ Read more



Lake Region Medical
Lake Region Medical

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wilmington, MA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2005

http://www.lakeregionmedical.com/

Lake Region Medical is the largest provider of fully integrated outsourced manufacturing and engineering services to the medical device industry. 


Close










Laureate International Universities

																				HQ: 
											   Baltimore, MD, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



Laureate International Universities
Laureate International Universities

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Baltimore, MD, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.laureate.net/

Laureate International Universities is a trusted global leader in providing access to high-quality, innovative higher education institutions, including more than 72 accredited campus-based and online universities around the world. Today, Laureate universities have over 780,000 students globally working towards undergraduate, master's and doctoral degree programs in architecture, art, business, culinary arts, design, education, engineering, health sciences, hospitality management, information technology, law and medicine. 


Close










Magma Fincorp

																				HQ: 
											   Kolkata, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Magma Fincorp
Magma Fincorp

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kolkata, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.magma.co.in/

Magma Fincorp is a non-banking finance company (NBFC") focused on the rural / semi-urban market that provides financing for autos (cars, UVs and CVs), construction equipment, used CVs, tractors and SME loans through a pan-India network of branches. 


Close










Maxeda B.V.

																				HQ: 
											   Amsterdam, The Netherlands											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2004



+ Read more



Maxeda B.V.
Maxeda B.V.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Amsterdam, The Netherlands											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2004

http://www.maxeda.com/

Maxeda B.V. is the leading DIY retailer in the Benelux with over 350 stores and 1.1 million square meters of retail space. 


Close










Mitchell International

																				HQ: 
											   San Diego, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Mitchell International
Mitchell International

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Diego, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.mitchell.com

Mitchell International is a leading technology and related services vendor in the auto property and casualty claims and workers' compensation insurance sectors. 


Close










MMI Holdings Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



MMI Holdings Limited
MMI Holdings Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.mmi.com.sg/

MMI Holdings is an engaged in the manufacture of precision machining and assembly components for customers in various industries, such as data storage, photonics, communications, semiconductor equipment, automotive and industrial automation. 


Close










Northgate Information Solutions Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Hemel Hempstead, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2008



+ Read more



Northgate Information Solutions Limited
Northgate Information Solutions Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hemel Hempstead, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2008

http://www.northgate-is.com/

Northgate Information Solutions is a leading global provider of specialist software and outsourcing solutions to the human resources and public service sectors. 


Close










Novo Holdco Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Novo Holdco Limited
Novo Holdco Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.novoconcept.com.cn/

Novo Holdco is a fast growing fashion apparel retailer focused on the 18-30 age demographic in China. 


Close










Panasonic Healthcare

																				HQ: 
											   Tokyo, Japan											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Panasonic Healthcare
Panasonic Healthcare

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tokyo, Japan											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.panasonic-healthcare.com/

Panasonic Healthcare is a  leading provider of diabetes monitoring systems, specialized laboratory equipment, and clinical healthcare IT systems in Japan and worldwide. 


Close










Pets at Home

																				HQ: 
											   Handforth, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Pets at Home
Pets at Home

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Handforth, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.petsathome.com/

Pets at Home is a leading U.K.-based specialty retailer of pet food and accessories and provider of pet-related services including grooming and veterinary services. 


Close










PortAventura

																				HQ: 
											   Tarragona, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



PortAventura
PortAventura

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tarragona, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.portaventura.co.uk/

PortAventura is a leading family-oriented theme park, water park and destination resort in Southern Europe, near Barcelona. 


Close










RigNet

																				HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



RigNet
RigNet

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.rig.net/

RigNet is a global provider of managed remote communications solutions, systems integration, and collaborative applications to the global upstream energy sector across the life of the field. 


Close










Rundong Automobile Group

																				HQ: 
											   Jiangsu Province, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Rundong Automobile Group
Rundong Automobile Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Jiangsu Province, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.rndong-auto.com.cn

Rundong Automobile Group is a leading car dealership company in eastern China with a diversified portfolio of renowned luxury car brands. 


Close










Santanol

																				HQ: 
											   Perth, Australia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Santanol
Santanol

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Perth, Australia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Santanol is a sandalwood plantation manager, managing approximately 2,100 hectares of Indian sandalwood in northern West Australia (Kununurra). Sandalwood, and its oil, is used  in perfumes, carvings, incense, toiletries, and medicine amongst other products. 


Close










Sedgwick

																				HQ: 
											   Memphis, TN, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Sedgwick
Sedgwick

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Memphis, TN, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.sedgwick.com/

Sedgwick is a leading provider of customized, fully-integrated claims management solutions to U.S. corporations, public entities and insurance carriers. 


Close










SMCP

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



SMCP
SMCP

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



SMCP is a leading ready-to-wear affordable luxury apparel retailing group operating across 4 distinct brands: Sandro, Maje, Claudie Pierlot and Sandro Men. 


Close










Sonos

																				HQ: 
											   Santa Barbara, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Sonos
Sonos

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Santa Barbara, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.sonos.com/

Sonos is a leading provider of wireless audio and home theater products for the connected home. The Company's unique multi-room wireless technology and proprietary software allow users to easily play and stream audio and video content throughout the home. 


Close










Engility

																				HQ: 
											   Chantilly, VA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2009



+ Read more



Engility
Engility

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Chantilly, VA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2009

http://www.engilitycorp.com/

Engility (fka TASC) is a premier provider of advanced systems engineering and integration services across the Intelligence Community, Department of Defense and civilian agencies of the federal government. 


Close










Toys"R" Us, Inc.

																				HQ: 
											   Wayne, NJ, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2005



+ Read more



Toys"R" Us, Inc.
Toys"R" Us, Inc.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wayne, NJ, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2005

http://www.toysrus.com/

Toys "R" Us is one of the world's leading specialty toy and juvenile products retailers, selling merchandise globally through more than 1,600 stores in over 34 countries, and through the company's websites. 


Close










US Foods

																				HQ: 
											   Chicago, IL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2007



+ Read more



US Foods
US Foods

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Chicago, IL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2007

http://www.usfoods.com/

US Foods is the second-largest broadline foodservice distributor in the U.S., providing food and related products to independent restaurants, healthcare and hospitality customers, educational institutions and prominent multi-unit restaurant companies. 


Close










Van Gansewinkel Groep bv

																				HQ: 
											   Eindhoven, The Netherlands											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2006



+ Read more



Van Gansewinkel Groep bv
Van Gansewinkel Groep bv

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Eindhoven, The Netherlands											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2006

http://www.vangansewinkelgroep.com/

Van Gansewinkel Groep is the largest waste management and processing company in the Benelux, engaging in the collection and processing waste into high quality raw materials. The company serves a diverse range of industries and specializes in recycling waste such as electronics, wood, plastics, glass, paper, hazardous waste and construction and demolition materials. The company has significant operations throughout Europe. 


Close










VATS Liquor Chain Store Management Co, Ltd.

																				HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



VATS Liquor Chain Store Management Co, Ltd.
VATS Liquor Chain Store Management Co, Ltd.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Beijing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.vatsliquor.com/en/

VATS Liquor Store is the largest nationwide liquor store chain operator in China. The company operates more than 270 liquor stores covering all provinces in mainland China and offers high quality liquor products through an extensive nationwide retail network. In addition, the company owns sole distribution rights to a diversified portfolio of leading Chinese liquor brands and distributes a number of local and international premium products. 


Close










Visant Corporation

																				HQ: 
											   Armonk, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2004



+ Read more



Visant Corporation
Visant Corporation

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Armonk, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2004

http://www.visant.net/

Visant is a leading marketing and publishing services enterprise servicing the school affinity, direct marketing, fragrance and cosmetics sampling, and educational and trade publishing segments. 


Close










Visma

																				HQ: 
											   Oslo, Norway											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Visma
Visma

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Oslo, Norway											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.visma.com/

Visma is a leading Norwegian-based technology company that delivers ERP software and services such as accounting, tax and payroll applications, to over 300,000 SME customers in the Nordic region. 


Close







                                		 Weld North Holdings LLC                                		





Weld North Holdings LLC

																				HQ: 
											   Greenwich, CT, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Weld North Holdings LLC
Weld North Holdings LLC

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Greenwich, CT, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.weldnorth.com/

Weld North Holdings LLC is a partnership with Jonathan Grayer, former Chairman & CEO of Kaplan, Inc., concentrating on education, health and wellness, consumer services and marketing businesses. 


Close










Weststar Aviation Services

																				HQ: 
											   Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Weststar Aviation Services
Weststar Aviation Services

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.weststar-aviation.aero

Weststar Aviation Services is one of the largest providers of offshore helicopter transportation services to oil and gas companies in the South East Asia region. 


Close







                                		 Broadway Mall                                		





Broadway Mall

																				HQ: 
											   Nassau County, Long Island, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Broadway Mall
Broadway Mall

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Nassau County, Long Island, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



1.1 million square foot regional mall in Hicksville, New York (Nassau County, Long Island). 


Close







                                		 Colonie Center                                		





Colonie Center

																				HQ: 
											   Albany, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Colonie Center
Colonie Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Albany, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



1.3 mm square foot super-regional mall located in Albany, NY 


Close







                                		 Castel French Shopping Centers                                		





Castel French Shopping Centers

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Castel French Shopping Centers
Castel French Shopping Centers

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



Joint-venture with Seefar, a portfolio of four shopping centres (Les Quais d'Ivry in Ivry-sur-Seine, La Grande Porte in Montreuil, L'espace du Palais in Rouen and La Mayenne in Laval) from Corio 


Close







                                		 Del Monte Center                                		





Del Monte Center

																				HQ: 
											   Pittsburgh, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Del Monte Center
Del Monte Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Pittsburgh, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



270,000 square foot office building with lead tenant and KKR Portfolio Company Del Monte Foods on the North Shore of Pittsburgh, PA 


Close







                                		 Harvest Hills                                		





Harvest Hills

																				HQ: 
											   Williston, ND, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Harvest Hills
Harvest Hills

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Williston, ND, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



164-acre residential development site authorized for 810 apartments and 727 residential lots in Williston, ND. 


Close







                                		 Legends Outlet Center                                		





Legends Outlet Center

																				HQ: 
											   Kansas City, KS, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Legends Outlet Center
Legends Outlet Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kansas City, KS, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



~1.1 mm square foot hybrid outlet and entertainment center in Kansas City, KS. 


Close







                                		 Pinto Business Park                                		





Pinto Business Park

																				HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Pinto Business Park
Pinto Business Park

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Houston, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



Strategic partnership (or joint venture) with global real estate company Hines, to pursue industrial build-to-suit projects on 970-acre site in Houston, TX 


Close







                                		 Queens Moat Hotels                                		





Queens Moat Hotels

																				HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Queens Moat Hotels
Queens Moat Hotels

											 
																						HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



Owner and operator of 57 limited service / 3-4 star hotels across the UK, 47, and the Netherlands with 3,250 employees 


Close







                                		 River Plaza Paris                                		





River Plaza Paris

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



River Plaza Paris
River Plaza Paris

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



27k sqm high quality office building by the River Seine, located in Asni?es-sur-Seine, Paris. 


Close







                                		 Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.                                		





Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.

																				HQ: 
											   FL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.
Sentio Healthcare Properties, Inc.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   FL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



~$280 million healthcare real estate portfolio with an existing base of 20 diversified assets. 


Close







                                		 UK Retail Park Property Portfolio                                		





UK Retail Park Property Portfolio

																				HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013/2014



+ Read more



UK Retail Park Property Portfolio
UK Retail Park Property Portfolio

											 
																						HQ: 
											   United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013/2014



Retail Park Portfolio made up of multi-let retail warehouse space in Oxford, Glasgow, Sunderland, and Birmingham with a combination of food, shopping, retail outlets and bulky goods consent. 


Close







                                		 Yorktown Center                                		





Yorktown Center

																				HQ: 
											   Lombard, IL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Yorktown Center
Yorktown Center

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Lombard, IL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



1.5 mm square foot super-regional mall in Lombard, IL. 


Close







                                		 KKR Natural Resources                                		





KKR Natural Resources

																		Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



KKR Natural Resources
KKR Natural Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy – Real Assets
											 
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010



Portfolio of mature oil and gas assets 


Close










Accelerated Oil Technologies

																				HQ: 
											   New York, NY, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Accelerated Oil Technologies
Accelerated Oil Technologies

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   New York, NY, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.acceleratedoil.com/

Joint venture focused on acquiring oilfields in North America with the objective of enhancing production through the application of Enhanced Oil Recovery Technologies 


Close







                                		 Quicksilver Resources                                		





Quicksilver Resources

																		Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Quicksilver Resources
Quicksilver Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy – Real Assets
											 
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011



Structured midstream partnership with an oil and gas producer focused on unconventional natural gas exploration, production, and development. 


Close







                                		 Comstock Resources                                		





Comstock Resources

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Comstock Resources
Comstock Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy – Real Assets
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012



Partnership with Comstock Resources, a Texas-based oil and gas producer, to develop oil and gas assets in the Eagle Ford Shale 


Close










Westbrick Energy

																				HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2012



+ Read more



Westbrick Energy
Westbrick Energy

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2012

http://www.westbrick.ca/

Westbrick is an oil and gas company with operations in the greater Pembina area of Alberta with over 70,000 net acres of oil and gas rights. 


Close







                                		 Cinco Resources                                		





Cinco Resources

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Cinco Resources
Cinco Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Real Assets
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Partnership with Cinco Resources, a Texas-based oil and gas producer, to develop oil and gas assets in the Eagle Ford Shale 


Close







                                		 EXCO Resources                                		





EXCO Resources

																				HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



EXCO Resources
EXCO Resources

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Real Assets
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dallas, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Joint acquisition and drilling partnership on a portion of Chesapeake Energy's undeveloped acreage in the oil window of the Eagle Ford Shale in south Texas 


Close







                                		 FlowStream Commodities                                		





FlowStream Commodities

																				HQ: 
											   Zug, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



FlowStream Commodities
FlowStream Commodities

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Zug, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Switzerland-headquartered company focused on acquiring existing oil & gas gross overriding royalties (GOR) and net profit interests (NPIs) as well as creating streams 


Close







                                		 Torq                                		





Torq

																				HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



Torq
Torq

																						   Investment Type: Energy - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Calgary, Canada											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013



Calgary-based private company focused on the transportation of crude oil from Western Canada 


Close










Colonial Pipeline Company

																				HQ: 
											   Alpharetta, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Colonial Pipeline Company
Colonial Pipeline Company

																						   Investment Type: Energy and Infrastructure - Private Equity
											 
																						HQ: 
											   Alpharetta, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.colpipe.com/

Largest refined product pipeline in North America 


Close










European Locomotive Leasing (ELL)

																				HQ: 
											   Munich, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



European Locomotive Leasing (ELL)
European Locomotive Leasing (ELL)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Munich, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.ell.co.at

European Locomotive Leasing provides full-service locomotive leasing solutions to the European railway industry. 


Close










Saba Infraestructuras

																				HQ: 
											   Barcelona, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Saba Infraestructuras
Saba Infraestructuras

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Barcelona, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.saba.es

A leading European parking assets operator.  


Close










South Staffordshire plc

																				HQ: 
											   Walsall, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



South Staffordshire plc
South Staffordshire plc

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Walsall, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.south-staffordshire.com/

A UK water company that owns/operates two regulated water concessions solely responsible for the integrated water supply chain in the West Midlands and Cambridge areas in the UK, as well as a smaller non-regulated business that provides specialist services to other UK water companies and utilities under medium-long term contracts. 


Close










SunTap Energy I

																				HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



SunTap Energy I
SunTap Energy I

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.recurrentenergy.com/

A joint venture with Recurrent Energy to invest in solar photovoltaic (PV) facilities, including a portfolio of facilities serving the Sacramento Municipal Utility District. 


Close










SunTap Energy II

																				HQ: 
											   United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



SunTap Energy II
SunTap Energy II

											 
																						HQ: 
											   United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.recurrentenergy.com/

Acquired additional solar photovoltaic electric generating facilities from joint venture with Recurrent Energy. 


Close










T-Solar Global Operating Assets

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



T-Solar Global Operating Assets
T-Solar Global Operating Assets

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.tsolar.com/en/portal.do

T-Solar Global Operating Assets is one of the largest solar photovoltaic operating platform in Europe with 168 MW of installed capacity across Spain and Italy. 


Close










Vanke Wuhan Optics Valley

																				HQ: 
											   Wuhan City, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Vanke Wuhan Optics Valley
Vanke Wuhan Optics Valley

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wuhan City, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://wh.vanke.com/wkjc/ 

Wuhan Optics is a 2.2mm square foot gross floor area development project, comprised primarily of high-rise residential, with complementary offices and podium retail. 


Close










Qingdao Haier

																				HQ: 
											   Qingdao, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Qingdao Haier
Qingdao Haier

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Qingdao, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.haier.net/en/

Qingdao Haier is a leading white goods brand in China that designs, manufactures, and sells consumer electronics and home appliances. 


Close










Trainline

																				HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Trainline
Trainline

											 
																						HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.thetrainline.com/

Trainline is a leading digital distribution platform for train tickets in the UK. 


Close










Pioneer DJ Corporation

																				HQ: 
											   Kawasaki, Japan											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Pioneer DJ Corporation
Pioneer DJ Corporation

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Kawasaki, Japan											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://pioneerdj.com/

Pioneer DJ develops and markets equipment for disc jockeys, including DJ players, mixers, controllers, headphones, and speakers 


Close










Arbor Pharmaceuticals

																				HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Arbor Pharmaceuticals
Arbor Pharmaceuticals 

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Atlanta, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://arborpharma.com/

Arbor Pharmaceuticals is a specialty pharmaceutical company with a diversified portfolio of branded products across multiple therapeutic areas for the cardiovascular, pediatric, and hospital markets as well as generic products through its Wilshire division. 


Close










Scout24 Schweiz

																				HQ: 
											   Flamatt, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Scout24 Schweiz
Scout24 Schweiz

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Flamatt, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.scout24.ch/

Scout24 Schweiz is the leading online classifieds platform in Switzerland. We are also invested in its sister company Omnimedia, a leading digital marketing agency in Switzerland. Scout24 Schweiz and Omnimedia are two subsidiaries of Ringier, Switzerland’s largest media company and a 180 year-old family owned business. 


Close










Goodpack

																				HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Goodpack
Goodpack

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.goodpack.com/

Goodpack is the largest provider of multi-modal and re-usable intermediate bulk containers (“IBC”) globally with a fleet of 3.2 million IBCs and over 5,000 delivery and collection points. 


Close










BrightView

																				HQ: 
											   Rockville, MD, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



BrightView
BrightView

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Rockville, MD, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

https://www.brightview.com/

BrightView is a leading provider of commercial landscape maintenance and snow removal services in the U.S. 


Close










Savant Systems

																				HQ: 
											   Hyannis, MA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Savant Systems
Savant Systems

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hyannis, MA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

https://www.savant.com/

Savant is a leading provider of automation and control solutions for the connected home, enabling consumers to integrate music, video, lighting, temperature, security, communications and other functionalities into a unified home automation solution. 


Close










Sundrop Farms

																				HQ: 
											   Adelaide, Australia and London, England, Asia-Pacific											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Sundrop Farms
Sundrop Farms

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Adelaide, Australia and London, England, Asia-Pacific											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.sundropfarms.com

Sundrop Farms is a specialized developer and operator of greenhouse installations designed for semi-arid regions which have traditionally been unsuitable for agriculture. The system developed by Sundrop uses solar energy to cool, heat, and power high-tech greenhouse facilities and desalinated seawater for irrigation. 


Close







                                		 World Trade Centre                                		





World Trade Centre

																				HQ: 
											   Melbourne, Australia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



World Trade Centre
World Trade Centre

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Melbourne, Australia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



Towers 2, 3 and 4 of the World Trade Center is a 530,000 square-foot office complex on the edge of the Melbourne central business district, jointly acquired by KKR and Abacus, a listed REIT in Australia. 


Close







                                		 Nevis Shopping Centers                                		





Nevis Shopping Centers

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Nevis Shopping Centers
Nevis Shopping Centers

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



Two retail and leisure parks in Madrid and Zamora 


Close







                                		 K Twin Towers                                		





K Twin Towers

																				HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



K Twin Towers
K Twin Towers

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014



K Twin Towers is a premium-grade commercial property located in the Gwanghwamun precinct within the Seoul central business district.  


Close










National Vision

																				HQ: 
											   Lawrenceville, GA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



National Vision
National Vision

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Lawrenceville, GA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.nationalvision.com/

National Vision is the largest optical retailer in the U.S. focused exclusively on the fast-growing value segment with over 700 retail locations. 


Close










Gland Pharma Limited

																				HQ: 
											   Hyderabad, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Gland Pharma Limited
Gland Pharma Limited

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hyderabad, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.glandpharma.com

Gland Pharma Limited is a leading pure-play developer and manufacturer of generic injectables formulations across a wide spectrum of therapeutic areas and markets its products through partnerships with leading global pharmaceutical companies. 


Close










SBB/Telemach Group

																				HQ: 
											   Belgrade, Serbia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



SBB/Telemach Group
SBB/Telemach Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Belgrade, Serbia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.the-united-group.com/

SBB/Telemach Group is a leading Pay-TV, telephony and broadband operator in South East Europe. 


Close










Ambea AB

																				HQ: 
											   Stockholm, Sweden											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2010



+ Read more



Ambea AB
Ambea AB

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Stockholm, Sweden											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2010

http://www.ambea.com/

Ambea AB is one of the largest healthcare and care providers in the Nordic region, with strong positions in both Sweden and Finland. 


Close










PRA Health Sciences

																				HQ: 
											   Raleigh, NC, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2013



+ Read more



PRA Health Sciences
PRA Health Sciences

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Raleigh, NC, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2013

http://www.prainternational.com

PRA International is a leading contract research organization that performs clinical trials combining therapeutic and operational expertise with local knowledge to serve clients across all phases of drug development. 


Close










Acciona Energia Internacional

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Acciona Energia Internacional
Acciona Energia Internacional

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.acciona-energia.com/

Joint Venture between Acciona S.A. and KKR comprised of 2.3 gigawatts of renewable generating assets spread across 12 countries. 


Close










Channel Control Merchants

																				HQ: 
											   Hattiesburg, MS, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Channel Control Merchants
Channel Control Merchants

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hattiesburg, MS, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.channelcontrolmerchants.com/

Channel Control Merchants is a deep value retailer and wholesaler of opportunistic secondary market inventories, with particular expertise in the purchase and resale of store level inventories. 


Close










Sunner Development

																				HQ: 
											   Nanping, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Sunner Development
Sunner Development

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Nanping, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.sunnercn.com/index.aspx

Sunner Development is China’s leading vertically integrated chicken meat producer. 


Close










Ticket Monster Inc.

																				HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Ticket Monster Inc.
Ticket Monster Inc.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Seoul, Korea											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.ticketmonster.co.kr/home

Ticket Monster (TMON) is a leading mobile-first, e-commerce platform that provides a premium online and mobile shopping experience to customers across South Korea. TMON offers a curated selection of discounted items across the categories of Goods, Local Services, and Travel. 


Close










Uxin

																				HQ: 
											   Wangjing, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Uxin
Uxin

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wangjing, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.uxin.com/

Professional online transaction service provider for used cars. 


Close










Yuehai Feed Group Co. Ltd.

																				HQ: 
											   Zhanjiang, Guangdong, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Yuehai Feed Group Co. Ltd.
Yuehai Feed Group Co. Ltd.

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Zhanjiang, Guangdong, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.yuehaifeed.com/

Aquatic feed company in China focused on providing feed and nutrition solutions for shrimp and seawater fish farming. 


Close










C.H.I. Overhead Doors

																				HQ: 
											   Arthur, IL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



C.H.I. Overhead Doors
C.H.I. Overhead Doors

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Arthur, IL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://chiohd.com/

CHI is a leading manufacturer of built-to-order overhead sectional and rolling steel garage doors. 


Close










Sungard Availability Services

																				HQ: 
											   Wayne, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Sungard Availability Services
Sungard Availability Services

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Wayne, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.sungardas.com

Sungard Availability Services spun-out of Sungard Data Systems in 2014. The company provides a variety of managed IT services, including enterprise cloud, application management, IT consulting, disaster recovery services, and more. 


Close










Japfa Comfeed Tbk

																				HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Japfa Comfeed Tbk
Japfa Comfeed Tbk

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

https://www.japfacomfeed.co.id/en

Poultry feed, day-old chick and processed chicken company in Indonesia. 


Close










Joulon

																				HQ: 
											   Dubai, United Arab Emirates											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Joulon
Joulon

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dubai, United Arab Emirates											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.joulon.com/

Joulon is an integrated platform providing asset management services to the oil and gas industry globally. 


Close










Emerald Media

																				HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Emerald Media
Emerald Media

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Hong Kong, China											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://emeraldmedia.asia/index.html

Emerald Media is a Pan-Asian platform that provides growth capital to media, entertainment and digital media companies and looks to acquire control or significant minority positions in growing public and private media companies. 


Close










Avendus Capital

																				HQ: 
											    Mumbai, India											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Avendus Capital
Avendus Capital

											 
																						HQ: 
											    Mumbai, India											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.avendus.com/india

A leading investment banking franchise in India. 


Close










X-ELIO (fka Gestamp Asetym Solar)

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



X-ELIO (fka Gestamp Asetym Solar)
X-ELIO (fka Gestamp Asetym Solar)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.x-elio.com/

Global developer and operator of solar photovoltaic plants. 


Close










Veresen Midstream LP

																				HQ: 
											   Calgary, Alberta, Canada											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Veresen Midstream LP
Veresen Midstream LP

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Calgary, Alberta, Canada											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://veresenmidstream.com/

Veresen Midstream is a leading independent natural gas gathering and processing business in Western Canada. 


Close










Deutsche Glasfaser

																				HQ: 
											   Borken, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Deutsche Glasfaser
Deutsche Glasfaser

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Borken, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

https://www.deutsche-glasfaser.de/privatkunden/

German based provider of fiber-to-the-home network. 


Close










Renvico Renewable Energy (fka Sorgenia) 

																				HQ: 
											   Maisons-Laffitte, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2011



+ Read more



Renvico Renewable Energy (fka Sorgenia) 
Renvico Renewable Energy (fka Sorgenia)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Maisons-Laffitte, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2011

http://www.renvicoenergy.com/

Renvico Renewable Energy is a leading wind farm owner/operator in France with an operating assets portfolio of 152.6 MW (spread across 15 wind farms) and an authorized assets portfolio of 94.9 MW (spread across nine wind farms). 


Close










Webhelp

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Webhelp
Webhelp

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.webhelp.com/

A leading European player in the Customer Relationship Management Business Process Outsourcing sector. 


Close










Mills Fleet Farm

																				HQ: 
											    Appleton, WI, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Mills Fleet Farm
Mills Fleet Farm

											 
																						HQ: 
											    Appleton, WI, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.fleetfarm.com/

Midwestern, value-based retailer of lifestyle merchandise serving DIY, outdoor, and active families. 


Close










LGC

																				HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



LGC
LGC

											 
																						HQ: 
											   London, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.lgcgroup.com/

Global measurement and testing company for life sciences and other applied end-markets. 


Close










Välinge

																				HQ: 
											    Viken, Sweden											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Välinge
Välinge

											 
																						HQ: 
											    Viken, Sweden											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

https://www.valinge.se/

Swedish R&D company focused on developing innovative solutions for the global wood flooring and furniture industries. 


Close










Mandala Energy

																				HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Mandala Energy
Mandala Energy

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Singapore											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://mandalaenergy.com/

Mandala Energy is a Southeast Asia-focused oil and gas exploration and production company, founded in March 2015. It focuses on assets across diverse fiscal regimes within established plays in Southeast Asia spanning the full cycle of exploration, development and production. 


Close










Air Medical Group Holdings

																				HQ: 
											   Lewisville, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Air Medical Group Holdings
Air Medical Group Holdings

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Lewisville, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015



Air Medical Group Holdings is a leading provider of emergency air medical transportation services to individuals with critical health issues or injuries. 


Close










Go-Jek

																				HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Go-Jek
Go-Jek

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Jakarta, Indonesia											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

https://www.go-jek.com/

Mobile application-based platform in Indonesia that provides a range of services such as ride hailing, food delivery, lifestyle services, and mobile payments. 


Close










Ultimate Fighting Championship

																				HQ: 
											   Las Vegas, Nevada, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Ultimate Fighting Championship
Ultimate Fighting Championship

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Las Vegas, Nevada, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.ufc.com/

The Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC) is the premier mixed martial arts sports brand and the largest pay-per-view event provider in the world. 


Close










PEMEX

																				HQ: 
											   Mexico City, Mexico											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



PEMEX
PEMEX

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Mexico City, Mexico											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.pemex.com/en/Paginas/default.aspx

Strategic oil and gas infrastructure assets. 


Close










Cylance

																				HQ: 
											   Irvine, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Cylance
Cylance

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Irvine, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

https://www.cylance.com/

Next-generation endpoint security platform based on artificial intelligence 


Close










DoubleDutch

																				HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



DoubleDutch
DoubleDutch

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://doubledutch.me

Live engagement marketing solutions for the global events industry 


Close










FanDuel

																				HQ: 
											   New York, NY / Edinburgh, UK, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



FanDuel
FanDuel

											 
																						HQ: 
											   New York, NY / Edinburgh, UK, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

https://www.fanduel.com/

Leading daily fantasy sports company, offering one-day contests across a variety of sports.  


Close










Jitterbit

																				HQ: 
											   2016, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Jitterbit
Jitterbit

											 
																						HQ: 
											   2016, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.jitterbit.com/

Cloud-based data integration platform-as-a-service 


Close










Magic Leap

																				HQ: 
											   Dania, FL, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Magic Leap
Magic Leap

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Dania, FL, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.magicleap.com

Developer of augmented reality devices and ecosystem 


Close










Starry

																				HQ: 
											   Boston, MA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Starry
Starry

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Boston, MA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.starry.com

Produces Wi-Fi routers and offers wireless Internet service delivered via high-frequency millimeter wave technology 


Close










Texture

																				HQ: 
											   Menlo Park, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Texture
Texture

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Menlo Park, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.texture.com 

Mobile application that provides unlimited access to premium magazine content 


Close










Transphorm

																				HQ: 
											   Goleta, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Transphorm
Transphorm

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Goleta, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.transphormusa.com

Global semiconductor company that develops gallium nitride (GaN) FETs for high-voltage power conversion applications.  


Close










Clicktale

																				HQ: 
											   Tel Aviv, Israel											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Clicktale
Clicktale

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Tel Aviv, Israel											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.clicktale.com

Customer experience analytics software to optimize a user's online journey. 


Close










Arago

																				HQ: 
											   Frankfurt, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Arago
Arago

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Frankfurt, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.arago.co

IT automation solutions based on artificial intelligence and machine learning capabilities. 


Close










Optimal+

																				HQ: 
											   Holon, Israel											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Optimal+
Optimal+

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Holon, Israel											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.optimalplus.com

Big data-enabled business intelligence software for the semi & electronics industries. 


Close










GetYourGuide

																				HQ: 
											   Berlin, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



GetYourGuide
GetYourGuide

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Berlin, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.getyourguide.com

Online marketplace for discovering and booking travel tours and activities. 


Close










Darktrace

																				HQ: 
											   Cambridge, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Darktrace
Darktrace

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Cambridge, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.darktrace.com

Machine learning enabled cyber-security solutions for network security and advanced threat detection. 


Close










SoftwareONE

																				HQ: 
											   Zurich, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



SoftwareONE
SoftwareONE

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Zurich, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.softwareone.com

SoftwareONE is a leading provider of Software Portfolio Management (SPM) including software licensing, software asset management, technology consulting and cloud services to more than 12,000 corporate customers in 115 countries. 


Close










Selecta

																				HQ: 
											   Cham, Switzerland											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Selecta
Selecta

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Cham, Switzerland											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.selecta.com/

Selecta is a leading European vending machine operator and office coffee service provider. The company has over 4,000 employees, serving 5 million consumers every day through 150,000 point-of-sales. 


Close










Ursa

																				HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Ursa
Ursa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Madrid, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://www.ursa.com/

URSA is a leading provider of insulation solutions in Europe, with activity focused on mineral wool and extruded polystyrene (XPS). The company operates 13 production facilities in 8 countries, and has a commercial presence in over 40 markets. 


Close










Hilding Anders

																				HQ: 
											   Malmo, Sweden											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Hilding Anders
Hilding Anders

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Malmo, Sweden											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.hildinganders.com/

Hilding Anders is Europe’s, Russia’s and Asia’s leading provider of beds and mattresses. The company is based in Malmö, Sweden and offers a broad branded portfolio as well as producing private label for retailers. The Group operates close to 1,200 retail outlets in Russia, China and Croatia. 


Close










Winoa

																				HQ: 
											   Le Cheylas, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Winoa
Winoa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Le Cheylas, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

https://www.winoagroup.com/

Winoa is the global leader in the steel abrasives industry. The company operates 11 factories and services over 10,000 customers worldwide. 


Close










Cementos Balboa

																				HQ: 
											   Alconera, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Cementos Balboa
Cementos Balboa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Alconera, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.grupoag.es/cementosbalboa

Cementos Balboa is the only cement plant located in the Extremadura region in Spain with a state-of-the-art facility finalised in 2005. 


Close










Papresa

																				HQ: 
											   Errenteria, Spain											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2014



+ Read more



Papresa
Papresa

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Errenteria, Spain											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2014

http://www.papresa.es/

Papresa is a 100% recycled newsprint business. It operates one plant in Errenteria (Spain) with a production capacity of 375,000 tonnes per year through 3 paper machines. 


Close










Energas

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2015



+ Read more



Energas
Energas

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2015

http://pontsursambre-power.com/en/

Energas is comprised of two combined cycle power plants in France, Pont sur Sambre Power & Toul Power. It operates 825 MW of combined capacity, equivalent to the consumption of 800,000 households. 


Close










Cherwell Software

																				HQ: 
											   Colorado Springs, CO, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Cherwell Software
Cherwell Software

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Colorado Springs, CO, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.cherwell.com/

Service management platform which enables customers to track, manage, and automate a variety of service requests. 


Close










Hensoldt (fka Airbus Defence Electronics)

																				HQ: 
											   Taufkirchen, Germany											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Hensoldt (fka Airbus Defence Electronics)
Hensoldt (fka Airbus Defence Electronics)

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Taufkirchen, Germany											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.hensoldt.net/

Global provider of mission-critical sensors, integrated systems and services for defence and security applications 


Close










Optiv

																				HQ: 
											   Denver, CO, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Optiv
Optiv

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Denver, CO, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.optiv.com/

Optiv is a market-leading provider of end-to-end cyber security solutions. 


Close










Calabrio

																				HQ: 
											   Minneapolis, MN, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Calabrio
Calabrio

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Minneapolis, MN, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://calabrio.com/

Calabrio provides a leading, extensible workforce optimization software platform to over 4,000 customers worldwide. 


Close










Epicor

																				HQ: 
											   Austin, TX, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2016



+ Read more



Epicor
Epicor

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Austin, TX, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2016

http://www.epicor.com

Epicor software provides enterprise resource planning (ERP) software and retail solutions to 20,000 customers in over 150 countries. 


Close










Lyft

																				HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Lyft
Lyft

											 
																						HQ: 
											   San Francisco, CA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.lyft.com/

Lyft is a leading ride-sharing platform in the U.S. Lyft enables peer-to-peer transportation by matching passengers with nearby drivers through on-demand or pre-scheduled rides. 


Close










Ivalua

																				HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Ivalua
Ivalua

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Paris, France											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.ivalua.com/

Enterprise spend management software focused on strategic sourcing, contract management, procure-to-pay and supplier relationship management 


Close










Masan Nutri-Science

																				HQ: 
											   Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Masan Nutri-Science
Masan Nutri-Science

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.masangroup.com/

Vietnamese animal feed producer which also holds a minority interest in a leading branded pork meat company. The business is focused on building out a fully integrated pork value chain across feed, farm and consumer meat. 


Close










Apple Leisure Group

																				HQ: 
											   Newtown Square, PA, United States											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Apple Leisure Group
Apple Leisure Group

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Newtown Square, PA, United States											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.appleleisuregroup.com

Apple Leisure Group is a vertically-integrated travel and hospitality company focused on packaged travel and resort/brand management in Mexico and the Caribbean. 


Close










Calvin Capital

																				HQ: 
											   Manchester, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Calvin Capital
Calvin Capital

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Manchester, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

http://www.calvincapital.com/

Calvin Capital is a leading provider of gas and electricity meters to energy suppliers in the UK. 


Close










Travelopia

																				HQ: 
											   Crawley, United Kingdom											   
																				Year of Investment: 									  2017



+ Read more



Travelopia
Travelopia

											 
																						HQ: 
											   Crawley, United Kingdom											   
											   
                                              Year of Investment: 											  2017

https://www.travelopia.com/

Travelopia is a leading specialist travel group focused on providing customers with unforgettable travel-related experiences. 


Close




                        Nothing Found Matching Your Criteria...                    


The portfolio companies shown represent substantially all of KKR’s private equity, TMT growth, infrastructure and energy portfolio companies as of March 31, 2017. Certain portfolio companies have been excluded as private market transactions or investments in which KKR only holds residual interests. In addition, the portfolio companies shown include special situations portfolio companies, where funds and vehicles of KKR hold at least 50% of the portfolio company’s equity or KKR has majority representation on the portfolio company’s board. The specific portfolio companies identified are not representative of all of the portfolio companies purchased, sold, or recommended for KKR Funds and it should not be assumed that the investment in the portfolio companies identified was or will be profitable. Actual holdings will vary for each KKR Fund and there is no guarantee that a particular KKR Fund will hold any or all of the portfolio companies listed. For a full list of KKR’s private market investments, please click here 




  









 


KKR & Co. L.P. - Investor Relations




























































  





 Toggle navigation      MENU 


















 
















KKR Financial Holdings


  Navigation 


Overview
Corporate Governance
Events & Presentations
Distribution History
Email Alerts
FAQs
K-1 & Tax Information
Press Releases
SEC Filings
   ARCHIVE  
Annual Reports
Earnings Releases



 Briefcase
 RSS Feeds
 Email Alerts












	KKR Financial Holdings LLC (“KFN”) is a subsidiary of KKR. Prior to being acquired by KKR on April 30, 2014, KFN common shares were publicly listed on the New York Stock Exchange.

	KFN’s other securities remain outstanding, namely its 7.375% Series A LLC Preferred Shares (NYSE:KFN.PR),  7.500% Senior Notes due 2042 (NYSE:KFI), and junior subordinated notes. On April 7, 2017, KFN announced that it will redeem all of its outstanding 7.500% Senior Notes due 2042 on April 24, 2017 in accordance with the optional redemption provisions provided in the documents governing the notes. For additional information regarding the redemption, please see the Company’s press release, dated April 7, 2017, in the Press Releases section of this website.




 
CONTACT INFORMATION




	Investor Relations


    KKR Financial Holdings LLC
    555 California Street, 50th Floor
    San Francisco, CA 94104
    United States
    Telephone: 877.610.4910
    Outside US: +1.212.230.9410
    Facsimile: +1.212.750.0003



	Preferred Share Transfer Agent

	American Stock Transfer &
	Trust Company, LLC
	6201 15th Avenue
	Brooklyn, NY 11219
	United States
	Telephone: 800.937.5449
	Website: www.amstock.com













×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






 
























KKR




































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 

















Toggle navigation





MENU
































 







Mid-year Update: Five Areas of Focus
READ MORE >
Henry H. McVey discusses five areas that he believes can help drive both absolute and relative outperformance that focus on potential macro disconnects, or financial arbitrages, where investor expectations appear offsides relative to the upside potential.






Blog
Safeguarding the Enterprise with Darktrace





Blog
Digital Switzerland





Unitholder Letter
KKR Releases 2016 Unitholder Letter














SPOTLIGHT



Jul 13, 2017
KKR Awarded Best International Firm
The 10th Annual Spanish Venture Capital & Private Equity Awards, organized by The Spanish Private Equity Association (ASCRI), Deloitte and IESE Business School, were celebrated in Madrid, Spain on July 5, 2017.




Twitter

07/28/2017
                                                      RT @ovh_uk: Happy #SysAdminDay, a time to remember what life would be like without them and why we need them...https://t.co/G5AKrNISHJ                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      Coming soon to @PEREonline: A closer look at KKR’s #RealEstate business via @Evelyn_PERE https://t.co/8E2ORCanI9                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      We continue 2 be inspired by @GoDaddy's commitment 2 #WomenInTech, including our joint partnership w/ @GirlsWhoCode… https://t.co/nV3mCxbWJ6                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      Think #Technology is taking over? Hear what #HenryMcVey has to say about it in his latest report:… https://t.co/nmEfxRPC6C                                                        


Go to Media Center >












Firm History
Learn More About KKR’s History 





Leadership
Meet KKR’s Leadership 





Milestone
Celebrating 40 Years of Partnership 











×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






  








 


KKR & Co. L.P. - Investor Relations




























































  





 Toggle navigation      MENU 


















 
















KKR & Co. L.P.


  Navigation 


Overview
Analyst Coverage
Annual Reports
Corporate Governance
Distribution History
Earnings Releases
Email Alerts
Events & Presentations
FAQs
K-1 & Tax Information
Press Releases
SEC Filings



 Briefcase
 RSS Feeds
 Email Alerts









 
Stock Quote






 KKR (NYSE) 19.30 




                        Change: 0.05 




                        Volume: 2,884,777




Open 19.26
Previous Close 19.25


Day High 19.41
Day Low 18.86


52-Week High 20.34
52-Week Low 13.58










 KKR PRA (NYSE) 27.49 




                        Change: 0.02 




                        Volume: 9,293




Open 27.46
Previous Close 27.47


Day High 27.49
Day Low 27.40


52-Week High 27.63
52-Week Low 25.12





 KKR PRB (NYSE) 26.91 




                        Change: 0.11 




                        Volume: 20,398




Open 26.92
Previous Close 26.80


Day High 26.92
Day Low 26.74


52-Week High 27.22
52-Week Low 24.16





 07.28.2017    3:49 PM ET
Quotes delayed at least 20 minutes. Information provided by eSignal. Financial data in US dollars.








 
CONTACT INFORMATION




	Investor Relations

	KKR & Co. L.P.
	9 West 57th Street, Suite 4200
	New York, New York 10019
	United States

	Craig Larson
	Telephone: 877.610.4910
	Outside US: +1.212.230.9410
	Facsimile:+1.212.750.0003
	Email: Investor-Relations@kkr.com



	Stock Transfer Agent

	American Stock Transfer &
	Trust Company, LLC
	6201 15th Avenue
	Brooklyn, NY 11219
	United States
	Telephone: 800.937.5449
	Website: www.amstock.com


KKR & Co. L.P. Tax Package Support
Within North America:(800) 973-7631
Outside North America:(972) 248-5396


Depositary Bank
The Bank of New York
              101 Barclay Street, 22 West
              New York, New York 10286
              United States
              Attention: KKR & Co. L.P.
              Telephone: +1.212.815.3982
              Facsimile:+1.212.571.3050 













×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






 
























KKR




































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 

















Toggle navigation





MENU
































 







Mid-year Update: Five Areas of Focus
READ MORE >
Henry H. McVey discusses five areas that he believes can help drive both absolute and relative outperformance that focus on potential macro disconnects, or financial arbitrages, where investor expectations appear offsides relative to the upside potential.






Blog
Safeguarding the Enterprise with Darktrace





Blog
Digital Switzerland





Unitholder Letter
KKR Releases 2016 Unitholder Letter














SPOTLIGHT



Jul 13, 2017
KKR Awarded Best International Firm
The 10th Annual Spanish Venture Capital & Private Equity Awards, organized by The Spanish Private Equity Association (ASCRI), Deloitte and IESE Business School, were celebrated in Madrid, Spain on July 5, 2017.




Twitter

07/28/2017
                                                      RT @ovh_uk: Happy #SysAdminDay, a time to remember what life would be like without them and why we need them...https://t.co/G5AKrNISHJ                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      Coming soon to @PEREonline: A closer look at KKR’s #RealEstate business via @Evelyn_PERE https://t.co/8E2ORCanI9                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      We continue 2 be inspired by @GoDaddy's commitment 2 #WomenInTech, including our joint partnership w/ @GirlsWhoCode… https://t.co/nV3mCxbWJ6                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      Think #Technology is taking over? Hear what #HenryMcVey has to say about it in his latest report:… https://t.co/nmEfxRPC6C                                                        


Go to Media Center >












Firm History
Learn More About KKR’s History 





Leadership
Meet KKR’s Leadership 





Milestone
Celebrating 40 Years of Partnership 











×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






  












Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.





























Team | KKR





































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 
















Toggle navigation





MENU












































×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK








Team



 
Team
As of March 31, 2017, KKR has a team of approximately 1,250 employees, consultants, and senior advisors, including approximately 390 investment professionals working across 16 industries in offices around the world. 




				Search Toggle				




View Toggle 



Senior Advisors


ALL TEAM





Search Team 













Filter 



All Groups


All Groups
Business Operations
Capital Markets
Client and Partner Group
Credit
Customized Portfolio Solutions
Energy & Infrastructure

Executive Officers
Global Macro & Asset Allocation
Global Risk Strategies
Investor Relations
KKR Capstone
KKR Global Institute
Principal Activities
Private Equity
Public Policy and Affairs
Real Estate






All Sub Groups


All Sub Groups
Finance
Human Resources
Information Technology
Legal
Energy Real Assets
Energy Private Equity
Global Macro & Asset Allocation
Balance Sheet
Corporate Development
Services
Retail
Media and Telecom
Infrastructure
Technology
Industrials
Financial Services
Energy
Consumer Products
Asia
Health Care
Hospitality & Leisure






All Titles


All Titles

													Co-Chairman


													Co-President


													Member


													Managing Director


													Director


													Principal



													Senior Advisor


													Associate


													Analyst


													Uncategorized






All Locations


All Locations
Beijing
Dubai
Dublin
Hong Kong
Houston
London
Louisville
Luxembourg
Madrid
Menlo Park
Mumbai
New York
Paris
Riyadh
San Francisco
Seoul
Singapore
Sydney
São Paulo
Tokyo





LIST


THUMBS









											Clear ALL										











As of March 31, 2017, KKR has a team of approximately 1,250 employees, consultants, and senior advisors, including approximately 390 investment professionals working across 16 industries in offices around the world. 


1
Sub Group











Featured Team Members








										Stanley Ho										
											Managing Director, Client and Partner Group
											Hong Kong										


																					+ Learn More																			







										Paul Wasserman										
											Director, Real Estate
											Houston										


 Watch Video																			















										David H. Petraeus										
											Member, Chairman of the KKR Global Institute
											New York										


 Watch Video																			













										Cedric Lucas										
											Director, Energy & Infrastructure
											Menlo Park										


																					+ Learn More																			









										Abhishek Kapur										
											Director, KKR Capstone
											Singapore										


																					+ Learn More																			













										Chris Lee										
											Member, Co-Head Real Estate Credit
											New York										


 Watch Video																			












						Nothing Found Matching Your Criteria...					

























					Loading Team Data..					








  



























KKR & Co. (@KKR_Co) | Twitter



























Skip to content









Home
Home
Home, current page.






Moments
Moments
Moments, current page.






Search query



Search Twitter









Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @




















Language: English 



 



Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
English UK
Español
Filipino
Français
Hrvatski
Italiano
Magyar
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português
Română
Slovenčina
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
Ελληνικά
Български език
Русский
Српски
Українська мова
עִבְרִית
العربية
فارسی
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
ಕನ್ನಡ
ภาษาไทย
한국어
日本語
简体中文
繁體中文




 








Have an account?  Log in


   

Have an account?










Remember me

·
Forgot password?











New to Twitter?
Sign up
                











































      KKR & Co.



@KKR_Co












Tweets
Tweets, current page.
1,813
            



Following
Following
453



Followers
Followers
10.2K



Likes
Likes
230

 
 
More 







Likes






Unmute @KKR_Co

Mute @KKR_Co



Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  






















KKR & Co.



@KKR_Co


A leading global investment firm







 
    kkr.com
  




Joined August 2012












                
                393 Photos and videos
            

            Photos and videos
          



















Tweets


Tweets
Tweets, current page.



                  Tweets & replies
                



                  Media
                





You blocked @KKR_Co
Are you sure you want to view these Tweets? Viewing Tweets won't unblock @KKR_Co
Yes, view profile






Close




            
            KKR & Co. followed
        





















Pinned Tweet







KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 17






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







KKR appoints Joe Bae and Scott Nuttall as Co-Presidents and Co-Chief Operating Officers. Learn more: http://on.kkr.com/r8TI30dGGcw pic.twitter.com/837OCuumEo
















1 reply




5 retweets




13 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


5




Retweeted


5








Like


13





Liked


13










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










KKR & Co. Retweeted
            







OVH UK‏Verified account @ovh_uk

20h20 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Happy #SysAdminDay, a time to remember what life would be like without them and why we need them...https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CYTv_pzP52M …









0 replies




15 retweets




13 likes








Reply










Retweet


15




Retweeted


15








Like


13





Liked


13










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

17h17 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Coming soon to @PEREonline: A closer look at KKR’s #RealEstate business via @Evelyn_PEREpic.twitter.com/8E2ORCanI9
















0 replies




0 retweets




4 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


4





Liked


4










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

18h18 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






KKR & Co. Retweeted The New York Times

We continue 2 be inspired by @GoDaddy's commitment 2 #WomenInTech, including our joint partnership w/ @GirlsWhoCode! http://on.kkr.com/5dbn30bmjTg https://twitter.com/nytimes/status/889379388424413184 …

KKR & Co. added,








The New York TimesVerified account @nytimes

How an internet business built on salacious TV ads became a surprising lodestar among gender equity advocates http://nyti.ms/2uonfKw 









0 replies




2 retweets




3 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


3





Liked


3










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

20h20 hours ago






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Think #Technology is taking over? Hear what #HenryMcVey has to say about it in his latest report: http://on.kkr.com/DTlq30dDeEF pic.twitter.com/I3UBwBGNjg
















1 reply




0 retweets




4 likes








Reply


1







Retweet







Retweeted











Like


4





Liked


4










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 27






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Missed our Q2 2017 Earnings Conference Call? Find the replay here: http://on.kkr.com/xqN130dXHTF  $KKR





0 replies




1 retweet




4 likes








Reply










Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


4





Liked


4










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 27






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







KKR announces Q2 2017 earnings results. View the release here: http://on.kkr.com/Qkrv30dX7Pk  $KKR





0 replies




0 retweets




8 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


8





Liked


8










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










KKR & Co. Retweeted
            







EY EOY‏Verified account @EY_EOY

Jul 26






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Where is the growth? Recap session from #WEOY http://spr.ly/60188qu0g  @karagoldin @HerbEngert @linamarcorp @KKR_Copic.twitter.com/9mxIjUVzRq
















1 reply




4 retweets




7 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


4




Retweeted


4








Like


7





Liked


7










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






KKR & Co. Retweeted Erik Schatzker

WATCH: #HenryMcVey’s full interview with @BloombergTV’s @ErikSchatzker here: http://on.kkr.com/1d8i30dUvzI https://twitter.com/ErikSchatzker/status/889925434674229249 …

KKR & Co. added,

















Erik SchatzkerVerified account @ErikSchatzker

"China has already had its crash," says @KKR_Co's Henry McVey. Watch for more macro insights and surprises https://www.bloomberg.com/news/videos/2017-07-25/kkr-s-mcvey-on-china-europe-and-a-u-s-recession-video … pic.twitter.com/jKgKWRA8Ji









0 replies




1 retweet




5 likes








Reply










Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


5





Liked


5










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










KKR & Co. Retweeted
            







AICouncil‏ @AmericaInvests

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Our latest "AIC Insights" features @JamesAMaloney on the ways private capital can help overhaul U.S. #infrastructurehttp://bit.ly/2v54BsR 









0 replies




6 retweets




4 likes








Reply










Retweet


6




Retweeted


6








Like


4





Liked


4










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Today we made our commitment to advancing workplace #diversity and inclusion even clearer. See how: http://CEOAction.com  #CEOActionpic.twitter.com/QNrXNS20qK
















0 replies




2 retweets




6 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


6





Liked


6










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







#ICYMI KKR’s #HenryMcVey tells @ErikSchatzker #China has already had its “crash.” Hear more:http://on.kkr.com/zIQZ30dTsSi 









1 reply




3 retweets




3 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


3




Retweeted


3








Like


3





Liked


3










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 25






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Tune in to @BloombergTV ~7:30am ET to hear KKR’s #HenryMcVey talk w/ @ErikSchatzker about his midyear report http://on.kkr.com/DTlq30dDeEF 





0 replies




0 retweets




3 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


3





Liked


3










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 24






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet






KKR & Co. Retweeted GoDaddy

Proud of KKR portfolio company @GoDaddy for taking important steps toward bettering workplace #diversity & inclusion, in tech and beyond!https://twitter.com/GoDaddy/status/889545733086511104 …

KKR & Co. added,








GoDaddyVerified account @GoDaddy

The @NYTimes discusses the important work of becoming the most inclusive company in tech. 
http://gddy.social/60128sX8n 









0 replies




1 retweet




7 likes








Reply










Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


7





Liked


7










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 24






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Find out what  #HenryMcVey says about emerging markets vs. developed markets in his midyear report: http://on.kkr.com/DTlq30dDeEF pic.twitter.com/4nIhXm70u9























0 replies




2 retweets




5 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


5





Liked


5










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










KKR & Co. Retweeted
            







Lyft‏Verified account @lyft

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Early leadership lessons from Lyft co-founder @johnzimmer? "Empathy is the most important trait for a manager:" http://lft.to/2tnQ9HN pic.twitter.com/ZHhFLVbpwz
















15 replies




27 retweets




69 likes








Reply


15







Retweet


27




Retweeted


27








Like


69





Liked


69










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 24






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







KKR portfolio company @INETtweets to acquire @WebMD, the leading online source of health information. Learn more:  http://on.kkr.com/q4lZ30dRzVQ pic.twitter.com/bQzTw1tIiV
















0 replies




5 retweets




11 likes








Reply










Retweet


5




Retweeted


5








Like


11





Liked


11










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 24






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







KKR to acquire majority control of @NaturesBounty, a global market leader in wellness products, from @OneCarlyle: http://on.kkr.com/LLWH30dRygd pic.twitter.com/lsAEW0VXTQ
















0 replies




3 retweets




9 likes








Reply










Retweet


3




Retweeted


3








Like


9





Liked


9










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













KKR & Co.‏ @KKR_Co

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Looking for gift ideas? KKR’s #HenryMcVey finds consumers prefer spending on experiences over things http://on.kkr.com/DTlq30dDeEF pic.twitter.com/IQbQs9G9xh























0 replies




2 retweets




5 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


5





Liked


5










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










KKR & Co. Retweeted
            







Darktrace‏ @Darktrace

Jul 21






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Read how a fish tank was #hacked and more #cyberthreat stories from our 2017 Threat Report in the @washingtonposthttps://www.washingtonpost.com/news/innovations/wp/2017/07/21/how-a-fish-tank-helped-hack-a-casino/?utm_term=.9ebfec21265e …









0 replies




12 retweets




9 likes








Reply










Retweet


12




Retweeted


12








Like


9





Liked


9










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










KKR & Co. Retweeted
            







Team GoDaddy‏ @GoDaddyLife

Jul 20






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







It's a tricky thing #worklifebalance. We do what we can to help working parents succeed! Thanks @BestCompaniesAZ!https://bestcompaniesaz.com/the-best-workplaces-for-working-parents/ …









0 replies




2 retweets




3 likes








Reply










Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


3





Liked


3










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo












          @KKR_Co hasn't Tweeted yet.
      
Back to top ↑












Loading seems to be taking a while.

      Twitter may be over capacity or experiencing a momentary hiccup. Try again or visit Twitter Status for more information.
    

















      New to Twitter?
    


    Sign up now to get your own personalized timeline!
  

Sign up




You may also like
    ·
    Refresh








false












© 2017 Twitter
About
Help Center
Terms
Privacy policy
Cookies
Ads info




















Close




            
            Choose a trend location
          






















Dismiss











Close







            Previous
          







            Next
          













Close



Go to a person's profile












Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @


























Close



Promote this Tweet

















Close



Block






Cancel
Block












Add a location to your Tweets

        When you tweet with a location, Twitter stores that location. 
        You can switch location on/off before each Tweet and always have the option to delete your location history.
        Learn more


Turn location on
Not now


























Close



Share Location















Results from 



Send









Close



Your lists













Close



Create a new list




List name




Description

Under 100 characters, optional



Privacy



Public · Anyone can follow this list
      


Private · Only you can access this list
      




Save list











Close
























Close



Copy link to Tweet




Here's the URL for this Tweet. Copy it to easily share with friends.












Close



Embed this Tweet
Embed this Video



Add this Tweet to your website by copying the code below. Learn more
Add this video to your website by copying the code below. Learn more




Hmm, there was a problem reaching the server. Try again?






            Include parent Tweet
          




            Include media
          




By embedding Twitter content in your website or app, you are agreeing to the Twitter Developer Agreement and Developer Policy.
Preview












Close



Why you're seeing this ad
















Close



Log in to Twitter
















Remember me

·
Forgot password?












        Don't have an account? Sign up »









Close



Sign up for Twitter





Not on Twitter? Sign up, tune into the things you care about, and get updates as they happen.


Sign up




        Have an account? Log in »









Close



Two-way (sending and receiving) short codes:





Country
Code
For customers of




United States
40404
(any)


Canada
21212
(any)


United Kingdom
86444
Vodafone, Orange, 3, O2


Brazil
40404
Nextel, TIM


Haiti
40404
Digicel, Voila


Ireland
51210
Vodafone, O2


India
53000
Bharti Airtel, Videocon, Reliance


Indonesia
89887
AXIS, 3, Telkomsel, Indosat, XL Axiata


Italy
4880804
Wind


3424486444
Vodafone





        » See SMS short codes for other countries













Close



Confirmation



















Close



 
















Close














            Skip all
          




    Welcome home!
  
This timeline is where you’ll spend most of your time, getting instant updates about what matters to you.




    Tweets not working for you?
  

    Hover over the profile pic and click the Following button to unfollow any account.
  




    Say a lot with a little
  

    When you see a Tweet you love, tap the heart — it lets  the person who wrote it know you shared the love.
  




    Spread the word
  

    The fastest way to share someone else’s Tweet with your followers is with a Retweet. Tap the icon to send it instantly.
  




    Join the conversation
  

    Add your thoughts about any Tweet with a Reply. Find a topic you’re passionate about, and jump right in.
  




    Learn the latest
  

    Get instant insight into what people are talking about now.
  




    Get more of what you love
  

    Follow more accounts to get instant updates about topics you care about.
  




    Find what's happening
  

    See the latest conversations about any topic instantly.
  




    Never miss a Moment
  

    Catch up instantly on the best stories happening as they unfold.
  



Back
Next














Next Tweet from user
























KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE:KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations and Financial Condition | 4-Traders















































































 




Log in






E-mail



Password







Remember




Forgot password ?









Become a member for free
Sign up





Sign up




New memberSign up for FREE


New customerDiscover our portfolios












 United States
 United Kingdom
 France
 Deutschland
 Schweiz (DE)
 Suisse (FR)










Settings

            Dynamic quotes 


OFFON








 








Markets
Equities
North AmericaEuropeAsiaOceaniaMiddle East» More Equities

Indexes
DOW JONESS&P 500NASDAQ 100TSX COMPFTSE 100» More Indexes

Currency / Forex
EUR / USDGBP / USDUSD / JPYUSD / CADAUD / USD» More Currencies

Commodities
GOLDCrude Oil (WTI)Crude Oil (BRENT)SILVERPLATINUM» More Commodities


 News
Latest News
CompaniesMarketsEconomyCurrency / ForexCommoditiesInterest RatesBusiness LeadersFinancial calendarEconomic calendar

Listed company
Analyst reco.RumorsIPOsCapital Markets TransactionsNew ContractsProfits warningsAppointmentsPress ReleasesEventsCorporate actions

Sector News
EnergyBasic MaterialsIndustrialsConsumer CyclicalConsumer Non-CyclicalFinancialsHealthcareTechnologyTelecommunications ServicesUtilities


 Analysis
All AnalysisCommentariesIndex AnalysisStock Trading StrategiesCommodity AnalysisForex Analysis

 Stock Picks
All stock picks

 Portfolios
My Portfolio
Virtual portfolios
4-Traders Portfolios
European PortfolioUSA PortfolioAsian Portfolio


 Screeners
Market Screener HomeFundamental Analyse
Top Investor RatingTop Trading RatingTop ConsensusGrowth stocksYield stocksLow valuations

Technical Analysis
Oversold stocksOverbought stocksClose to resistancesClose to supportsAccumulation phaseMost volatile stocks


 Watchlists
My Watchlists
Watchlists
Top Lists
Yield stocksGrowth stocksUndervalued Stocks


 Top / Flop
Top News
Most Read NewsHot News

Top Fundamentals
Top CapitalizationTop YieldTop PERTop ConsensusTop Fundamentals

Top Technicals
Top RSIUnusual volumesTop GapsTop STIM

Top Movers
Top USATop CanadaTop U.K.Top GermanyTop EuropeTop Asia


 Tools
Market ScreenerDynamic chartFinancial calendarEconomic calendarSector researchCurrency converter

 Our Services
Premium AccessDiscover our Services

 



















 







4-Traders Homepage  >  Equities  >  Nyse  >  KKR Financial Holdings LLC    KFI.CL










     KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (KFI.CL)     


Add to my list    

Mes dernières consult.Most popular
Manage my lists

















 







No quotes available

--
USD
 
0.00%










07/27 KKR FINANCIAL H : KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations and Fin..


04/27 KKR FINANCIAL H : KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations and Fin..


04/07 KKR FINANCIAL H : KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Other Events

 







SummaryQuotesNewsCalendarCompanyFinancials News SummaryMost relevantAll newsSector newsTweets


















 




KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE:KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations and Financial Condition



































0






07/27/2017 | 12:13pm CEST 


Send by mail :
Last Name :
Name :
From* :
To* :
(You can enter multiple email addresses separated by commas)
Message :
*Required fields





KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE:KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations and Financial ConditionItem 2.02Results of Operations and Financial Condition
On July 27, 2017, KKR & Co. L.P. (“KKR”) issued an earnings release announcing its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2017. While the release may contain certain information regarding KKR Financial Holdings LLC (“KFN”), KFN will be separately reporting its financial results for the quarter ended June 30, 2017 in its quarterly report on Form 10-Q.
The earnings release is furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Report.
As provided in General Instruction B.2 of Form8-K, the information in this Item 2.02 and the exhibit furnished by this Form8-K shall not be deemed to be “filed” for purposes of Section18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, nor shall they be deemed to be incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, except as shall be expressly set forth by specific reference in such a filing.
Item 2.02Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits 



Exhibit No.


Description


Exhibit 99.1


Earnings release of KKR & Co. L.P., dated July 27, 2017, announcing its results for the quarter ended June 30, 2017 (This exhibit is furnished and not filed)



KKR Financial Holdings LLC  ExhibitEX-99.1 2 q217earningsrelease.htm EXHIBIT 99.1 	 		 		 		Exhibit 	 	 KKR & Co. L.P. Reports Second Quarter 2017 Results_________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________NEW YORK,…To view the full exhibit click here
The post KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE:KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations and Financial Condition appeared first on Market Exclusive.© Market Exclusive 2017, source Market Exclusive




















































0






 






Latest news on KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC




07/27 KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE : KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations an..

07/27 KKR & CO. L.P. : Results of Operations and Financial Condition, Financial Statem..

04/27 KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE : KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Results of Operations an..

04/20 KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC : Announces Redemption of all Outstanding 7.500% Seni..

04/07 KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC : Other Events, Financial Statements and Exhibits (fo..

04/07 KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE : KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Other Events

04/06 KKR L P : Announces Release of 2016 Schedule K-1 Tax Forms for & Co. L.P. and Fi..

04/03 KKR FINANCIAL LLC : Backs Masan Group to be Vietnam's Future Consumer Champion

03/30 KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC (NYSE : KFH.CL) Files An 8-K Creation of a Direct Fin..

03/30 KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC : Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obl..



More news

 







 





Income Statement Evolution
Please enable JavaScript in your browser's settings to use dynamic charts. 
More Financials
 





Managers
 





 NameTitleWilliam Joseph Janetschek
Director
Jeffrey Brian van Horn
Chief Financial Officer
Richard J. Kreider
Director
John P. McGlinchey
Director
Jonathan D. Thomas
Director
 
More about the company


Sector and Competitors


1st jan.Capitalization (M$)

KKR FINANCIAL HOLDINGS LLC-0.79%0





RURAL ELECTRIFICATION CORPORATION LTD.41.34%5 403

POWER FINANCE CORPORATION LIMITED0.90%5 082

L&T FINANCE HOLDINGS LTD88.99%4 842

MITSUBISHI UFJ LEASE & FINANCE CO LTD-2.64%4 766

FAR EAST HORIZON LTD0.30%3 342


More Results
 




 



























4-traders.com :MarketsNewsAnalysisStock PicksPortfoliosScreenersWatchlistsTop / FlopToolsOur ServicesAbout :Surperformance SASContact usAdvertiseLegal informationsAbout usStay Connected :FacebookTwitterPartners :Börse: Aktien, Kurse und NachrichtenBest tweets 




   Copyright © 2017 Surperformance. All rights reserved.  









 


  














Slave











KKR




































Languages


EnglishChinese 简体中文Japanese 日本語Korean 한국어










 

















Toggle navigation





MENU
































 







Mid-year Update: Five Areas of Focus
READ MORE >
Henry H. McVey discusses five areas that he believes can help drive both absolute and relative outperformance that focus on potential macro disconnects, or financial arbitrages, where investor expectations appear offsides relative to the upside potential.






Blog
Safeguarding the Enterprise with Darktrace





Blog
Digital Switzerland





Unitholder Letter
KKR Releases 2016 Unitholder Letter














SPOTLIGHT



Jul 13, 2017
KKR Awarded Best International Firm
The 10th Annual Spanish Venture Capital & Private Equity Awards, organized by The Spanish Private Equity Association (ASCRI), Deloitte and IESE Business School, were celebrated in Madrid, Spain on July 5, 2017.




Twitter

07/28/2017
                                                      RT @ovh_uk: Happy #SysAdminDay, a time to remember what life would be like without them and why we need them...https://t.co/G5AKrNISHJ                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      Coming soon to @PEREonline: A closer look at KKR’s #RealEstate business via @Evelyn_PERE https://t.co/8E2ORCanI9                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      We continue 2 be inspired by @GoDaddy's commitment 2 #WomenInTech, including our joint partnership w/ @GirlsWhoCode… https://t.co/nV3mCxbWJ6                                                        
07/28/2017
                                                      Think #Technology is taking over? Hear what #HenryMcVey has to say about it in his latest report:… https://t.co/nmEfxRPC6C                                                        


Go to Media Center >












Firm History
Learn More About KKR’s History 





Leadership
Meet KKR’s Leadership 





Milestone
Celebrating 40 Years of Partnership 











×
Drawbridge Realty Fund Investors


By clicking “OK” below, I acknowledge that I have read and understood the following important information:
Access to the KKR Investor Portal is provided to investors in Drawbridge Realty Partners, L.P. (the “Drawbridge Fund”) by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. L.P. (together with its affiliates, “KKR”) solely in KKR’s capacity as an administrator to the Drawbridge Fund and at the direction of Drawbridge Realty (“Drawbridge”).  Information regarding the Drawbridge Fund accessed through the KKR Investor Portal is confidential and intended for Drawbridge Fund investors only.  The recipient should not distribute this Communication to any person (other than its legal, investment or tax advisors) without the prior consent of Drawbridge.
Drawbridge is an independently managed real estate investment vehicle. KKR has a financial and/or control interest in, and provides certain services to the Drawbridge Fund and/or its sponsor, but KKR is not the investment advisor to the Drawbridge Fund or any portfolio investment of the Drawbridge Fund. Further, KKR is under no obligation to provide the Drawbridge Fund with investment opportunities and in many cases will be prohibited from doing so by KKR’s internal policies and procedures.  No person should rely upon the past performance or reputation of KKR or its investment products when considering any security offered by the Drawbridge Fund or Drawbridge. 

OK






  








